Louisiana, session 2026, SB265.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Section 27(C) of Act No. 478 of the 2025 Regular Session is hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Section 27.
* * *
(C) Sections 3, 5, 11, 13, 17, 19, and 21 of this Act shall become effective
October 1, 2027 2026.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 6:333(F)(14) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§333. Disclosure of financial records; reimbursement of costs
* * *
F. The following disclosures by a bank or any affiliate are hereby specifically
authorized and, except as otherwise provided in this Subsection, nothing in this
Section shall prohibit, restrict, or otherwise apply to:
* * *
(14) The disclosure by a bank or any affiliate of data match information on
an individual to the secretary of the Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works, or his designee in the office of children and family services, child
support enforcement section, for use in attempting to establish, modify, or enforce
a child support obligation of such individual. Such disclosure to the department shall
be limited to the name, record address, social security or taxpayer identification
number, and an average daily account balance for the most recent thirty-day period,
of a noncustodial parent who maintains an account at such institution and who owes
past-due support as identified by the state by name and social security or taxpayer
identification number. The disclosure authorization provided for in this Paragraph
shall apply to all co-owners listed on the applicable account.
* * *
Page 5 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
Section 3. R.S. 9:58(4), 252(C), 254, 303(A), 311(A)(2) and the introductory
paragraph of 311(C), the introductory paragraph of 311.1(C), 311.1(C)(2), (D), and
(G)(3)(a)(i), 315.16(A) and (B)(9), 315.22.1(C)(2) and (F), 315.24(A) and the introductory
paragraph of 315.24(B), 315.31(5), 315.40(1) and (3), 377.18(B)(2), 396(B)(1), 399.1(A)
and (F)(3) and (4), 404, 406(B)(2) and (C)(2), 2720.4(A)(2) and (C), and 3261.1(B)(6) are
hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§58. Definitions
For purposes of this Part:
* * *
(4) "Domestic violence shelter" means a community-based shelter for victims
of domestic violence that is managed by the Louisiana Department of Children and
Family Services Health.
* * *
§252. Duplicate records of marriage licenses issued; preservation; filing of duplicate
copy with state division of vital records; penalty for failure to file
* * *
C. The other copy shall be filed with the division of vital records of the
Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health within ten days of
the expiration of each month, and the failure, neglect, or refusal to do so shall be
punished by a fine of not less than ten dollars nor more than fifty dollars.
* * *
§254. Penalty for failure to file or complete marriage certificate
Any person authorized to perform marriages in this state who fails to
complete the forms provided by the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health, and specifically fails to fill in the date and place the ceremony was
performed, or neglects or fails to file the two executed copies with the clerk of court
in the parish where the license was issued or, if in Orleans Parish, with the state
office of vital records, within ten days after the date of the marriage as provided by
law, shall be fined not less than twenty dollars for the first offense, fifty dollars for
Page 6 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
the second offense, and one hundred dollars for a third offense, and the offender shall
be prohibited thereafter from officiating at any marriage in this state.
* * *
§303. Income assignment; new orders; deviation
A. In all new child support orders after January 1, 1994, that are not being
enforced by the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works, the
court shall include as part of the order an immediate income assignment unless there
is a written agreement between the parties or the court finds good cause not to
require an immediate income assignment.
* * *
§311. Modification or suspension of support; material change in circumstances;
periodic review by Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works; medical support
A.
* * *
(2) The Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works shall
prepare and distribute information, forms, and rules for the modification or
suspension of support orders, in accordance with this Subsection, and for proceeding
in forma pauperis. The information provided by the Department of Children and
Family Services Louisiana Works shall specifically include what may constitute a
material change in circumstances. The clerks of court in all parishes shall make this
information available to the public upon request. This information shall also be
distributed by the Department of Public Safety and Corrections or the sheriff of any
parish, as appropriate, to every person incarcerated in every state and parish jail and
prison facility. When the initial support order is entered, either the court or the
department, if providing services, shall provide this information to the parties.
* * *
C. For purposes of this Section, in cases where the Department of Children
and Family Services Louisiana Works is providing support enforcement services:
Page 7 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
* * *
§311.1. Child support during the obligor's incarceration; Department of Children
and Family Services Louisiana Works providing support
enforcement services
* * *
C. The Department of Public Safety and Corrections or the sheriff of any
parish, as appropriate, shall notify the Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works of any person who has been in their custody and may be subject
to a child support order if either:
* * *
(2) The person who was the subject of notification under Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection is scheduled to be released from incarceration. The timeframe for such
notification under this Paragraph shall be determined by an interagency agreement
between the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works and the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections.
D. When the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works
is providing support enforcement services, the department shall, upon receipt of
notice in accordance with Subsection C of this Section, provide notice to the
custodial party by regular mail.
* * *
G.
* * *
(3)(a)(i) If the obligor is released from incarceration while the child is a
minor, the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works or either
party shall petition the court prior to the first day of the second full month after the
obligor's release from incarceration for a modification hearing to establish the terms
of the previously suspended child support order. Unless the terms of the order of
support have been otherwise modified, the suspended order of support shall resume
at the same terms that existed before the suspension.
Page 8 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
* * *
§315.16. Review of guidelines
A. The guidelines set forth in this Part shall be reviewed by the legislature not
less than once every four years. A review of the guidelines shall take place in 2012
and every four years thereafter, and it shall be the responsibility of the office of
children and family services, child support enforcement section of the Department
of Children and Family Services, Louisiana Works and the Louisiana District
Attorneys Association, in consultation with the child support review committee
provided in Subsection B of this Section, to obtain all information required to
comply with the provisions of 42 U.S.C. 667(a) and present the same to the
legislature sixty days prior to the beginning of the 2008 Regular Session of the
Legislature and every four years thereafter.
B. The child support review committee shall serve without compensation,
except for the members of the legislature who shall receive a per diem as provided
by law, and shall consist of the following members:
* * *
(9) The secretary or a designee of the Department of Children and Family
Services Louisiana Works.
* * *
§315.22.1. Support for disabled children
* * *
C.
* * *
(2) Nothing in this Section or any other provision of law shall be construed
to require the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health to
obtain an order of continuing tutorship or judgment of interdiction.
* * *
F. Nothing in this Section shall require the Department of Children and
Family Services Louisiana Works to provide support enforcement services to a
Page 9 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
family not otherwise qualified to receive them under Title IV-D of the Social
Security Act and related portions of Title IV-A of such Act.
* * *
§315.24. Child support enforcement; revocatory and oblique actions
A. A party to whom child support is owed, including the Department of
Children and Family Services Louisiana Works when rendering child support
enforcement services, may seek enforcement of a child support obligation by any
lawful means provided by law, including the use of a revocatory or oblique action
brought pursuant to the provisions of Civil Code Article 2036 et seq.
B. In cases wherein the Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works is providing support enforcement services and has reason to
believe that an obligor acted or failed to act in such a way that caused or increased
his insolvency, the department shall seek either of the following:
* * *
§315.31. Definitions
As used in this Subpart:
* * *
(5) "Department" means the Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works when rendering child support enforcement services in TANF or
non-TANF cases.
* * *
§315.40. Definitions
As used in this Subpart:
(1) "Administrator" means the administrator of the child support enforcement
section, office of children and family services, Department of Children and Family
Services division of Louisiana Works.
* * *
(3) "Department" means the Department of Children and Family Services,
office of children and family services Louisiana Works.
Page 10 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
* * *
§377.18. Limits of privilege
* * *
B. The privileges in accordance with R.S. 9:377.16 for a collaborative family
law communication do not apply to the extent that a communication is any of the
following:
* * *
(2) Sought or offered to prove or disprove abuse, neglect, abandonment, or
exploitation of a child or adult, unless the Louisiana Department of Children and
Family Services Health is a party to or otherwise participates in the process.
* * *
§396. Authority for test; ex parte orders; use of results
* * *
B.(1) The district attorney, in assisting the Department of Children and
Family Services Louisiana Works in establishing paternity as authorized by R.S.
46:236.1.1 et seq., may file a motion with a court of proper jurisdiction and venue
prior to and without the necessity of filing any other legal proceeding. Upon ex parte
motion of the district attorney and sworn affidavit of the party alleging specific facts
tending to prove paternity and other facts necessary to establish the jurisdiction and
venue of the court, the court shall issue an ex parte order directing the mother, her
husband or former husband, child, and alleged father to appear at a certain date and
time to submit to the collection of blood or tissue samples, or both, and shall direct
that inherited characteristics in the samples, including but not limited to blood and
tissue type, be determined by appropriate testing procedures. The order shall be
personally served upon the alleged father. If any party refuses to submit to such tests,
the court, in a subsequent civil action in which paternity is a relevant fact, may
resolve the question of paternity against such party or enforce its order if the rights
of others and the interests of justice so require.
* * *
Page 11 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
§399.1. Dismissal of final order following judgment of paternity; time periods;
procedure; effects
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a judgment establishing
paternity may be set aside or vacated by the adjudicated father of a child, the child,
the mother of the child, or the legal representative of any of these persons. The
proceeding shall be instituted by ordinary process in a court of competent
jurisdiction and service shall be made upon the office of children and family
services, child support enforcement section of the Department of Children and
Family Services, Louisiana Works if services are being provided by the department.
The burden of proof shall be upon the party seeking to set aside or vacate the
judgment of paternity. The proceeding shall be brought within a two-year period
commencing with the date on which the adjudicated father knew or should have
known of a judgment that established him as the father of the child or commencing
with the date the adjudicated father knew or should have known of the existence of
an action to adjudicate the issue of paternity, whichever is first.
* * *
F.
* * *
(3) The judgment dismissing an established order of support shall be served
upon the office of children and family services, child support enforcement section
of the Department of Children and Family Services, Louisiana Works if services
are being
(4) Neither the state of Louisiana, its officers, employees, agents, contractors,
nor the office of children and family services, child support enforcement section of
the Department of Children and Family Services, Louisiana Works shall be liable
in any case to compensate any person for child support paid or for any other costs as
a result of the judgment setting aside or vacating the judgment of paternity or support
entered in accordance with this Section.
* * *
Page 12 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
§404. Father's paternity action; time period; exception
The peremptive periods in Civil Code Article 198 shall apply to the
Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works when providing
services in accordance with 42 USC 666.
* * *
§406. Revocation or annulment of authentic act; with and without cause; procedure
* * *
B.
* * *
(2) The petitioner shall institute the annulment proceeding by ordinary
process in a court of competent jurisdiction upon notice to the other party who
executed the notarial act of acknowledgment and other necessary parties including
the office of children and family services, child support enforcement section of the
Department of Children and Family Services, Louisiana Works.
* * *
C.
* * *
(2) Neither the state of Louisiana, its officers, employees, agents, contractors,
nor the office of children and family services, child support enforcement section of
the Department of Children and Family Services, Louisiana Works shall be liable
to compensate any person for child support paid or any other costs as a result of the
revocation of any authentic act of acknowledgment or the annulment of any
judgment of paternity or support in accordance with this Section.
* * *
§2720.4. Institution of records check
A. Upon the initiation of the summary proceeding, the court shall do all of
the following:
* * *
(2) Order that the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services
Page 13 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
Health conduct a records check for validated complaints of child abuse or neglect
in this or any other state in which either of the intended parents and the gestational
carrier and her spouse, if she is married, has been domiciled since becoming a major.
* * *
C. The sheriff or the office of state police, Louisiana Bureau of Criminal
Identification and Information, the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health, in accordance with the applicable rules and regulations
promulgated by the department, and the judicial administrator's office of the
Louisiana Supreme Court shall accord priority to these orders and shall provide a
certificate to the court indicating all information discovered, or that no information
has been found.
* * *
§3261.1. Lease agreements for certain residential dwellings; domestic abuse victims
* * *
B. Definitions
* * *
(6) "Qualified third party" means the executive director, program director, or
another employee of a community-based shelter contracted with the Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services Health pursuant to R.S. 46:2124,
provided the employee is a Licensed Clinical Social Worker (LCSW) or possesses
a masters degree in Social Work (MSW).
* * *
Section 4. R.S. 11:441.1(F) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§441.1. Early Retirement and Payroll Reduction Act of 2006
* * *
F. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or of this Section to the
contrary, the provisions of this Section which eliminate vacated positions shall not
be applicable to any positions of the Department of Children and Family Services,
office of children and family services, child support enforcement section, Louisiana
Page 14 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
Works; or to Department of Public Safety and Corrections security officers or
probation and parole officers; or to any positions of the LSU health care services
division.
* * *
Section 5. R.S. 13:844.1(B), 992.1(A), 998(B) and(E)(1) and (3), 1000.12(B),
1141(B) and the introductory paragraph of 1141(E)(1) and 1141(E)(3), 1414(B) and (E)(1)
and (3), 3881(A)(1)(a), 3928, 4291(B)(1) and (C), 4521(A)(3) and (4), 5108.2, and 5713(J)
are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§844.1. Fees; state agency adoptions
* * *
B. For the purpose of this Section, "state agency adoption" means any
adoption proceeding wherein the child to be adopted is in the legal custody of the
Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health or the corresponding
department of any other state.
* * *
§992.1. Judicial building fund
A. The Nineteenth Judicial District Court and the clerk of court of the
Nineteenth Judicial District are hereby authorized to impose the following additional
costs of court and service charges provided for in Subsection B of this Section in all
cases over which the court has jurisdiction, until the bonded indebtedness provided
for in Subsection C of this Section is paid. The costs and charges provided in
Subsection B of this Section shall not apply to cases involving family matters or any
child welfare proceeding instituted by the Louisiana Department of Children and
Family Services Health, Louisiana Works, or any district attorney's office. The
costs and charges may be up to and include the maximum amount set forth and shall
be imposed on order of the judges en banc. Such costs and charges shall be paid to
the clerk of court when the filing is made.
* * *
§998. Nonrefundable fee; assessment and disposition
Page 15 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
* * *
B. The clerks of the respective district courts, within thirty days of the close
of each fiscal year, shall remit all funds collected pursuant to this Section to be
deposited in the state treasurer's account for credit to a special statutorily dedicated
fund account after meeting the requirements of Article VII, Section 9 of the
Constitution of Louisiana. The monies in this account shall be invested by the state
treasurer in the same manner as monies in the state general fund, and interest earned
on the investment of these monies shall be credited to the account following
compliance with the requirement of Article VII, Section 9(B) of the Constitution of
Louisiana relative to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund. Disbursement of
funds shall be made by the office of children and family services women's health
and community health in the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health, or its successor, in accordance with Paragraph (E)(2) of this Section
and only in amounts appropriated by the legislature. Monies deposited into this
account shall be categorized as fees and self-generated revenue for the sole purpose
of reporting related to the executive budget, supporting documents, and general
appropriations bills and shall be available for annual appropriations by the
legislature.
* * *
E.(1) Within thirty days of receipt of such funds, the office of children and
family services women's health and community health shall distribute the funds
among those qualifying organizations. A qualifying organization must be recognized
as a nonprofit organization under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code
and be located and operated within Caddo, Calcasieu, Caldwell, East Carroll, West
Carroll, Franklin, Jackson, St. Landry, Lincoln, Madison, Morehouse, St. Bernard,
Ouachita, Union, Richland, Tensas, Sabine, DeSoto, Vermilion, or Lafayette Parish
and shall provide:
* * *
(3) Organizations seeking to be qualified shall apply on an annual basis to the
Page 16 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
office of children and family services women's health and community health
within the time and in the manner designated by the office of children and family
services and afford such reasonable proof as is required to establish its entitlement
to funds.
* * *
§1000.12. Twenty-Fourth Judicial District Court; additional support obligation fee;
Domestic Commissioner's Fund
* * *
B. The provisions of this Section shall not apply in cases in which the
Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works is providing support
enforcement services.
* * *
§1141. Domestic Relations Section; nonrefundable fee; assessment and disposition
* * *
B. The clerk of the civil district court, within thirty days of the close of each
fiscal year, shall remit all costs collected pursuant to this Section to be deposited in
the state treasurer's account for credit to a special statutorily dedicated fund account
after meeting the requirements of Article VII, Section 9 of the Constitution of
Louisiana. The monies in this account shall be invested by the state treasurer in the
same manner as monies in the state general fund, and interest earned on the
investment of these monies shall be credited to the account following compliance
with the requirement of Article VII, Section 9(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana
relative to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund. Disbursement of funds shall be
made by the office of children and family services women's health and community
health in the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health, or its
successor, in accordance with Paragraph (E)(2) of this Section and only in amounts
appropriated by the legislature. Monies deposited into this account shall be
categorized as fees and self-generated revenue for the sole purpose of reporting
related to the executive budget, supporting documents, and general appropriations
Page 17 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
bills and shall be available for annual appropriation by the legislature.
* * *
E.(1) Within thirty days of the receipt of such funds, the office of children
and family services women's health and community health shall distribute the
funds among those qualifying organizations. A qualifying organization must be
recognized as a non-profit organization under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal
Revenue Code and be located within the parish of Orleans, and shall provide:
* * *
(3) Organizations seeking to be qualified shall apply on an annual basis to the
office of community services women's health and community health within the
time and in the manner designated by the office of community services and afford
such reasonable proof as is required to establish its entitlement to funds.
* * *
§1414. Nonrefundable fee; assessment and disposition
* * *
B. The clerk of the 19th Judicial District Court, within thirty days of the close
of each fiscal year, shall remit all costs collected pursuant to this Section to be
deposited in the state treasurer's account for credit to a special statutorily dedicated
fund account after meeting the requirements of Article VII, Section 9 of the
Constitution of Louisiana. The monies in this account shall be invested by the state
treasurer in the same manner as monies in the state general fund, and interest earned
on the investment of these monies shall be credited to the account following
compliance with the requirement of Article VII, Section 9(B) of the Constitution of
Louisiana relative to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund. Disbursement of
funds shall be made by the office of children and family services women's health
and community health in the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health, or its successor, in accordance with Paragraph (E)(2) of this Section
and only in amounts appropriated by the legislature. Monies deposited into this
account shall be categorized as fees and self-generated revenue for the sole purpose
Page 18 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
of reporting related to the executive budget, supporting documents, and general
appropriations bills and shall be available for annual appropriations by the
legislature.
* * *
E.(1) Within thirty days of the receipt of such funds, the office of children
and family services women's health and community health shall distribute the
funds among those qualifying organizations. A qualifying organization must be
recognized as a non-profit organization under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal
Revenue Code and be located within the parish of East Baton Rouge, and shall
provide:
* * *
(3) Organizations seeking to be qualified shall apply on an annual basis to the
office of children and family services women's health and community health
within the time and in the manner designated by the office of children and family
services and afford such reasonable proof as is required to establish its entitlement
to funds.
* * *
§3881. General exemptions from seizure
A. The following income or property of a debtor is exempt from seizure
under any writ, mandate, or process whatsoever, except as otherwise herein
provided:
(1)(a) Seventy-five percent of his disposable earnings for any week, but in
no case shall this exemption be less than an amount in disposable earnings which is
equal to thirty times the federal minimum hourly wage in effect at the time the
earnings are payable or a multiple or fraction thereof, according to whether the
employee's pay period is greater or less than one week. However, the exemption
from disposable earnings for the payment of a current or past due support obligation,
or both, for a child or children is fifty percent of disposable earnings, and the
exemption from seizure of the disposable earnings for the payment of a current or
Page 19 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
past due support obligation, or both, for a spouse or former spouse is sixty percent
of the disposable earnings. For purposes of this Subsection, if the Department of
Children and Family Services Louisiana Works is providing support enforcement
services to the spouse and a judgment or order for support includes an obligation for
both a child or children and a spouse or former spouse, or in any case wherein the
judgment or order does not clearly indicate which amount is attributable to support
of the child or children and which amount is attributable to support of the spouse or
former spouse, the support obligation shall be treated as if it is exclusively for the
support of a child or children.
* * *
§3928. Priority of judgment, decree, or order of support
In any criminal or civil matter, a judgment, decree, order, or sentence of
court, or a sale, transfer, or assignment of earnings by which a person is obligated to
pay for the current or past due support, or both, of a child or children, or of a parent
of a child or children if the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana
Works is providing support enforcement services to the parent, shall prime in
enforcement any prior or subsequent judgment, decree, order, or sentence of court,
or sale, transfer, or assignment of earnings, and shall be satisfied out of the
nonexempt portion of disposable earnings.
* * *
§4291. Effect of child support payments; judicial mortgage and privilege; affidavit
of support owed; prescription
B.(1) In all cases where the Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works is enforcing child support services, a judgment created by
operation of law pursuant to Subsection A of this Section shall be executory in all
respects, without the necessity of a judicial proceeding to determine the amount
actually owed. The director of the child support enforcement section, office of
children and family services child support, Department of Children and Family
Services Louisiana Works, or his designee shall certify the actual amount in an
Page 20 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
affidavit entitled "Child Support Mortgage and Privilege by Affidavit of DCFS".
Such affidavit shall have the effect of a judgment. Notwithstanding any other law to
the contrary, prescription shall not begin to run against any such judgment until the
child reaches the age of majority or the obligation to provide child support ceases.
* * *
C. The department shall provide notice by certified mail, by personal service,
or by domiciliary service, to the child support obligor thirty days prior to a "Child
Support Mortgage and Privilege by Affidavit of DCFS" being filed and recorded.
The notice shall advise the child support obligor that he has fifteen days to file an
appeal. Upon notice of appeal, the department shall schedule a judicial hearing.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, prescription shall not begin to run
against any such judgment until the child reaches the age of majority or the
obligation to provide child support ceases.
* * *
§4521. State and its subdivisions; temporary deferral of court costs; exceptions
A.
* * *
(3) This Section shall not apply to the Department of Children and Family
Services Louisiana Works for any proceedings brought by the Department of
Children and Family Services Louisiana Works or any district attorney, on behalf
of the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works, to establish
filiation or enforce support, when such proceedings are subject to a cooperative
agreement between the agency and the clerk of court of the appropriate jurisdiction.
Any cooperative agreement entered into between the clerk of court and the agency
shall include reimbursement for sheriff's costs. The provisions of this Paragraph shall
not apply if federal funds are not available to cover the cost of the agreement.
(4) Neither the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services
Health nor any district attorney's office shall be required to pay court costs in any
child welfare proceeding instituted by such department of district attorney's office.
Page 21 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
* * *
§5108.2. Child protective services workers; legal defense
The Department of Justice shall provide any worker of the child protection
services division of the office of children and family services child welfare of the
Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health with a legal defense
in any civil action arising from any activity within the course and scope of the
worker's employment.
* * *
§5713. Duties; autopsies and investigations
* * *
J. Upon request, the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services
Health shall be entitled to obtain at no charge the name, age, preliminary diagnosis,
and manner of death of a deceased minor or any other findings of abuse or neglect
of the minor from the office of the coroner conducting the autopsy while the final
autopsy is pending. If the coroner finds that the cause of death of a minor child was
due to abuse or neglect or finds evidence of any other abuse or neglect of the child,
he shall notify the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health.
The coroner shall provide the department with his findings in a timely manner, or
immediately when requested to protect any other minor child.
* * *
Section 6. R.S. 14:46.4(B)(1) and (2), 74(D)(2), 91.3(A), 403(A)(2) and (4)(a), and
403.3(A)(1)(b)(i) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§46.4. Re-homing of a child
* * *
B. Re-homing does not include:
(1) Placement of a child with a relative, stepparent, licensed adoption agency,
licensed attorney, or the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services
Health.
(2) Placement of a child by a licensed attorney, licensed adoption agency, or
Page 22 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health.
* * *
§74. Criminal neglect of family
* * *
D.
* * *
(2) If a fine is imposed, the court shall direct it to be paid in whole or in part
to the spouse or to the tutor or custodian of the child, to the court approved fiduciary
of the spouse or child, or to the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Louisiana Works in a FITAP or Family Independence Temporary
Assistance Program case or in a non-FITAP or Family Independence Temporary
Assistance Program case in which the said department is rendering services,
whichever is applicable; hereinafter, said payee shall be referred to as the "applicable
payee." In addition, the court may issue a support order, after considering the
circumstances and financial ability of the defendant, directing the defendant to pay
a certain sum at such periods as the court may direct. This support shall be ordered
payable to the applicable payee. The amount of support as set by the court may be
increased or decreased by the court as the circumstances may require.
* * *
§91.3. Unlawful participation in a child-related business
A. No person who has been convicted of, or who has pled guilty or nolo
contendere to, an offense listed in R.S. 15:587.1(C) or whose name is recorded on
the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services' Health's state central
registry on or after August 1, 2018, shall own, operate, or in any way participate in
the governance of any early learning center as defined by R.S. 17:407.33, residential
home as defined by R.S. 46:1403, or residence in which child care services are
provided by a family child care provider or in-home provider who is registered
pursuant to R.S. 17:407.61 et seq.
* * *
Page 23 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
§403. Abuse of children; reports; waiver of privilege
A.
* * *
(2) Any person, any employee of a local child protection unit of the
Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health, any employee of
any local law enforcement agency, any employee or agent of any state department,
or any school employee who knowingly and willfully violates the provisions of
Chapter 5 of Title VI of the Children's Code, or who knowingly and willfully
obstructs the procedures for receiving and investigating reports of child abuse or
neglect or sexual abuse, or who discloses without authorization confidential
information about or contained within such reports shall be fined not more than five
hundred dollars or imprisoned for not more than six months, or both.
* * *
(4)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection,
any person who is eighteen years of age or older who witnesses the sexual abuse of
a child and knowingly and willfully fails to report the sexual abuse to law
enforcement or to the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services
Health as required by Children's Code Article 610, shall be fined not more than ten
thousand dollars, imprisoned with or without hard labor for not more than five years,
or both.
* * *
§403.3. Reports of missing children; procedures; false reports or communications;
penalties
A.(1) Any state or local law enforcement agency receiving a report of a
missing child or the recovery of a missing child and having reasonable grounds to
believe the report is accurate shall do all of the following immediately after receiving
the report:
* * *
(b) Notify each of the following of the facts and contents of the report:
Page 24 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
(i) The Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health to the
extent that the reporting is required pursuant to Chapter Five of Title VI of the
Children's Code.
* * *
Section 7. R.S. 15:305(A)(1), (D), and (E)(1), 440.2(A)(1)(a) and (c), 440.4(A)(5),
440.7(C), 578(E), 587(A)(1)(a) and (2)(a) and (b), 587.1(A)(1) and (I), 587.5(A)(6), 934(A),
951(C)(1), 1081, 1083, 1084(A) and (B), the introductory paragraph of 1084(C), 1084(C)(1)
and (D), and 1085(A) through (C), 1086(A), the introductory paragraph of 1199.4(D), and
1428(C)(3) and (D) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§305. Probation in neglect of family cases
A.(1) Whenever a person has pleaded guilty or been found guilty of the
misdemeanor of criminal neglect of family or has been found in contempt of court
for failing to pay support as ordered under the provisions of Children's Code Article
1353, the judge may suspend the execution or imposition of sentence and release the
offender on unsupervised probation or probation under the supervision of the
Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works. The judge may
suspend the sentence and place the defendant on probation although he has begun to
serve the sentence imposed and may impose any specific conditions reasonably
related to the offender's rehabilitation, including but not limited to the conditions of
probation as set forth in Code of Criminal Procedure Article 895.
* * *
D. The clerk of court shall give notice to the Department of Children and
Family Services Louisiana Works in every case in which an offender is placed on
probation under this Section.
E.(1) If the court finds that the defendant has violated a condition of his
probation, it shall order that the probation be revoked and shall sentence the
defendant to imprisonment for not more than six months. The court shall also order
the defendant to pay the total amount of unpaid support to the spouse, to the tutor or
custodian of the child, to the court-approved fiduciary of the spouse or child, or to
Page 25 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works in a FITAP case
or in a non-FITAP case in which the department is rendering services, whichever is
applicable; hereinafter, said payee shall be referred to as the applicable payee. Such
judgment shall have the same force and effect as a final judgment for money
damages against the defendant. This judgment may be made executory by any
Louisiana court of competent jurisdiction on petition of the department or the district
attorney.
* * *
§440.2. Authorization
A.(1) A court with original criminal jurisdiction or juvenile jurisdiction may
require that a statement of a protected person be recorded on videotape by any of the
following:
(a) Motion of the court or motion of the district attorney, a parish welfare unit
or agency, the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health, or
a child advocacy center operating in the judicial district.
* * *
(c) Execution of a written protocol between the court and law enforcement
agencies, a parish welfare unit or agency, the Louisiana Department of Children and
Family Services Health, or a child advocacy center operating in the judicial district
that authorizes the videotaping of any protected person without the necessity of the
issuance of an order by the court in any individual case.
* * *
§440.4. Method of recording videotape; competency
A. A videotape of a protected person may be offered in evidence either for
or against a defendant. To render such a videotape competent evidence, it must be
satisfactorily proved:
* * *
(5) That the taking of the protected person's statement was supervised by a
physician, a social worker, a law enforcement officer, a licensed psychologist, a
Page 26 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
medical psychologist, a licensed professional counselor, an authorized representative
of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health, or a civilian
investigator.
* * *
§440.7. Admissibility in civil, family, and administrative proceedings; discovery;
confidentiality
* * *
C. Nothing in this Section shall prevent the Louisiana Department of
Children and Family Services Health or law enforcement from sharing information
as authorized or required by state or federal law.
* * *
§578. Functions, powers, and duties of the bureau; crime laboratory
* * *
E. Upon written request, the bureau shall provide specified criminal history
information to the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health
to provide for the well-being of children, as provided in R.S. 15:587.1.
* * *
§587. Duty to provide information; processing fees; Louisiana Bureau of Criminal
Identification and Information
A.(1)(a) The bureau shall make available upon request, or at other times as
the deputy secretary shall designate, to any eligible criminal justice agency and the
division of administration, office of technology services, the Department of
Education, the Louisiana Department of Health, the state fire marshal when
reviewing applications for licensure, the Louisiana Manufactured Housing
Commission when reviewing applications for licensure, the Department of Children
and Family Services, the Department of Insurance, the Louisiana State Racing
Commission, the Senate Committee on Senate and Governmental Affairs , the House
Committee on House and Governmental Affairs, the secretary of Louisiana Works
or his designee, the Board of River Port Pilot Commissioners, the Louisiana State
Page 27 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
Board of Home Inspectors, the Office of Financial Institutions in the office of the
governor, the office of the disciplinary counsel of the Louisiana Attorney
Disciplinary Board of the Louisiana State Bar Association; however, as to any
licensed attorney this information shall be provided only after the issuance of a
formal charge against the attorney, the Louisiana Supreme Court Committee on Bar
Admissions, the municipal or parish department or personnel responsible for
reviewing applications for alcoholic beverage outlet permits, and the legislative
auditor any information contained in the criminal history record and identification
files of the bureau. The Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana
Works may provide information secured pursuant to this Subsection to all federal
and state agencies providing child support enforcement services.
* * *
(2)(a) The bureau, in accordance with its powers to regulate and to enforce
provisions herein, may further restrict those agencies eligible to receive information.
However, the bureau shall make available to the Department of Children and Family
Services Louisiana Department of Health all criminal history record information
as defined in R.S. 15:576 related to foster and adoptive parent applicants and adult
members of foster and adoptive parent households; parents whose children have been
removed from their custody; parents or caretakers involved in investigations of abuse
or neglect; potential caretakers of a child who is either in the custody of the
department, is the subject of an investigation of abuse or neglect, or is or has been
receiving services through the office of children and family services child welfare;
potential employees of the department whose duties include the investigation of child
abuse or neglect, the supervisory or disciplinary authority over children, direct care
of a child, or performance of licensing surveys; and individuals employed directly
or indirectly by institutions or facilities providing, or with the potential of providing,
daily care or supervision to any child or youth in the custody of or under the
supervision of any Louisiana state government agency. For the purposes of this
Section, the bureau shall employ such methods and procedures and shall observe
Page 28 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
such duty hours as to provide information upon request within forty-eight hours from
its receipt.
(b) The bureau shall facilitate national criminal history record checks of
prospective foster and adoptive parent applicants and adult members of foster and
adoptive parent households; parents whose children have been removed from their
custody; parents or caretakers involved in investigations of abuse or neglect;
potential caretakers of a child who is either in the custody of the department, is the
subject of an investigation of abuse or neglect, or is or has been receiving services
through the office of children and family services child welfare; potential employees
of the department whose duties include the investigation of child abuse or neglect,
the supervisory or disciplinary authority over children, direct care of a child, or
performance of licensing surveys; and individuals employed directly or indirectly by
institutions or facilities providing, or with the potential of providing, daily care or
supervision to any child or youth in the custody of or under the supervision of any
Louisiana state government agency by receiving and forwarding fingerprint cards to
the Federal Bureau of Investigation. The Louisiana Department of Children and
Family Services Health is authorized to receive and screen the results of the state
and national criminal history record checks in order to determine foster or adoptive
parent applicants' eligibility for certification or recertification as a placement
resource for children; to assist in the determination of the appropriateness of a parent
or potential caregiver as a placement resource for a child; to assess the situation for
safety issues and risks to the child and worker; to assess the qualifications of a
potential department employee; and to assess the qualifications of individuals
employed, directly or indirectly, by institutions or facilities providing, or with the
potential of providing, daily care or supervision to any child or youth in the custody
of or under the supervision of any Louisiana state government agency. The
department shall maintain the confidentiality of criminal history information
received in accordance with applicable federal or state law.
* * *
Page 29 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
§587.1. Provision of information to protect children
A.(1) As provided in R.S. 15:825.3, R.S. 17:8.9, 15, 407.42, and 407.71,
Children's Code Article 424.1, and R.S. 46:51.2, any employer or others responsible
for the actions of one or more persons who have been given or have applied to be
considered for a position of supervisory or disciplinary authority over children, and
as provided in R.S. 46:51.2(A), the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health as employer of one or more persons who have been given or have
applied to be considered for a position whose duties include the investigation of child
abuse or neglect, supervisory or disciplinary authority over children, direct care of
a child, or performance of licensing surveys, and for individuals who are employed
by or contracted staff of a child care institution, as defined in 42 U.S.C. 672, licensed
by the department, shall request in writing that the bureau supply information to
ascertain whether that person or persons have been arrested for or convicted of, or
pled nolo contendere to, any criminal offense. The request must be on a form
prepared by the bureau and signed by a responsible officer or official of the
organization or department making the request. It must include a statement signed
by the person about whom the request is made which gives his permission for such
information to be released.
* * *
I. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services, office of children and family services,
Health may utilize the National Crime Information Center to conduct background
checks authorized in R.S. 15:587 when investigating or responding to reports of
abuse or neglect as provided for in Section 151 of P.L. 109-248.
* * *
§587.5. Agencies with access to federal tax information; criminal history
information
A. For purposes of this Section, "agency" means any agency that has an
agreement with the Internal Revenue Service to access federal tax information or is
Page 30 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
authorized by law to audit the records of an agency that has access to federal tax
information. "Agency" shall include all of the following:
* * *
(6) Louisiana Works, office of unemployment insurance administration and
office of child support.
* * *
§934. Detention centers
A. All facilities that detain juveniles pursuant to Title VII or Title VIII of the
Louisiana Children's Code shall collect and maintain data on each child detained.
This data shall be retained permanently by the facility and shall be made available
for inspection during normal business hours by any court exercising juvenile court
jurisdiction, by the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health,
and by persons collecting aggregate statistical information.
* * *
§951. Back on Track Youth Pilot Program
* * *
C.(1) This program shall be administered by selected nonprofit groups as well
as the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, the Louisiana Department of
Children and Family Services Health, the Department of Education, Louisiana
Works, and the Louisiana Children's Trust Fund Board.
* * *
§1081. Purpose
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the provisions of
this Part shall serve as the sole statutory authorization under which the Department
of Children and Family Services or Louisiana Department of Health and the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections shall make payments for the care and
treatment of children in nonstate operated child caring agencies, child placing
agencies, shelter care facilities, and maternity homes.
* * *
Page 31 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
§1083. Participation
Nonstate operated agencies and facilities desiring to participate in payment
under this Part shall:
(1) If otherwise required by statute or regulation, be duly licensed by the state
of Louisiana through its agent, the Department of Children and Family Services or
Louisiana Department of Health.
(2) Submit to the Department of Children and Family Services or Louisiana
Department of Health or the Department of Public Safety and Corrections on or
before August first, or at a time set by the department, a statement requesting
participation and funding under this Part for the succeeding fiscal year.
(3) Submit programmatic and fiscal information within such time and to the
extent as the Department of Children and Family Services or Louisiana Department
of Health or the Department of Public Safety and Corrections may require. Agencies
or facilities which operate multiple subprograms shall submit such information for
each subprogram for which participation is being requested. The failure of an agency
or facility to submit such a statement or to provide information required by these
departments may, at their discretion, preclude that agency or facility from
participating in funding under this Part for the fiscal year in question.
(4) Be subject to audit by the Department of Children and Family Services
or Louisiana Department of Health or the Department of Public Safety and
Corrections and the legislative auditor, and shall retain and make available such
records and documents as are required to complete such audit.
§1084. Establishment of rates for payment for care in nonstate operated agencies
and facilities
A. For purposes of establishing rates of payment the Department of Children
and Family Services or Louisiana Department of Health and the Department of
Public Safety and Corrections shall develop a formula that bears a reasonable
relationship to cost of care for children cared for by nonstate operated institutions
and agencies and which incorporates a prospective budgeting methodology. For
Page 32 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
purposes of establishing such rates each department named herein shall develop
criteria for budgeting that reflect established accounting practices and encourage cost
containment.
B. On the basis of information provided in accordance with R.S. 15:1083, the
Department of Children and Family Services or Louisiana Department of Health and
the Department of Public Safety and Corrections shall pay monthly to each nonstate
operated institution or agency a sum computed by these departments using a formula
that bears a reasonable relationship to cost of care for children cared for by the
nonstate operated institutions and agencies and which incorporates a prospective
budgeting methodology.
C. The Department of Children and Family Services or Louisiana Department
of Health and the Department of Public Safety and Corrections may make revisions
to these rates provided that all of the following conditions are met:
(1) The Department of Children and Family Services or Louisiana
Department of Health or the Department of Public Safety and Corrections submits
a report to the legislature documenting the need for such revisions.
* * *
D. The Louisiana Department of Health, Department of Children and Family
Services and the Department of Public Safety and Corrections shall promulgate
under the Administrative Procedure Act and publish in the Louisiana Register the
criteria utilized in establishing the cost related formula that bears a reasonable
relationship to cost of care for children cared for by nonstate operated institutions
and agencies. Each department may set its own rates and make payment based on
that rate.
§1085. Payment for care and treatment
A. The Department of Children and Family Services or Louisiana
Department of Health is hereby authorized to make payments, at the rates established
under R.S. 15:1084, for the care and treatment of children placed by the Department
of Children and Family Services or Louisiana Department of Health in child caring
Page 33 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
agencies, child placing agencies, maternity homes, and shelter care facilities which
conform to the requirements of this Part.
B. Payments shall be made on a monthly basis and shall represent
reimbursements for services provided during the previous month. Participating
agencies shall submit such information as the Department of Children and Family
Services or Louisiana Department of Health may require to document claims for
reimbursement.
C. Participating agencies and facilities shall receive one and only one
monthly payment from the Department of Children and Family Services or Louisiana
Department of Health for services rendered to each child under this Part except for
such adjustments as may be necessary to rectify previous inaccurate payments.
* * *
§1086. Contribution to cost of care by parent, custodian
A. When the Department of Children and Family Services or Louisiana
Department of Health or the Department of Public Safety and Corrections provides
payments for care and treatment of a child under the provisions of this Part, the
parent or legal custodian will be required to contribute to the cost of care of the child
in such a manner as is consistent with applicable federal and state regulations, as is
commensurate with his ability to pay, and as is in accordance with a sliding scale
which shall be established by the departments.
* * *
§1199.4. Reentry Advisory Council; creation; members; powers and duties
* * *
D. Ten Nine members of the council shall be comprised as follows:
* * *
§1428. Delinquency prevention plan; programs; grants
* * *
C. The Juvenile Delinquency and Gang Prevention Advisory Board may use
public hearings and other appropriate processes to solicit input regarding the
Page 34 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
development and updating of the delinquency prevention plan. Input may be
provided by parties which include but are not limited to:
* * *
(3) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, the Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services Health, and other departments or state
agencies that provide services to delinquent children.
* * *
D. The Juvenile Delinquency and Gang Prevention Advisory Board must
develop its delinquency prevention plan in close cooperation with the commission,
Department of Public Safety and Corrections, Department of Children and Family
Services, Louisiana Department of Health, local school districts, and with local law
enforcement in order to maximize services for delinquent children. The Juvenile
Delinquency and Gang Prevention Advisory Board must update the plan for
delinquent children policies and programs every year.
* * *
Section 8. R.S. 17:15(A)(1)(a), the introductory paragraph of 15(A)(1)(b)(i),
15(A)(1)(b)(i)(bb), 15(A)(2)(a)(ii) and (vi), (D)(1)(b), (2), and (3), and (E)(1),
192.1(A)(1)(a) and (3) and (C), 238(A) through (C), 406.9(C), 407.23(B)(4), 407.35(C),
407.42(A)(2), (B)(1)(b) and (3), 407.71(A)(1) and (2), (B)(1)(b) and (3), 1687(B) and (C),
1972(1)(d), 1974(A)(7), 3129(D)(2), 3399.18(B)(11), and 3399.21(1) are hereby amended
and reenacted to read as follows:
§15. Criminal history review
A.(1)(a) A person who has been convicted of or has pled nolo contendere to
a crime listed in R.S. 15:587.1(C) or whose name is recorded on the Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services' Health's state central registry on or
after August 1, 2018, shall not be hired by a city, parish, or other local public school
board or a nonpublic school or school system as a bus operator, substitute bus
operator, or janitor, or as a temporary, part-time, or permanent school employee of
any kind.
Page 35 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
(b)(i) Except as otherwise provided in this Subparagraph, a city, parish, or
other local public school board or a nonpublic school or school system shall not
knowingly hire a person as an administrator, teacher, or substitute teacher if the
person:
* * *
(bb) Is recorded on the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services' Health's state central registry on or after August 1, 2018.
* * *
(2)(a) A city, parish, or other local public school board shall dismiss:
* * *
(ii) An administrator, teacher, or substitute teacher whose name is recorded
on the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services' Health's state central
registry on or after August 1, 2025.
* * *
(vi) Any other school employee if the employee's name is recorded on the
Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services' Health's state central
registry on or after August 1, 2025.
* * *
D.(1)
* * *
(b) An administrator, teacher, or other school employee whose name is
recorded on the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services' Health's
state central registry on or after August 1, 2025, shall report the recordation to his
employer and to the department within two business days, exclusive of weekends
and holidays.
(2) An administrator, teacher, or substitute teacher who fails to report a
conviction or plea of guilty or nolo contendere of any felony offense or fails to report
recordation on the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services' Health's
state central registry shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars or imprisoned
Page 36 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
for not more than one year, with or without hard labor, or both.
(3) A school employee other than an administrator, teacher, or substitute
teacher who fails to report a conviction or plea of guilty or nolo contendere of any
criminal offense listed in R.S. 15:587.1(C)(1) or fails to report recordation on the
Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services' Health's state central
registry shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars or imprisoned for not more
than six months, with or without hard labor, or both.
E.(1) The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education may assess
a civil fine against a school governing authority, equal to the average state yearly
compensation for a public school teacher, inclusive of salary and benefits, who
knowingly employs a person without requesting the criminal records or verifying
whether the person's name is recorded on the Louisiana Department of Children and
Family Services' Health's state central registry as required by this Section or who
knowingly hires a person who has been convicted of or pled nolo contendere to any
crime listed in R.S. 15:587.1(C) or whose name is recorded on the state central
registry.
* * *
§192.1. Meals; denial to students; procedures
A. If the governing authority of a public elementary school, for any reason,
adopts a policy of denying a scheduled meal to a child who is an elementary school
student, it shall implement the following procedures to provide for safeguards to the
child's health and the child's ability to learn:
(1) Prior to withholding a meal from the child, the school shall do each of the
following:
(a) Provide actual notification to the child's parent or legal guardian as to the
date and time after which meals may be denied, the reason for such denial, any
action that may be taken by the parent or legal guardian to prevent further denial of
meals, and the consequences of the failure to take appropriate actions to prevent such
denial, including that the school governing authority shall contact the office of
Page 37 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
children and family services within child welfare, the Louisiana Department of
Children and Family Services Health upon the third instance of such denial during
a single school year as provided in Paragraph (3) of this Subsection.
* * *
(3) Upon the third instance during a single school year of the same
elementary school child being denied a meal during school hours, the school
governing authority shall contact the office of children and family services within
child welfare, the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health
to report the failure of the parent or guardian to pay for meals which has resulted in
repeated denials of meals during school hours.
* * *
C. If the governing authority of a public elementary school adopts a policy
of denying a scheduled meal to a child, the governing authority shall document each
instance that a child is denied a meal in the elementary school under its authority.
Such documentation shall be provided upon request to the state superintendent of
education, to the secretary of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health, the House Committee on Education, or the Senate Committee on
Education.
* * *
§238. Education of children having no permanent address, certain abandoned
children, and children in foster care
A. Notwithstanding any provision of law or regulation to the contrary, the
governing authority of each public elementary and secondary school shall establish
a policy to provide for the placement in school and for the education of any child
temporarily residing within the jurisdiction of the board who has no permanent
address, who has been abandoned by his parents, or who is in foster care pursuant
to placement through the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services
Health.
B. No governing authority of a public elementary or secondary school shall
Page 38 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
deny enrollment in school to any child solely because the child has no permanent
address, because the child has been abandoned by his parents, or because the child
is in foster care pursuant to placement through the Louisiana Department of
Children and Family Services Health; however, nothing in this Section shall require
the enrollment of any child not permitted by another school system to attend school,
either permanently or temporarily, as a result of disciplinary actions.
C. The governing authority of each public elementary and secondary school
shall establish a policy to ensure that a child who is in foster care pursuant to
placement through the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services
Health shall be allowed to remain enrolled in the public school in which the child
was enrolled at the time he entered foster care for the duration of the child's stay in
the custody of the state or until he completes the highest grade offered at the school
if the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health determines
that remaining in that school is in the best interest of the child. If the foster care
placement is outside the jurisdictional boundaries of the public school in which the
child is enrolled, the governing authority of such school shall be responsible for
providing free transportation for the child to and from a designated location which
is within that school district and is located nearest to the child's residence and is
determined to be appropriate by such governing authority and the Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services Health. The Louisiana Department of
Children and Family Services Health shall be responsible for providing the child's
transportation between that location and the child's residence.
* * *
§406.9. Parents' Bill of Rights for Public Schools
* * *
C. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, a public school shall not be
required to release any records or information regarding a student's medical or health
records or mental health counseling records to a parent during the pendency of an
investigation of child abuse or neglect conducted by any law enforcement agency or
Page 39 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health where the parent
is the target of the investigation, unless the parent has obtained a court order.
* * *
§407.23. Early Childhood Care and Education Network; creation; components;
duties and responsibilities; pilot programs
* * *
B. To facilitate the creation of this network, the state board shall:
* * *
(4) Coordinate with the Department of Children and Family Services and the
Louisiana Department of Health to align the standards for the licensing of child care
facilities, including the requirements for participation in the Louisiana Quality Start
Child Care Rating System, with the standards established for early childhood
education programs.
* * *
§407.35. Exemptions from licensure requirements
* * *
C. Nothing in this Part shall apply to children in programs licensed or
operated by the Louisiana Department of Health or the Department of Children and
Family Services.
* * *
§407.42. Review of criminal history information and state central registry of child
abuse and neglect
A.
* * *
(2) No individual whose name is recorded on the state central registry within
the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health as a perpetrator
for a substantiated finding of abuse or neglect of a child or in any other state's child
abuse and neglect registry or repository shall own or operate a licensed early learning
center or shall be hired by a licensed early learning center as an employee or
Page 40 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
volunteer of any kind, including any therapeutic professionals, extracurricular
personnel, and other independent contractors, or shall be hired by the department in
a position whose duties include the performance of licensing inspections.
B.(1) The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall establish
by regulation, requirements and procedures under which the department shall, for
any owner, volunteer, applicant, or employee of any kind, including contractors, of
an early learning center or an applicant or employee of the department in a position
whose duties include the performance of licensing inspections:
* * *
(b) Request information from the Louisiana Department of Children and
Family Services Health as to whether the person is listed on the state central registry
as a perpetrator for a substantiated finding of abuse or neglect of a child.
* * *
(3) The department may charge a processing fee not to exceed fifteen dollars
and may collect the processing fees charged by the Bureau of Criminal Identification
and Information for a state criminal history report, the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for a federal criminal history information report, the National Crime
Information Center for a search of the National Sex Offender Registry, the
Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health for a search of its
state central registry of child abuse and neglect, and processing fees charged by other
states when it receives a request for an employment eligibility determination and
shall timely submit the appropriate processing fees to the appropriate agencies.
* * *
§407.71. Grounds for revocation or refusal to renew registration; criminal activities;
lack of CPR or first aid training
A.(1) No person who has been convicted of or pled nolo contendere to a
crime listed in R.S. 15:587.1(C), whose name is recorded on the state registry within
the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health as a perpetrator
for a substantiated finding of abuse or neglect of a child, whose name is on any other
Page 41 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
state's child abuse and neglect registry or repository, whose name is on the Louisiana
Sex Offender and Child Predator Registry, whose name is on any other state's sex
offender registry, or whose name is on the National Crime Information Center's
National Sex Offender Registry may be a registered family child care provider, be
employed in the residence or on the property of the residence where the care is
provided by the registered family child care provider, or live in the residence where
care is provided by the registered family child care provider. The cost of any
criminal background check which may be required by the department as proof of
compliance with this Subsection shall be the responsibility of the family child care
provider.
(2) No person who has been convicted of or pled nolo contendere to a crime
listed in R.S. 15:587.1(C), whose name is recorded on the state registry within the
Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health as a perpetrator for
a substantiated finding of abuse or neglect of a child, whose name is on any other
state's child abuse and neglect registry or repository, whose name is on the Louisiana
Sex Offender and Child Predator Registry, whose name is on any other state's sex
offender registry, or whose name is on the National Crime Information Center's
National Sex Offender Registry may be a registered in-home child care provider, be
an adult employed in the home or on the property of the home where care is provided
by the registered in-home child care provider, or be any adult living in the home
where care is provided by the registered in-home child care provider who is not a
caregiver. For the purposes of this Paragraph, the term "caregiver" shall mean any
person legally obligated to provide or secure care for a child, including a parent,
legal custodian, foster home parent, or other person providing a residence for the
child. The cost of any criminal background check which may be required by the
department as proof of compliance with this Subsection shall be the responsibility
of the in-home provider.
B.(1) The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall establish
by regulation requirements and procedures through which the department shall:
Page 42 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
* * *
(b) Request information from the Louisiana Department of Children and
Family Services Health as to whether the individual's name is recorded on the state
central registry for child abuse and neglect.
* * *
(3) The department may charge a processing fee not to exceed fifteen dollars
and may collect the processing fees charged by the Bureau of Criminal Identification
and Information for a state criminal history report, the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for a federal criminal history information report, the National Crime
Information Center for a search of the National Sex Offender Registry, the
Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health for a search of its
state central registry of abuse and neglect, and processing fees charged by other
states when it receives a request for a criminal background check and shall timely
submit the appropriate processing fees to the appropriate agencies.
* * *
§1687. Tuition and fee exemption; persons in foster care; eligibility; duration; foster
care status; verification; funding; definitions
* * *
B. For purposes of this Section, the term "person" shall mean any individual
who was in the care, custody, or guardianship of the office of children and family
services child welfare of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health in the foster care program for any nine of the twenty-four months
immediately prior to his eighteenth birthday.
C. For purposes of this Section, the foster care status of any person eligible
to receive the exemption as provided in this Section shall be verified by the office
of children and family services of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health prior to such person initially receiving such exemption.
* * *
§1972. Definitions
Page 43 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
As used in this Part, the following terms have the following meanings unless
the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "At-risk student" means a student who meets at least one of the following
criteria:
* * *
(d) Is in foster care pursuant to placement through the Louisiana Department
of Children and Family Services Health.
* * *
§1974. Board of directors; creation; membership; terms; powers; voting;
compensation
A. There is hereby created a board of directors for the school, hereinafter in
this Part referred to as the "board". The board shall be composed of nine members
as follows:
* * *
(7) The secretary of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health or his designee.
* * *
§3129. Power to recommend budget
* * *
D.
* * *
(2) The Board of Regents, in consultation with the Louisiana Department of
Children and Family Services Health and other appropriate persons, as determined
by the board, shall develop and adopt rules and guidelines to be used for determining
such recommended funding. Such rules and guidelines shall include but not be
limited to an initial review and analysis, with an annual update thereafter, of the
institution's facilities and learning environments from the standpoint of accessibility
to persons with motor and sensory impairments. Such review and analysis shall
include a determination as to whether or not the institution's facilities and learning
Page 44 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
environments are in compliance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act and
other applicable federal and state laws and agency rules and regulations.
* * *
§3399.18. Louisiana Power-Based Violence Review Panel
* * *
B. The panel shall be composed of the following members:
* * *
(11) A member of the Domestic Violence Prevention Commission appointed
by the secretary of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services
Health.
* * *
§3399.21. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following terms have the following meanings:
(1) "Foster youth" means any individual in the care, custody, or guardianship
of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health in the foster
care program for any six of the seventy-two months immediately prior to his
eighteenth birthday.
* * *
Section 9. R.S. 22:1023(D)(7) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1023. Prohibited discrimination; genetic information; disclosure requirements;
definitions
* * *
D. The requirements of this Section shall not apply to the genetic information
obtained:
* * *
(7) By the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health
or by a court having juvenile jurisdiction as set forth in Children's Code Article 302
for the purposes of child protection investigations or neglect proceedings.
* * *
Page 45 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
Section 10. R.S. 23:73(E)(2), 1372, 1605(A)(4), 1801(B)(1) and 2043(A)(3) are
hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§73. Comprehensive labor market information system
* * *
E.
* * *
(2) The public entities whose data and assistance shall be considered
necessary for the system to fulfill its purpose shall include the department, Louisiana
Economic Development, and the Departments of Children and Family Services,
Education, Health, Public Safety and Corrections, and Veterans Affairs, and in the
governor's office, the Offices of Elderly Affairs, Lifelong Learning, Women's
Services, and the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education, and the
Board of Regents and any other public entity that the department deems necessary.
* * *
§1372. Louisiana Workers' Compensation Second Injury Board; creation, domicile,
membership
The Louisiana Workers' Compensation Second Injury Board, hereinafter
referred to as the board, is created. The board, which shall be domiciled in Baton
Rouge, Louisiana, shall be composed of five members or their designee, who shall
be the secretary of state, the state treasurer, the commissioner of insurance, the
secretary of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health, and
the assistant secretary of the office of workers' compensation administration.
* * *
§1605. Unemployment insurance integrity program
A. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms have the meanings
ascribed to them:
* * *
(4) "New hire records" means the directory of newly hired and re-hired
employees reported under state and federal law and managed by the child support
Page 46 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
enforcement section, division of family support, office of children and family
services, Department of Children and Family Services child support, Louisiana
Works.
* * *
§1801. Workforce solutions; development; coordination with employers
* * *
B.(1) The Board of Regents, the Louisiana Community and Technical
College System, Louisiana Economic Development, the Department of Education,
the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, the Louisiana State University
system, and the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health shall
identify, recognize, change, create, or recommend any initiatives, services, data
collection, research, and programs that will promote workforce development in the
state.
* * *
§2043. Members
A. The council shall consist of members as follows:
* * *
(3) The secretary of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health.
* * *
Section 11. R.S. 24:525(D)(2) and (F), 933(B)(9), and 936(B)(1) are hereby amended
and reenacted to read as follows:
§525. State child ombudsman; duties
* * *
D.
* * *
(2) The Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health shall
notify the state child ombudsman within three business days of receiving information
on the death of any child that had been reported to the department for alleged child
Page 47 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
abuse or neglect.
* * *
F. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary and to the
extent allowed by federal law, the state child ombudsman shall, upon request, have
permission to view and use documents and records relevant to the ombudsman's
statutory duties. To the extent allowed by federal law, such documents and records
shall include but not be limited to the applications and case files of the Louisiana
Department of Health and the Department of Children and Family Services except
for the name and any identifying information of the reporter of child abuse or neglect
and restrictions provided in Title IV-D of the Social Security Act and the Internal
Revenue Code, juvenile court judgments and court minute entries, records and
reports of children in the custody of or under the supervision of the office of juvenile
justice, student records in the possession of the State state Department of Education,
any parish or city school board, and any elementary or secondary education school,
including charter schools. The state child ombudsman shall comply with any and all
restrictions imposed by law on documents, data, or information considered
confidential or privileged and furnished to the state child ombudsman.
* * *
§933. Interagency Council on the Prevention of Sex Offenses created; membership;
officers; quorum
* * *
B. The council shall be composed of twenty-four members as follows:
* * *
(9) The assistant secretary of the office of community services child welfare
of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health or his
designee.
* * *
§936. Registry
* * *
Page 48 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
B.(1) In furtherance of the purpose of this Chapter, the Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services Health shall maintain a central registry
in accordance with Children's Code Art. 616.
* * *
Section 12. R.S. 27:2(D), 24(A)(5)(b), (c), and (e), and 364(A)(1)(b)(vi) are hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2. Public policy of state concerning gaming; status of licenses, contracts, and
permits
* * *
D. In accordance with this finding, the Department of Children and Family
Services Louisiana Works shall report to the joint committees on Civil Law and
Procedure and Judiciary A, no later than fifteen days following the commencement
of the regular legislative session each year, on the interception and seizure of gaming
winnings for the payment of child support and overpayments owed to the
department. This report shall be a public record and shall include but not be limited
to the number of jackpots intercepted pursuant to this Section and the amount of each
jackpot intercepted.
* * *
§24. Rulemaking authority; fees and fines, collection
A. The board, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act and R.S.
27:15(B)(8), shall promulgate all rules and regulations necessary to carry out the
provisions of this Title, including but not limited to the following:
* * *
(5) A procedure requiring the withholding of payments of progressive slot
machine annuities and cash gaming winnings of persons who have outstanding child
support arrearages or owing child support overpayments, prior to the payment of a
progressive slot machine annuity, beginning with the second annuity payment, or
cash gaming winnings. Progressive slot machine annuities or cash gaming winnings
shall include only payments for which the entity licensed or permitted under Chapter
Page 49 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
1, 4, 5, 7, or 10 of this Title is required to file form W2-G, or a substantially
equivalent form, with the United States Internal Revenue Service.
* * *
(b) The board or any entity licensed or permitted under Chapter 1, 4, 5, 7, or
10 of this Title including any of its officers, employees, attorneys, accountants, or
other agents, shall not be civilly or criminally liable to any person, including any
customer, for any disclosure of information made in accordance with this Section,
for encumbering or surrendering assets in response to information provided by the
Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works, or for any claims
for damages arising from withholding or failing to withhold any progressive slot
machine annuities or cash gaming winnings, based upon information provided to it.
(c) If any entity licensed or permitted under Chapter 1, 4, 5, 7, or 10 of this
Title determines that the winner of a progressive slot machine annuity or cash
gaming winnings is a person who has outstanding child support arrearages or owes
child support overpayments, the entity licensed or permitted under Chapter 1, 4, 5,
7, or 10 of this Title shall deduct the child support arrearage or child support
overpayment from the payment of the progressive slot machine annuity or cash
gaming winnings. The deducted amount shall be forwarded to the Department of
Children and Family Services Louisiana Works within seven days, and the entity
licensed or permitted under Chapter 1, 4, 5, 7, or 10 of this Title shall pay the
remainder to the person who has outstanding child support arrearages or owes child
support overpayments. If the remainder is equal to or less than zero, the person who
has an outstanding child support arrearage or child support overpayment shall not
receive a payment.
* * *
(e) The board shall also require that the entity licensed or permitted under
Chapter 1, 4, 5, 7, or 10 of this Title 27 adopt procedures designed to prevent
employees from willfully failing to withhold payments of progressive slot machine
annuities or cash gaming winnings from persons who have outstanding child support
Page 50 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
arrearages or child support overpayments, based upon the information provided by
the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works that allows the
licensee to identify such persons.
* * *
§364. Gaming Control Board; powers and duties
A. The board shall:
(1)
* * *
(b) Such rules shall include:
* * *
(vi) A procedure for the withholding of progressive slot machine annuities,
of persons who have outstanding child support arrearages or child support
overpayments. The board may require any agency reporting current child support
arrearages, or overpayments of child support payments collected and distributed to
a custodial parent by the child support enforcement section of the Department of
Children and Family Services Louisiana Works to the board to provide information
relating to such arrearages or overpayments in a manner, format, or record approved
by the board. The board or any entity licensed or permitted under this Title shall not
be liable for withholding or failing to withhold any progressive slot machine
annuities, based upon information provided to it. The board shall enact such rules
and regulations by January 1, 2007.
* * *
Section 13. R.S. 28:31, 470(B)(8) and (10), and 621 are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§31. Findings
The legislature finds that there is a need for a secured residential facility for
any person found not guilty of a crime by reason of insanity or found incompetent
to stand trial after such person has been released from a state forensic facility.
Historically, all secured residential facilities have been overseen by the Department
Page 51 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
of Children and Family Services under its authority to regulate traditional adult
residential care homes. Nevertheless, it is now more appropriate and efficient for the
Louisiana Department of Health to license and regulate secured residential facilities
serving forensic clients due to the mental health issues of the residents, the fact that
the individuals are discharged from forensic hospitals operated by the Louisiana
Department of Health, and the security issues involved at such facilities. Thus, the
licensing of secured residential facilities serving forensic clients shall be transferred
from the Department of Children and Family Services to the Louisiana Department
of Health and licensed as forensic supervised transitional residential and aftercare
facilities in accordance with this Part. The licensing of all other adult residential care
homes shall remain in the Department of Children and Family Services pursuant to
R.S. 40:2151 through 2161.
* * *
§470. Louisiana State Interagency Coordinating Council for EarlySteps: Louisiana's
Early Intervention Program for Infants and Toddlers with Disabilities
and Their Families
* * *
B. The council shall be comprised of the following members:
* * *
(8) At least one member shall be from the Louisiana Department of Children
and Family Services Health.
* * *
(10) One member from the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health who is responsible for foster care.
* * *
§621. Pilot programs for children with developmental disabilities who are
considered at-risk juveniles
A. The office for citizens with developmental disabilities, Louisiana
Department of Health, may provide for the establishment of pilot programs for
Page 52 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
children with developmental disabilities who are considered at-risk juveniles. The
pilot programs may provide developmental disabilities services including
assessment, counseling, and structured activities and living options, both as defined
in this Title for juveniles referred by other agencies including but not limited to
juvenile courts, the office of children and family services, and the office of juvenile
justice. The pilot programs shall be operated in cooperation with other offices of the
Louisiana Department of Health, the Department of Children and Family Services,
and the Department of Public Safety and Corrections.
* * *
Section 14. R.S. 29:725.6(B)(6)(d)(i)(ff) and 766(G)(3) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§725.6. State Unified Command Group
* * *
B.
* * *
(6) Except as provided in Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph, only the UCG
may take official action. There shall be the following four permanent subcommittees
of the UCG and in addition, the UCG may establish other subcommittees as it deems
advisable and feasible:
* * *
(d)(i) A "long term recovery subcommittee" is hereby established and shall
be composed of the following members:
* * *
(ff) The secretary of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Works, or his designee.
* * *
§766. Declaration of a state of public health emergency
* * *
G. Providing for promulgation of rules and protocol for the evacuation or
Page 53 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
sheltering in place of nursing homes in the event of an oncoming hurricane.
* * *
(3) If a nursing home determines that it should evacuate and is unable to
proceed to its sheltering host site required under R.S. 40:2009.25, the nursing home
or the Louisiana Nursing Home Association shall notify the Louisiana Department
of Children and Family Services Health in its capacity as Emergency Support
Function 6 primary lead agency and request assistance in identifying available
shelter sites that best meet the needs of the resident. The state shall attempt to assist
the nursing home in locating shelter space to the best of its ability based on available
shelter space and in lieu thereof shall transmit the request to the Federal Emergency
Management Agency or its successor.
* * *
Section 15. R.S. 30:2351.53(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2351.53. Reporting of lead hazards at child-occupied facilities
A. The secretary shall notify the State Board of Elementary and Secondary
Education and the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health
that notification of lead hazards, lead abatement activities, or any lead testing
performed which exceeds applicable standards in any licensed day care center,
preschool, or public or non-public elementary school facility first placed into
operation after August 1, 2012, that qualifies as a child-occupied facility is required
by this Chapter.
* * *
Section 16. R.S. 33:9039.41(D)(1)(e) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§9039.41. Southwest Acadiana Parishes Rehabilitation District
* * *
D. Governance. (1) The affairs of the district shall be administered and
governed by a thirteen-member board of commissioners selected as follows: three
members appointed to represent the parish of Acadia, three members to represent the
Page 54 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
parish of Lafayette, three members to represent the parish of St. Landry, three
members to represent the parish of Vermilion and the secretary of the Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services Health.
* * *
(e) One member shall be the secretary of the Louisiana Department of
Children and Family Services Health.
* * *
Section 17. R.S. 36:3(7), 8.1(C)(8) and (20), 9(C), 108(B)(6), and 254(A)(12)(b) are
hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 36:258(N) and 308(E) are hereby enacted to read
as follows:
§3. Definitions
As used in this Title the following terms have the following meanings unless
the context clearly indicates otherwise:
* * *
(7) "Undersecretary" means the officer designated to direct and be
responsible for the functions of the office of management and finance of certain
departments. For the Department of Children and Family Services, "undersecretary"
means the officer designated to direct and be responsible for the functions of the
division of management and finance within the office of children and family
services.
* * *
§8.1. Litigation oversight; reports to the legislature
* * *
C. The provisions of this Section shall apply to any civil action filed by the
following departments or offices, including offices and agencies thereof, collectively
referred to in this Section as "agency":
* * *
(8) Louisiana Department of Health, including, but not limited to Medicaid
fraud and recovery cases, and excluding cases brought pursuant to the Children's
Page 55 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
Code and Title 46 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
* * *
(20) Louisiana Works, except cases involving recovery of unemployment
insurance payments and workers' compensation fraud and cases brought pursuant
to the Children's Code and Title 46 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
* * *
§9. Designation of certain organizational units; uniform terminology
* * *
C.(1) Each organizational unit which reports to the secretary, which is not an
agency and is not within an office, shall be in the executive office of the secretary
and shall be designated as follows:
(a)(1) A unit which reports directly to the secretary shall be designated as a
bureau.
(b)(2) A subunit of a bureau shall be designated as a section.
(c)(3) A subunit of a section shall be designated as a unit.
(2) For the Department of Children and Family Services, each organizational
unit which reports to the secretary, which is not an agency and is not within the
division of management and finance, the division of child welfare, or the division of
family support, shall be in the executive division, and shall be designated as follows:
(a) A unit which reports directly to the secretary shall be designated as a
bureau.
(b) A subunit of a bureau shall be designated as a section.
(c) A subunit of a section shall be designated as a unit.
* * *
§108. Offices; purposes and functions
* * *
B. The office of economic development shall perform the following functions
of the state:
* * *
Page 56 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
(6) It shall be responsible for job training assistance, including effective
cooperation with the training programs of Louisiana Works, the Department of
Education and the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education, the Board
of Regents, the Board of Supervisors of Community and Technical Colleges, the
Department of Children and Family Services, and the Department of Public Safety
and Corrections. The office shall also coordinate its training efforts with the
Louisiana Workforce Investment Council.
* * *
§254. Powers and duties of the secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health
A. In addition to the functions, powers, and duties otherwise vested in the
secretary by law, he shall:
* * *
(12)
* * *
(b) "Priority health care zone" means any parish or municipality listed as one
of the ten parishes or twenty-five municipalities with the highest rates of infant
mortality, teenage pregnancy, or substance abuse in Louisiana as of July first of any
given year according to statistics compiled by the Louisiana Department of Health
and the Department of Children and Family Services.
* * *
§258. Offices; purposes and functions
* * *
N. The office of child welfare shall provide for the public child welfare
functions of the state including but not limited to centralized intake; child
protective services; human trafficking programs; making permanent plans for
foster children and meeting their daily maintenance needs for food, shelter,
clothing, necessary physical medical services, school supplies, and incidental
personal needs; adoption placement services for foster children freed for
adoption; prevention services that promote, facilitate, and support activities to
Page 57 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
prevent child abuse and neglect, including but not limited to voluntary family
strengthening and support services; issuing and monitoring domestic violence
services contracts; and other programs as assigned by the secretary.
* * *
§308. Offices; purposes and functions
* * *
E. The office of child support shall provide for the administration of
child support programs pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act,
including but not limited to enforcing, collecting, and distributing support
obligations; establishing paternity; obtaining and modifying child and medical
support orders; and other programs as assigned by the secretary.
Section 18. R.S. 37:1021, 1023(A) and (B), 1024(B)(5), 1025(A)(2), and 1031(B)
are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1021. Applicability
This Part shall apply only to the office for citizens with developmental
disabilities and the office of aging and adult services of the Louisiana Department
of Health, to community homes for persons with developmental disabilities funded
through the Louisiana Department of Health, to intermediate care facilities for
people with developmental disabilities, and to in-home Medicaid home- and
community-based services. This Part shall apply to any program or agency
contracting for services with the Louisiana Department of Health or the Department
of Children and Family Services. Participation on the part of private providers that
contract with the Louisiana Department of Health or the Department of Children and
Family Services is strictly voluntary.
* * *
§1023. Drug administration course; certification of medication attendants; rules;
instructor training courses; fees
A. Drug administration courses shall be established by the office of the
secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health in conjunction with the Louisiana
Page 58 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
State Board of Nursing and the Louisiana State Board of Practical Nurse Examiners
and as approved by the secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health. Persons
who have successfully completed the course and passed a qualifying examination
shall be permitted to administer certain medications to residents of facilities operated
by the office for citizens with developmental disabilities or community homes for
persons with developmental disabilities funded through the Louisiana Department
of Health or the Department of Children and Family Services and to persons
receiving in-home Medicaid home- and community-based services and shall be
known as medication attendants. The course shall include but not be limited to
instruction of the legal aspects, roles, and responsibilities of drug administration,
definitions, terminology, classification, measurement, identification, effects,
distribution, and the care and handling of drugs.
B. Fees for the drug administration courses shall be determined by the office
of the secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health. The cost of implementation
will be reimbursed to providers with contracts by the Louisiana Department of
Health or the Department of Children and Family Services.
* * *
§1024. Authorized and prohibited functions of medication attendants
* * *
B. The prohibited functions of the medication attendant are:
* * *
(5) May not administer medication in an acute care unit funded or operated
by the Louisiana Department of Health and/or the Department of Children and
Family Services.
* * *
§1025. Qualifications of applicants to the drug administration course
A. Each person accepted to participate in the drug administration course shall
be:
* * *
Page 59 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
(2) Employed in a facility operated by the office for citizens with
developmental disabilities, in a community home for persons with developmental
disabilities funded through the Louisiana Department of Health or the Department
of Children and Family Services, or in an intermediate care facility for people with
developmental disabilities, or be a person who provides in-home Medicaid home-
and community-based services.
* * *
§1031. Applicability
* * *
B. As used in this Part, the term "residence" shall not include any
intermediate care facility for people with developmental disabilities, any nursing
home, or any other facility licensed by the Louisiana Department of Health or the
Department of Children and Family Services.
* * *
Section 19. R.S. 39:33(A)(2), 36(A)(3)(b)(ix)(dd), 100.181(A), 362(F), the
introductory paragraph of 1554(N)(1) and 1554(N)(3), and 1590(B)(4) are hereby amended
and reenacted to read as follows:
§33. Agency budget request; time of submission; standing committees
A.
* * *
(2) Except as limited, restricted, or otherwise prohibited by the Constitution
of Louisiana, simultaneously with budget units submitting their budget requests to
the governor, Louisiana Economic Development, the Department of Public Safety
and Corrections, the Department of Children and Family Services, Louisiana Works,
the Louisiana Department of Health, the Department of Education, the State Board
of Elementary and Secondary Education, the Board of Regents, and in the office of
the governor, the Department of Veterans Affairs and the Offices of Lifelong
Learning, Workforce Development, Elderly Affairs, and Women's Services shall
submit a copy of their workforce budget requests to the Louisiana Workforce
Page 60 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
Investment Council, as created in R.S. 23:2042, for the commission's review,
modification, and approval of funding to be incorporated into the executive budget.
* * *
§36. Contents and format of executive budget; supporting document
A. The executive budget shall present a complete financial and programmatic
plan for the ensuing year, and it shall be configured in a format so as to clearly
present and highlight the functions and operations of state government and the
financial requirements associated with those functions and operations. The executive
budget shall be a performance-based budget and as such may include key objectives
and key performance indicators. The commissioner of administration may designate
key objectives and key performance indicators to be included in the executive
budget. Additionally, the executive budget shall include at a minimum the following:
* * *
(3) Comparative statements for each department and budget unit by the
means of financing of the existing operating budget for a date certain to be
established by the budget office for the current fiscal year and recommended
expenditures for the ensuing fiscal year. All such comparative statements shall
include the following:
* * *
(b) Reports of all discretionary and nondiscretionary expenditures, or
estimates of discretionary or nondiscretionary expenditures, itemized by means of
finance, department, and functional area. As used in this Part, "nondiscretionary
expenditures" includes but is not limited to expenditures which must be funded
because of the following constitutional and other mandates:
* * *
(ix) Expenditures for unavoidable obligations:
* * *
(dd) Family preservation and children services provided by the Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services Health.
Page 61 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
* * *
§100.181. Continuum of Care Fund
A. There is hereby established in the state treasury as a special fund the
Continuum of Care Fund, hereafter referred to in this Section as the "fund". Monies
appropriated or transferred to the fund shall be deposited by the state treasurer after
compliance with the requirements of Article VII, Section 9(B) of the Constitution of
Louisiana relative to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund. Monies in the fund
shall be invested in the same manner as monies in the state general fund. Interest
earned on investment of monies in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Until
December 1, 2024, unexpended and unencumbered monies in the fund at the end of
the fiscal year shall remain in the fund. The treasurer is hereby authorized and
directed to transfer any unexpended and unencumbered monies in the fund on
December 1, 2024, and any interest attributable to such funds, to the Louisiana
Rescue Plan Fund. Monies in the fund shall be used by the Louisiana Department
of Children and Family Services Health to fund continuum of care initiatives.
* * *
§362. Policies for fleet vehicles; purchase of vehicles; specifications; exceptions
* * *
F. The commissioner of administration shall not promulgate rules or
regulations which require the Louisiana School for the Deaf, the Louisiana School
for the Visually Impaired, the Special School District, and any community and group
home and residential facilities administered by the Department of Children and
Family Services or the Louisiana Department of Health to have an inscription,
painting, stencil, or decal placed conspicuously on an automobile, truck, or other
vehicle with the name of the board, commission, department, agency, or subdivision
of the state to which the automobile, truck, or other vehicle belongs, if the vehicle
is used to transport students or clients.
* * *
§1554. Application of this Chapter
Page 62 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
* * *
N.(1) This Chapter shall not apply to those personal, professional, or social
services provided to the clients of the Louisiana Department of Health, the
Department of Children and Family Services, or the office of special education
services within the Department of Education, provided that the expense for these
special education services is five thousand dollars or less per child, corrections
services within the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, or the office of
juvenile justice within the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, in the
following circumstances:
* * *
(3) This Chapter shall not apply to the use of professional services of
physicians who provide consultative examinations regarding applicants for disability
benefits under the Social Security Act by the disability determinations services of the
Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health.
* * *
§1590. Reporting of certain professional, personal, consulting, and social services
contracts for Fiscal Year 2015-2016 through Fiscal Year 2017-2018
* * *
B. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, this Section shall
not apply to the following professional, personal, or consulting service contracts:
* * *
(4) Contracts of a district attorney necessary to perform any constitutional,
discretionary, or statutory function of the office, or to perform services under the
child support enforcement program administered by the Department of Children and
Family Services Louisiana Works in accordance with the federal requirements of
Title IV-D of the Social Security Act and corresponding state laws and regulations.
* * *
Section 20. R.S. 40:31.3(B)(2), 34.5(E), 41(N), 46.12(D) and (F), 79(A)(1) and
(C)(2), 600.91(A)(28)(b)(ii)(dd), 1061.14(B)(3)(b)(i), 1061.17(C)(1)(e), 1061.17.1(8),
Page 63 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
1061.21(A)(5)(c)(i) and (vi) and (E), and 1086.11 are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§31.3. Adolescent school health initiative; health centers in schools
* * *
B. The office of public health shall:
* * *
(2) Convene and participate in an intergovernmental coordinating council
which shall be composed of representatives from the departments of education,
children and family services, health, and other governmental entities or programs
related to health services to assist in implementation, oversight, and funding
assistance for health centers in schools.
* * *
§34.5. Original birth certificate; required contents; name of father
* * *
E. Nothing in this Section shall preclude the Department of Children and
Family Services Louisiana Works, office of children and family services, child
support enforcement section from obtaining an admission of paternity from the
biological father for submission in a judicial proceeding, or prohibit the issuance of
an order in a judicial proceeding which bases a legal finding of paternity on an
admission of paternity by the biological father and on any other additional showing
required by state law.
* * *
§41. Disclosure of records
* * *
N. The state registrar shall issue the following records to the office of child
welfare in the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health upon
the written request of an the office of the department:
(1) A certified copy of a birth certificate of a child placed in the custody of
the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health.
Page 64 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
(2) A certified copy of a death certificate of a child who was in the custody
of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health at the time of
his death.
(3) A certified copy of a death certificate of a parent of a child placed in the
custody of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health.
* * *
§46.12. Hospital-based paternity program
* * *
D. Hospital personnel shall forward an acknowledgment of paternity to the
state registrar who shall forward copies of same to the Department of Children and
Family Services Louisiana Works, office of children and family services, child
support enforcement section. A statewide database shall be maintained by the
Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works in accordance with
federal regulations.
* * *
F. The Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works,
office of children and family services, child support enforcement section shall
provide to all birthing hospitals in the state:
* * *
§79. Record of adoption decree
A.(1) Whenever a final decree of adoption shall be entered, the clerk of court
shall forward, on a form supplied by the Louisiana Department of Children and
Family Services Health, his certificate of the decree to the state registrar who shall
make a new certificate of live birth of the person adopted, in the new name if the
name has been changed in the decree.
* * *
C. A person born in a foreign country who is adopted in the state of
Louisiana, but who is not a United States citizen, or who is a naturalized United
States citizen, and a person born in a foreign country and adopted outside the United
Page 65 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
States by adoptive parents who are residents of the state of Louisiana at the time of
the adoption, may obtain a new birth certificate according to the following
conditions, limitations, and procedures:
* * *
(2) Where the certified copy of the original birth certificate of the adopted
person and certified translation are not available, the court having jurisdiction of
adoptions in the parish, upon evidence presented by the Louisiana Department of
Children and Family Services Health from information secured at the port of entry
or upon evidence from other reliable sources, may make findings on the date, place
of birth, and parentage of the adopted person. Upon receipt of a certified copy of
such findings of the court, together with a certified copy of the order or decree of
adoption, the state registrar shall prepare a birth certificate in the new name of the
adopted person and shall seal and file the certified copy of the findings of the court
and the certified copy of the order or decree of adoption.
* * *
§600.91. Powers and duties of the corporation
A. The corporation shall have the powers necessary or convenient to carry
out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this Chapter, including the
following powers in addition to all other powers granted by other provisions of this
Chapter:
* * *
(28)
* * *
(b)
* * *
(ii) The commission shall be comprised of the following members:
* * *
(dd) The secretary of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health, or his designee.
Page 66 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
* * *
§1061.14. Minors
* * *
B. The following provisions shall apply to all applications for court orders
by minors seeking abortions and appeals from denials of applications:
* * *
(3)
* * *
(b)(i) Prior to such ex parte hearing, the court may require the minor to
participate in an evaluation and counseling session with a mental health professional
from the Louisiana Department of Health, office of behavioral health, or a staff
member from the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health,
office of children and family services child welfare, or both. The court may refer the
petitioner, if necessary, to the appropriate Louisiana Department of Health, office of
behavioral health regional office to arrange the evaluation and counseling session
within the four- day period prior to the ex parte hearing, as provided in this
Paragraph. This referral may be made by the clerk upon the minor's filing the
application when the court has issued a standing order authorizing same and the
circumstances fit the criteria of the standing order therefor.
* * *
§1061.17. Woman's right to know
* * *
C. * * *
(1) The department shall cause to be published in English, within one
hundred twenty days after enactment of this Act, and shall update on an annual basis,
or as needed, the following easily comprehensible information on a stable internet
website that shall be developed and maintained by the department to inform the
public of the public and private agencies and services available to assist a woman
through pregnancy, upon childbirth, and while her child is dependent, including but
Page 67 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
not limited to the following information that shall indicate the agency's or service's
physical address, telephone number, and web address if available:
* * *
(e) Information on a separate and featured webpage created and maintained
by the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health linked on the
department's website, accessible by redirecting from the domain name
AdoptionOption.La.Gov, that lists public and private nonprofit adoption agencies
that are not affiliated with an abortion provider, along with easily comprehensible
first steps to aid a pregnant woman seeking to confidentially explore the option of
placing her child for adoption, and indicating whether the adoption agency allows
the woman to choose the adoptive parents.
* * *
§1061.17.1. Development of AdoptionOption.La.Gov website; task force
The legislature hereby establishes a task force within the Louisiana
Department of Health to advise the secretary of the department concerning the
preparation of the printed and internet materials provided for in R.S.
40:1061.17(C)(1)(e) and (D), and to develop public education initiatives to publicize
the information in a manner consistent with state law. The task force shall be
composed of the following members:
* * *
(8) The secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health or his designee, who
shall serve as a co-chairperson chairperson of the task force.
* * *
§1061.21. Reports
A. An individual abortion report for each abortion performed or induced shall
be completed by the attending physician. The report shall be confidential and shall
not contain the name or address of the woman. The report shall include all of the
following:
* * *
Page 68 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
(5)
* * *
(c) If the pregnant woman is a minor and the abortion was performed
pursuant to a judicial bypass order as provided for in R.S. 40:1061.14, the report
shall include all of the following:
(i) A notation indicating whether or not the minor was required to participate
in an evaluation and counseling session with a mental health professional from the
Louisiana Department of Health or a staff member from the Louisiana Department
of Children and Family Services Health as provided for in R.S. 40:1061.14(B)(3)(b).
* * *
(vi) A notation of whether or not the physician or any other staff member of
the abortion facility referred the woman to the Louisiana Department of Health or
the Department of Children and Family Services for any health services or other
human services.
* * *
E. The Louisiana Department of Health shall, on a quarterly basis, provide
to the Department of Children and Family Services and to the attorney general copies
of all abortion reports in which a minor pregnant woman under the age of thirteen
received an abortion.
* * *
§1086.11. Physician notification
A. If a newborn exhibits symptoms of withdrawal or other observable and
harmful effects in his physical appearance or functioning that a physician believes
are due to the use of a controlled dangerous substance, as defined by R.S. 40:961 et
seq., in a lawfully prescribed manner by the mother during pregnancy, the physician
shall make a notification to the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health on a form developed by the department. Such notification shall not
constitute a report of child abuse or prenatal neglect, nor shall it require prosecution
for any illegal action.
Page 69 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
B. A healthcare provider shall be authorized to share any protected health
information, as defined in 45 CFR 160.103, with the Louisiana Department of
Children and Family Services Health for the purpose of complying with the
notification requirement of this Subpart.
C. The Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health shall
promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure
Act to implement the provisions of this Subpart. Such rules shall include, at
minimum, all of the following:
(1) The manner in which the notification shall be made to the department.
(2) The form and minimum required contents of the notification.
(3) The plan to monitor the statewide system regarding the availability and
delivery of appropriate services for newborns and affected families and caretakers.
D. A physician who in good faith makes a notification to the Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services Health in compliance with this Section
shall have no civil or criminal liability for damage or injury arising from that
notification, unless the damage or injury was caused by the physician's willful or
wanton misconduct or gross negligence.
Section 21. R.S. 43:111(A)(8) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§111. Advertising; when prohibited and when authorized
A. The state, or any department, officer, board, or commission shall not
expend any public funds for advertising in any newspaper, book, pamphlet,
periodical, or radio and television stations except as follows:
* * *
(8) Advertising by the office of children and family services in the
Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Department of Health for
the recruitment of foster or adoptive parents.
* * *
Section 22. R.S. 44:38 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§38. Access to records involved in legislative studies
Page 70 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the custodian of records of the
Louisiana Department of Health Children and Family Services, office of children
and family services, and the custodian of records of each juvenile court or any court
which hears and decides juvenile matters shall grant access to a percentage, as
specified by the legislative committee, of the total records of defined classes of
children in state custody or in foster care to any committee of the legislature acting
pursuant to an appropriate legislative instrument directing the committee to study
procedures or outcomes of cases involving children in state custody or in foster care.
The size of the specific group to be studied shall be large enough to preserve the
anonymity of individual children. Such access shall be limited to that purpose, and
all information regarding names or other identifiers shall be removed. Information
pertaining to children who have been adopted shall be strictly confidential and shall
be released only in accordance with existing laws.
Section 23. R.S. 46:1(2), (4), and (6), 2(A) and (B), 16, the heading of Chapter 2 of
Title 46 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, the heading of Part I of Chapter 2 of Title
46 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, the introductory paragraph of 51, 51.3,
52.1(A), 54, 56(A), (B)(1) and (3), and (F)(4)(b), the introductory paragraph of 56(F)(9),
56(F)(9)(h), 59, 60, 107(A)(1) and (2), 114(A) and (B), the introductory paragraph of
114(C)(1), 114(C)(2), (D), and (E)(1), 114.2, 114.3(A) and (B), 116, 123(A)(2)(a)(vi),
230.1(A) and (B), 231(11) and (24), 231.4(A) and (D), 232(A), the introductory paragraph
of 233.1(C), the introductory paragraph of 233.1(D), 236, 236.1.1(3), (5), and (16),
236.1.4(C) and (E), 236.1.7(B), 236.1.8(D), 236.1.9(B), 236.1.12(C) and (F)(2), 236.3(A)(2)
and (G), the introductory paragraph of 236.5(A), 236.6(A)(1), (C), (E), and (G), 236.7(A)(1),
(B)(1), and (F), 236.8(A) and (G)(5) and (6), 236.9(B), (G), and (K), 236.10(A), (D), and
(E), 236.11(A), (B)(2), and (C), 236.12(B)(1), 236.13(A), 236.14(C), the introductory
paragraph of 236.14(D)(1), the introductory paragraph of 236.14(D)(2), (E)(2)(b), (G)(1) and
(2), and (J), 236.15(A)(1), 236.16, 237(A), (C)(5), and (E) through (G), 238(B) through (D),
the introductory paragraph of 238(E), 238(E)(7) and (F) through (H), 281, 282(A) through
(C), 283(A), (B), and (C)(1)(b), the introductory paragraph of 285(A), 285(B), (C), (E), (H),
Page 71 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
and (I), 286, 286.1(A), (B), (C)(1) and (3), the introductory paragraph of 286.1(D),
286.1(D)(2), (E)(2), (F), (G), and (J), the introductory paragraph of 286.2(A), 286.2(B),
286.12, the introductory paragraph of 286.13(3), 286.13(E), 286.16(B), 288.2(1) and (2),
352(1)(a), 356, 401, 441, 443, 444, 447, 447.3, 448, the introductory paragraph of 450(A),
450.1(A), 460.1, 460.5(A), 460.7(A) and (C), 460.8(A)(1) and (B), 460.10, 932(12),
972.1(A)(1), 1002(A), the introductory paragraph of 1002(B), 1002(C), 1251(B), 1259(B),
1352(1) and (2), 1353(D) and (G), 1402, 1403(3), 1404(B), 1414.1(A), 1425(C), the
introductory paragraph of 1427, 1428(B) through (D), 1430(A)(1) and (D)(2), 1442.1(2) and
(3), 1442.2(A) and (C), 1445.3(1) and (3), 1445.4, 1445.13(A), 1451(1) and (3),
1844(W)(1)(a), (3), and (5)(a) and (c), 1906.2, 2122, 2136.2(F), 2145(A), 2147(D),
2148(B)(1), the introductory paragraph of 2161(A), 2161(B) and (C), the introductory
paragraph of 2161.1(A), 2161.1(C), 2169.1(9), 2402(4), 2404(B)(1)(b), 2406(G), 2411(2),
2552, 2553, 2605(B)(11), 2605.1(B)(2) and (3), 2607(C)(1)(f), and 2758.2(A) are hereby
amended and reenacted and R.S. 46:107(E) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1. Definitions
As used in this Title, the following definitions shall apply:
* * *
(2) "Department" means the Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works or the Louisiana Department of Health.
* * *
(4) "Parish or district office" means parish or district office of the Department
of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works or the Louisiana Department of
Health.
* * *
(6) "Secretary" means the secretary of the Department of Children and
Family Services Louisiana Works or the Louisiana Department of Health.
* * *
§2. Administration of oaths
A. Employees of the office of children and family services of the Louisiana
Page 72 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
Department of Children and Family Services Health and employees of the parish or
district offices of the department, including the New Orleans Department of Health,
may administer oaths and pass authentic acts in connection with any documents
relative to relief or assistance now or to be furnished by the state or any political
subdivision under the provisions of this Title or the provisions of the Social Security
Act, as either may be amended.
B. Employees of the office of children and family services of the Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services Health and employees of the parish or
district offices of the department may administer oaths and pass authentic acts,
except acts of voluntary surrender under R.S. 9:402, in connection with any
documents relative to services now or to be furnished by the state or any political
subdivision, either directly or through contractual agreement, under the provisions
of this Title or the provisions of the Social Security Act.
* * *
§16. Sale or lease of state-owned facilities; procedure
In the event that any state facility owned or operated by the Department of
Children and Family Services, the Louisiana Department of Health, or the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections should permanently cease operations
or should permanently vacate the premises of one facility and move to the premises
of another facility, the secretary of the appropriate department is hereby authorized
to sell or lease to the highest bidder the property, buildings, and all other
appurtenances of the state-owned facility which has been permanently closed or
vacated. The respective secretary shall, when the facilities are offered for sale or
lease, follow those procedures set forth in R.S. 41:131 et seq. relative to the sale of
public land or R.S. 41:1211 et seq. relative to the lease of public land; provided
however, the Joint Natural Resources Oversight Committee approves the proposed
sale or lease.
* * *
CHAPTER 2. LOUISIANA DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN AND
Page 73 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
FAMILY SERVICES HEALTH
PART I. ORGANIZATION PUBLIC ASSISTANCE
§51. Duties of the department
The Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health, through
its secretary, shall administer the public assistance and welfare laws of the state as
follows:
* * *
§51.3. Criminal history information; access to federal tax information
The Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works, office
of child support enforcement and family support, is authorized to perform criminal
history records checks of current and prospective employees, contractors, and
subcontractors in accordance with the procedures provided in R.S. 15:587.5.
Pursuant to this authorization and to implement the requirements of R.S. 15:587.5,
the secretary shall promulgate rules and regulations with regard to this matter.
* * *
§52.1. Integrated case management; service integration of various social service
programs
A. The legislature recognizes that the Louisiana Department of Health,
Department of Children and Family Services, and Louisiana Works provide services
to individuals with multiple needs. However, the conventional service delivery
system of requiring individuals to access various offices within the state to address
those multiple needs creates barriers to the delivery of those services and entry into
the workforce. These needs can be better met, more efficiently and less costly,
through integrated case management at a single service location with a single case
worker. It is the intent of the legislature to streamline the delivery of services and
incorporate integrated case management models for clients and families served by
multiple departments and programs.
* * *
§54. Parish offices
Page 74 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
A. There shall be in each parish of the state a parish office of the department;
provided that the department may unite two or more parishes and form a district
office. All duties and responsibilities set forth in this Chapter for parish offices shall
also apply to the district offices.
B. Under rules and regulations of the department, the field and district
offices shall administer all forms of public assistance within the department's
purview in respective parishes.
* * *
§56. Applications and client case records; definitions; confidentiality; waiver;
penalty
A. Applications for assistance and information contained in case records of
clients of the Louisiana Department of Health, the Department of Children and
Family Services Louisiana Works, or the office of elderly affairs, for the purpose
of adult protective services, shall be confidential and, except as otherwise provided,
it shall be unlawful for any person to solicit, disclose, receive, make use of, or to
authorize, knowingly permit, participate in, or acquiesce in the use of applications
or client case records or the information contained therein for any purpose not
directly connected with the administration of the programs of the department.
B.(1) For the purposes of this Section, "department" means the Louisiana
Department of Health, the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana
Works, and the adult protection agency as provided in R.S. 15:1503. It is the express
intent of this Section that the Louisiana Department of Health, the Department of
Children and Family Services, and, for the purpose of adult protective services, the
office of elderly affairs share access to each other's case records to the extent that
such access is not prohibited by any contrary provision of federal law or regulation.
* * *
(3) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, including but not
limited to the provisions of this Section, all offices, bureaus, and agencies within the
Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health are hereby expressly
Page 75 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
authorized to share access to each other's case records as necessary for the
administration of their respective programs, except as prohibited by federal law or
regulation.
* * *
F. The following information shall not be subject to waiver and shall not be
released to applicants, recipients, or outside sources, except those outside sources
engaged in the administration of the programs of the department or when specifically
authorized by law:
* * *
(4)
* * *
(b) In addition, the department may release information to other agencies of
state government that are engaged in rendering services or treatment to a department
recipient or former recipient. The agency receiving the information from the
department under this Paragraph shall be bound by the same confidentiality standard
as prescribed in this Section with regard to release of this information to the
recipient, the client's legal representative, or an outside source. The Louisiana
Department of Health, the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana
Works, and, for the purpose of adult protective services, the office of elderly affairs
may release information to each other for the purpose of furthering services or
treatment to clients or recipients of services of either department. Information subject
to release pursuant to this Section that is covered by federal statutes or regulations
restricting release of the information shall be released only in accordance with the
federal statutes or regulations.
* * *
(9) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, limited public
disclosure of summary information contained in the child abuse or neglect records
of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health may be made
as follows:
Page 76 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
* * *
(h) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection B of this Section,
references in this Paragraph to the term "department" shall only mean the Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services Health.
* * *
§59. Welfare demonstration, experimental and other projects
The Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works and the
Louisiana Department of Health are authorized to make use of staff and equipment
to carry out experimental and demonstration projects whose costs are otherwise
totally financed by the federal government under the provisions of the Social
Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1315) or any other programs totally financed from federal
funds.
§60. Educational leaves with pay; federal funds
The secretary of the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana
Works and Louisiana Department of Health may grant educational leave with pay
to an employee of the department in compliance with federal administrative rules
and federal laws that allow federal matching funds to be used in further educating
employees of the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works
and Louisiana Department of Health in the various states.
* * *
§107. Appeal and review; venue for judicial review
A.(1) The Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works
and the office of the secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health, through their
respective appeal sections, shall provide for a system of hearings and are responsible
for fulfillment of all hearing provisions as prescribed under Title I, IV-A, X, XIV,
XVI, XIX, or XX of the Social Security Act and under the Food Stamp Act, Public
Law 91-671. Under these provisions, an opportunity for a hearing shall be granted
at the state level to any applicant, or recipient, or customer who makes a timely
request for a hearing because his claim for assistance, services, or nutrition
Page 77 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
assistance benefits is denied or is not acted upon with reasonable promptness and to
any recipient who is aggrieved by an agency action resulting in suspension,
reduction, discontinuance, or termination of benefits.
(2) Under these provisions, an opportunity for a hearing shall also be granted
at the state level by the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services
Health to any child placing agency or day care center who is aggrieved by any
agency action resulting in the denial, suspension, or revocation of a license.
* * *
E. For purposes of this Section, "customer" means an applicant or
recipient of public assistance benefits and services that fall within the purview
of Louisiana Works.
* * *
§114. Fraud in obtaining assistance; withholding information concerning property,
income or beneficiary, or personal circumstances
A. No person shall obtain or attempt to obtain assistance from the
Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works or the Louisiana
Department of Health by means of any false statement, misrepresentation, or other
fraudulent device. If during the life, or upon the death, of any person who is
receiving or has received assistance it is found that the recipient is receiving or has
received assistance through misrepresentation, nondisclosure of material facts, or
other fraudulent device, the amount of assistance, without interest, shall be
recoverable from him or his estate as a debt due the state by court action.
B. If at any time during the continuance of public assistance to any person,
the recipient thereof, or the husband or wife of the recipient with whom he or she is
living, is possessed or becomes possessed of any property or income in excess of the
amount declared at the time of application or reinvestigation of his case and in such
amount as would affect his needs or right to receive assistance, it shall be the duty
of the recipient, or the husband or wife of the recipient, to notify the Department of
Children and Family Services Louisiana Works or the Louisiana Department of
Page 78 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
Health of possession of such property or income, and the department shall, after
investigation, either cancel the assistance or alter the amount thereof in accordance
with the circumstances, provided, that such investigation shows that such property
or income does affect the need of the recipient or his right to receive assistance. If
during the life, or upon the death, of any person who is receiving or has received
assistance it is found that the recipient or his spouse was possessed of any property
or income in excess of the amount reported that would affect his need or right to
receive assistance, any assistance paid when the recipient or his spouse was in
possession of such undeclared property or income shall be recoverable, without
interest, from him or his estate as a debt due the state by court action. The possession
of undeclared property by a recipient or his spouse with whom he is living shall be
prima facie evidence of its ownership during the time assistance was granted, and the
burden to prove otherwise shall be upon the recipient or his legal representative.
C.(1) If the personal circumstances of the recipient change at any time during
the continuance of assistance, he shall immediately notify the Department of
Children and Family Services Louisiana Works or the Louisiana Department of
Health of the change. Personal circumstances shall include:
* * *
(2) If during the life, or upon the death, of any person who is receiving
assistance it is found that the recipient has received or is receiving assistance of a
greater amount than he is entitled to receive as a result of his failure to notify the
Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works or the Louisiana
Department of Health of a change of personal circumstances as set forth in this
Subsection, any assistance paid during the time that the recipient was receiving
assistance of a greater amount than he was entitled to receive as a result of his failure
to notify the department shall be recoverable, with legal interest, from him or his
estate as a debt due the state by court action.
D. The federal government shall be entitled to share in any amount recovered
under the provisions of this Section; however, the amount recovered by the federal
Page 79 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
government shall not exceed the amount contributed by the federal government in
each case. The amount due the United States shall be promptly paid or credited upon
collection to the designated agency of the federal government by the Department of
Children and Family Services Louisiana Works or the Louisiana Department of
Health.
E.(1) Persons receiving food stamps or Aid to Families with Dependent
Children, or a successor of either program, who have been determined by the
Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works or the Louisiana
Department of Health in an administrative hearing, or a court of competent
jurisdiction after final appeal, to have fraudulently obtained such food stamps or Aid
to Families with Dependent Children, or benefits or assistance from a successor of
either program, shall be ineligible for further participation in the program in
accordance with the following schedule:
* * *
§114.2. Attempting or aiding to obtain assistance fraudulently; penalties
Any person who obtains or attempts to obtain or aids and abets anyone to
obtain assistance from the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana
Works or the Louisiana Department of Health by means of any false statement,
misrepresentation, or other fraudulent device or violates the provisions of R.S.
46:114 shall be guilty of theft as provided by R.S. 14:67.
§114.3. Regional fraud detection units; investigative subpoenas and subpoenas
duces tecum
A. The Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works shall
establish, maintain, and provide for fraud detection functions in order to detect fraud
in obtaining public assistance through staff in each region of the state. Each fraud
detection unit shall report each incident of public assistance fraud to the fraud
detection section of the office of children and family services on a monthly basis by
the tenth day of each succeeding month. An annual report of the activities of all fraud
detection units within a state fiscal year shall be submitted by the fraud detection
Page 80 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
section to the Senate and House committees on health and welfare by September
first.
B. When the secretary of the Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works or the secretary's designated representative has evidence that any
person, business, or other legal entity attempted to obtain or obtained assistance or
payment for services or goods from the department by means of any false statement,
misrepresentation, or other fraudulent device, the secretary or the designated
representative may issue an administrative investigation subpoena for deposition
testimony or a subpoena duces tecum to be served upon any person, business, or
other legal entity who is believed to have information, material, or physical evidence
relative to the alleged or suspected violation, for the purpose of producing, revealing,
identifying, or explaining documentary material or other physical evidence. Such
deposition or return of subpoena shall take place in the parish in which the person,
business, or other legal entity upon whom the subpoena has been served resides or
conducts business. The subpoena shall be served by certified mail, return receipt
requested, or by any other means authorized by the Code of Civil Procedure or the
Code of Criminal Procedure for the service of process. The subpoena shall specify
a return date indicating the date by which deposition testimony or information,
material, or physical evidence must be received by the department.
* * *
§116. Prima facie proof of pleadings
Pleadings filed on behalf of the Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works or the Louisiana Department of Health in actions to recover the
value of ineligible public financial assistance payments or benefits shall be
accompanied by an itemized statement of the amount of overissuance or
overpayment together with the amount to which the recipient was entitled, if any.
When accompanied by an affidavit of the assistant secretary of the office
administering such payments or benefits to the correctness thereof as to the truth of
the facts alleged to the best of the affiant's knowledge and belief, such itemized
Page 81 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
statement shall be accepted as prima facie proof of the disbursement and receipt of
said payments and the amount thereof.
* * *
§123. Louisiana Military Family Assistance Board
A.
* * *
(2)(a) The board shall be composed of the following:
* * *
(vi) The secretary of the Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works, or designee.
* * *
§230.1. Legislative intent
A. It is the intent of the legislature that families in Louisiana be strong and
economically self-reliant so as to minimize their dependence on government benefits
for basic needs. To accomplish this goal, it is the intent of this Part that the
Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works ensures that all cash
assistance recipients, with the exception of persons with disabilities or who are
incapacitated, are actively and universally engaged in meaningful activities designed
to enable their transition from cash assistance to self-reliance. It is the further intent
that cash assistance participants demonstrate and are expected to exercise active and
diligent personal responsibility in achieving self-reliance through employment and
increased workplace literacy. All appropriate state agencies responsible for
employment, training, and educating Louisiana's citizens are expected to cooperate
in the pursuit of this goal.
B. The Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works shall
submit written reports on the status of implementation of these provisions to the
Performance Review Subcommittee of the Joint Legislative Committee on the
Budget in March, 2004 and September, 2004, and thereafter, annually at the same
time as the mid-year performance progress report is submitted as provided in R.S.
Page 82 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
39:87.3(A)(2). Such written reports shall include but not be limited to data providing
performance measures assessing the success of performance-based agreements, job
readiness, workplace literacy, job development services, and such additional data as
may be determined by the committee.
* * *
§231. Aid to needy families; definitions
As used in this Subpart, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
* * *
(11) "Department" means the Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works.
* * *
(24) "Secretary" means the secretary of the Department of Children and
Family Services Louisiana Works.
* * *
§231.4. Immunization compliance; exceptions
A. The secretary of the Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works and the secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health shall
require each recipient or customer of public assistance of the programs described
herein or his parent or guardian to present to the appropriate local agency issuing the
public assistance sufficient evidence of immunity or immunization against vaccine-
preventable diseases according to a schedule promulgated by rule by the office of
public health of the Louisiana Department of Health. Sufficient evidence that such
an immunization program is in progress may be substituted for proof of immunity
or immunization.
* * *
D. The Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works and
the Louisiana Department of Health shall promulgate rules and regulations in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions of
this Section for programs under the particular department's jurisdiction. The office
Page 83 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
of public health shall develop and promulgate by rule the immunization schedule
required herein.
* * *
§232. Investigations and reports
A. If any person has knowledge that any dependent child is dependent upon
the public for support, or that the interest of the public requires that the child be
granted aid, the person may bring the fact to the notice of the parish office of the
Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health of the parish in
which the child resides, which department shall make an investigation and
examination of the circumstances of the child before the granting of aid.
* * *
§233.1. Recovery of overpayments
* * *
C. The department Louisiana Works shall promptly take all necessary steps
to correct any overpayment, including collection, or underpayment of child support
to individuals to whom the department is providing services pursuant to R.S.
46:236.1.1 et seq., and, in the case of:
* * *
D. The department Department of Education will promptly take all
necessary steps to correct any overpayment, including collection, or underpayment
of child care assistance provided under the Child Care and Development Block Grant
and in the case of:
* * *
§236. Administration of emergency assistance to needy families with children
In order to extend and improve services, aid, and care to needy children and
needy families with children in this state, and in order to take full advantage of
existing federally funded programs on a matched basis, the Department of Children
and Family Services Louisiana Works shall be the agency of the state of Louisiana
to cooperate with the United States and to administer Title IV-A, Sections 403 and
Page 84 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
406 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 603 and 606) or any amendments thereto,
relating to emergency assistance to needy families with children, and to receive and
expend federal moneys for these services.
* * *
§236.1.1. Family and child support programs; definitions
For the purposes of this Subpart, the following items shall mean:
* * *
(3) "CSE administrator" means the program executive director of the office
of child support enforcement section, division of family support, office of children
and family services, Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works.
* * *
(5) "Department" means the Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works.
* * *
(16) "Support services" and "support enforcement services" means any action
taken by the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works, upon
receipt of an application or referral for services or a request made under the Uniform
Interstate Family Support Act, in accordance with the federal requirements of Title
IV-D of the Social Security Act and corresponding state laws and regulations without
regard to whether there is any existing court order, delinquency, or presumption of
paternity.
* * *
§236.1.4. Family and child support programs; financial institution duties;
responsibilities
* * *
C. The Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works may
pay a reasonable reimbursement fee to a financial institution for conducting the data
match, not to exceed the actual costs incurred by such financial institution. The
reimbursement fee may be paid quarterly or annually at the end of the state fiscal
Page 85 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
year upon request of any financial institution.
* * *
E. The office of children and family services, child support enforcement
section, which obtains data match information on an individual from a financial
institution pursuant to this Subpart may disclose such data match information only
for the purpose of, and to the extent necessary in, establishing, modifying, or
enforcing a child support obligation of such individual.
* * *
§236.1.7. Family and child support programs; liability
* * *
B. Any attorney initiating legal proceedings pursuant to this Subpart and
Titles IV-D and IV-A of the Social Security Act shall represent the state of
Louisiana, Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works
exclusively. An attorney-client relationship shall not exist between the attorney and
any applicant or recipient of child support enforcement services for and on behalf of
a child or children, without regard to the name in which legal proceedings are
initiated. In those cases in which the Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works is providing child support services, the attorney representing the
department shall not represent any party in matters involving custody or visitation.
The provisions of this Subsection shall apply to a staff attorney in the child support
enforcement section of the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana
Works, district attorney, or contract attorney providing support services pursuant to
Title IV-D.
* * *
§236.1.8. Family and child support programs; additional authorized employee
actions
* * *
D. The support services authorized by this Subpart shall be provided by the
office of children and family services, child support enforcement section. Field
Page 86 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
officers responsible for supplying these services shall be designated by the secretary.
Such officers shall have the power and authority to make arrests, supervise the
probation of offenders, serve notices, orders, subpoenas, summonses, citations,
motions, and writs, and to execute all warrants and orders and to perform any other
duties incident to their office. All such officers are hereby authorized to carry
weapons and arms, concealed or openly, while in the actual performance of any duty
or while under assignment to any duty, but under no circumstances shall officers be
authorized to carry weapons unless they have been trained in the proper carrying and
use of firearms by a recognized firearm training program.
* * *
§236.1.9. Family and child support programs; duties; courts; agencies; party status
* * *
B. Any court that collects child support pursuant to state laws and regulations
shall forward that portion of the collections due to the Department of Children and
Family Services Louisiana Works within two days of receipt.
* * *
§236.1.12. Transfer of child support obligation to third party
* * *
C. When the current caretaker applies for support enforcement services
pursuant to R.S. 46:236.1.2, the caretaker shall execute an affidavit stating that the
minor child resides with him. The affidavit shall contain the following information
in substantially the following form:
AFFIDAVIT OF CHILD(REN)'S PHYSICAL
PRESENCE IN THE CARETAKER'S HOME
AFFIDAVIT
I, ____________________________________ , the undersigned affiant
Name of the Affiant
do hereby certify and affirm that I am the caretaker of the minor child(ren) named below;
That I am the applicant/recipient of support enforcement services on behalf of the minor
Page 87 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
child(ren) whose name(s) appear(s) below;
That I have requested that the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana
Works, Child Support Enforcement (DCFS, CSE) secure a court order to authorize the child
support payments that are due and payable by the obligor and/or the obligee on behalf of the
minor child(ren) whose name(s) appear(s) below to be redirected to me, the affiant, on behalf
of the minor child(ren);
That I do hereby further certify and affirm that the minor child(ren) whose name(s) appear(s)
below have been physically residing with me in my residence since ___________________,
__________, located in the parish/county of ____________________, state of
_________________.
Name(s) of Children Date of Birth















I solemnly swear or affirm that the foregoing statements are true and correct to the best of
my knowledge and belief.
________________________
SIGNATURE OF AFFIANT
________________________
PRINT NAME OF AFFIANT
SUBSCRIBED AND SWORN TO BEFORE ME ON THIS _________ DAY OF
Page 88 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
__________________ AT __________________, LOUISIANA
______________________________________________
PRINT NAME OF ATTORNEY OR NOTARY PUBLIC
_____________________________________________
SIGNATURE OF ATTORNEY OR NOTARY PUBLIC
___________________________________________________
NOTARY NUMBER OF NOTARY PUBLIC OR BAR ROLL
NUMBER OF ATTORNEY
MY COMMISSION EXPIRES:__________________
* * *
F.
* * *
(2) The ex parte motion shall also include an affidavit executed by an
authorized representative of the department. The affidavit shall contain the following
information in substantially the following form:
AFFIDAVIT OF RECEIPT OF SERVICE AND NOTICE
AFFIDAVIT
I, _____________________________________________, an authorized
Name of the Affiant
representative of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services, Child Support
Enforcement Health hereby certify and affirm:
That support enforcement services are being furnished to _____________.
Caretaker
The following efforts have been made to give the obligor reasonable notice of the
department's intent to redirect child support payments to the current caretaker. The obligor
has not notified the department that (s)he objects to the redirection of support payments.
Date of Action Action Taken



Page 89 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265





The following efforts have been made to give the obligee reasonable notice of the
department's intent to redirect child support payments to the current caretaker. The obligee
has not notified the department that (s)he objects to the redirection of support payments.
Date of Action Action Taken







I solemnly swear or affirm that the foregoing statements are true and correct to the best of
my knowledge and belief.
________________________
SIGNATURE OF AFFIANT
________________________
PRINT NAME OF AFFIANT
SUBSCRIBED AND SWORN TO BEFORE ME ON THIS ________DAY OF
_____________ AT __________________, LOUISIANA
_______________________________________________
PRINT NAME OF ATTORNEY OR NOTARY PUBLIC
______________________________________________
SIGNATURE OF ATTORNEY OR NOTARY PUBLIC
___________________________________________________
NOTARY NUMBER OF NOTARY PUBLIC OR BAR ROLL
NUMBER OF ATTORNEY
Page 90 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
MY COMMISSION EXPIRES:______________________________
* * *
§236.3. Enforcement of support by income assignment
A. For purposes of this Section, the following words have the meaning
ascribed to them by this Section unless the context clearly indicates a different
meaning:
* * *
(2) "Department" means the Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works, office of children and family services, child support enforcement
section.
* * *
G. Any person whose income is assigned under the provisions of this Section
shall advise the court of any change in his employment during the effective period
of assignment and shall advise the court of the name and address of any new payor
of any singular or periodic payment of income. The information required herein shall
be filed with the clerk of court on a form which shall be developed and distributed
by the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works. The payor
of a person whose income is assigned under the provisions of this Section shall
inform the assignee in writing within ten days when the obligor terminates
employment or the payment of income terminates and provide the obligor's last
known address and the name and address of the obligor's new employer, if known.
Any person who violates the provisions of this Subsection may be found guilty of
contempt of court.
* * *
§236.5. Expedited process for establishment of paternity and establishment or
enforcement of support; hearing officers
A. All actions to establish paternity or to establish or enforce a support
obligation which are brought by the Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works, hereafter called "the department", on its own behalf or on behalf
Page 91 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
of any person for whom support has been ordered and whose support rights have
been assigned to the department or for whom the department is providing support
enforcement services, must be completed, from the time of service of process of the
action to the time of disposition, within the following time frames:
* * *
§236.6. Failure to pay support; procedure, penalties and publication
A.(1) If a defendant violates the terms of a court order, issued pursuant to the
provisions of R.S. 46:236.1.1 et seq. and 236.2, Children's Code Article 1301.1 et
seq., or R.S. 13:4241, requiring him to pay child support to the Department of
Children and Family Services Louisiana Works, a representative of the child
support collection agency as set forth in R.S. 46:236.1.8 may issue and serve on the
defendant a summons ordering him to appear and show cause before the proper court
of competent jurisdiction, on a date which shall be specified by the court, why he
should not be held in contempt of court. Prior to or at the hearing, the Department
of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works or the district attorney shall file
with the court any summons served and a rule for contempt which shall be served in
open court on the defendant, setting forth the terms of the original court order for
child support and all modifications thereof, along with the allegations purporting to
place the defendant in contempt. If the defendant denies the allegations or offers a
defense to the rule, the court may, upon motion of either party or on its own motion,
continue the hearing.
* * *
C. In addition to any other penalty provided for in this Section, the court shall
render judgment in favor of the applicable payee for the amount of unpaid support
plus attendant court costs. The judgment shall have the same force and effect as a
final judgment for money damages against the defendant. This judgment shall
become executory upon its rendition, subject to the delays for filing a motion for new
trial or appeal, and may be registered with any Louisiana court of competent
jurisdiction on petition of the Department of Children and Family Services
Page 92 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
Louisiana Works, the district attorney's office, or the applicable payee.
* * *
E. The termination of a court order issued pursuant to the provisions of R.S.
46:236.1.1 et seq. and 236.2, Children's Code Article 1301.1 et seq., or R.S. 13:4241,
requiring a defendant to pay child support to the Department of Children and Family
Services Louisiana Works does not abate the power of any court or the department
to collect any overdue and unpaid support or arrearage owed under the terminated
support order or the power of the court to punish any person for a failure to comply
with, or to pay any support as ordered in, the terminated court order.
* * *
G.(1) Upon request of any representative of a newspaper and to the extent
permitted by federal law, the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana
Works shall supply a list of names and addresses of all persons who have been
found guilty of criminal neglect of family as provided in R.S. 14:74 et seq. or who
have been found in contempt of court for failure to comply with a support order
enforced by the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works. The
newspaper may publish such a list or any part of this list it considers necessary.
(2) The Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works may
adopt rules governing the publication of the names of persons who are delinquent in
the payment of child support obligations under orders which are enforced by the
department and the publication of information which is related to those delinquent
payments. The rules shall be adopted in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act and shall establish the criteria for the selection of the individuals
whose names may be published, the criteria for the determination of the types and
amount of related information which may be published, and the criteria for the
determination of the types of media and individual media outlets in which the names
and related information may be published. The department may publish the names
and related information at the expense of the department or may release the names
and related information for publication on a public service basis.
Page 93 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
* * *
§236.7. Order of support; stipulation by district attorney and party
A.(1) In cases in which the responsible parent or other person owes a duty of
support to a spouse or minor child, the responsible parent or other person owing such
duty and the district attorney may stipulate to an order of support. The juvenile and
family courts of this state shall have the power to issue an order of support under the
provisions of this Section. This order shall be considered a civil order of support
enforceable in the juvenile or family court of this state which rendered the order.
This order may be registered in other family or juvenile courts of this state pursuant
to the provisions of Children's Code Article 1301.3 et seq. This support shall be
ordered payable to the spouse, to the tutor or custodian of the child, to the court-
approved fiduciary of the spouse or child, or to the Department of Children and
Family Services Louisiana Works in a FITAP case or in a non-FITAP case in which
the department is rendering services, whichever is applicable; hereinafter, said payee
shall be referred to as the "applicable payee". The amount of support as set by the
court may be increased or decreased as the circumstances may require.
* * *
B.(1) If a defendant violates the terms of a court order issued pursuant to the
provisions of this Section requiring him to pay child support to the Department of
Children and Family Services Louisiana Works, a representative of the child
support collection agency as set forth in R.S. 46:236.1.1 et seq. may issue and serve
on the defendant a summons ordering him to appear and show cause before the
proper court of competent jurisdiction, on a date which shall be specified by the
court, why he should not be held in constructive contempt of court. Prior to or at the
hearing, the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works or the
district attorney shall file with the court any summons served and a rule for contempt
which shall be served in open court on the defendant, setting forth the terms of the
original court order for child support and all modifications thereof, along with the
grounds for contempt. If the defendant denies the allegations or offers a defense to
Page 94 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
the rule, the court may, upon motion of either party or on its own motion, continue
the hearing.
* * *
F. The termination of a court order issued pursuant to the provisions of R.S.
46:236.1.1 et seq. and 236.2, Children's Code Article 1301.1 et seq., or R.S. 13:4241,
requiring a defendant to pay child support to the Department of Children and Family
Services Louisiana Works does not abate the power of any court or the department
to collect any overdue and unpaid support or arrearage owed under the terminated
support order or the power of the court to punish any person for a failure to comply
with, or to pay any support as ordered in, the terminated court order.
* * *
§236.8. Medical support orders; health insurance enforcement
A. When a court orders a parent to provide medical support for the child,
specifically requiring the parent to enroll or maintain the child in a health insurance
program, the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works, in any
case in which the department is rendering services, shall enforce the court order
through the use of the National Medical Support Notice, regarding group health
plans that are covered under the provisions of 42 U.S.C. §666(a)(19), 29 U.S.C.
§1169, and 45 CFR §303.32, and shall serve on the parent's employer the National
Medical Support Notice to enroll the child and employee in the employee's health
insurance program in accordance with the medical support order.
* * *
G. When a court orders a parent who is a participant or is eligible to
participate in a group health plan to enroll or maintain a minor child in a health
insurance program, the insurance company or health maintenance organization shall:
* * *
(5) Allow the provider, or the Louisiana Department of Health for the
Medicaid Plan, or the Department of Children and Family Services to submit claims
for covered services without the approval of the custodial or the noncustodial parent.
Page 95 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
(6) Reimburse the parent who rendered payment for services for the child, the
provider, or the Louisiana Department of Health for the Medicaid Plan, or the
Department of Children and Family Services directly for claims submitted by them.
* * *
§236.9. Collection of child support; cooperative program
* * *
B. When a delinquency is referred to the Department of Revenue, hereinafter
referred to in this Section as the "department", pursuant to the provisions of this
Section, the amount of child support due, and any accrued interest and costs shall be
collected from the obligated parent by the department in any manner authorized by
law, and as specifically provided in Part III of Chapter 18 of Subtitle II of Title 47
of the Louisiana Revised Statutes. All funds generated from the collection efforts
shall be remitted periodically to the Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works for distribution as provided by law for collected child support
payments. However, the department shall be entitled to any allowable federal
reimbursement, and to fifty percent of any fees or payments that would ordinarily be
due to the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works for the
collection made, except for incentives.
* * *
G. In the event the collection action would cause undue hardship to the
obligated parent, would threaten the health or welfare of his family, or would cause
irreparable loss, the obligated parent may so notify the secretary. In such case, the
secretary may, in his discretion, refer the receipt of such information to the secretary
of the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works, who shall
determine whether to halt the department's collection procedures.
* * *
K. The Department of Revenue and the Department of Children and Family
Services Louisiana Works are hereby authorized to promulgate rules and
regulations as may be necessary to effectuate the provisions of this Section, and to
Page 96 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
enter into interagency agreements as necessary.
§236.10. State case registry of child support orders
A. The secretary of the Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works shall create an automated state case registry of child support
orders within the office of children and family services, child support enforcement
section.
* * *
D. Clerks of court in the state's judicial districts shall provide the required
information to the child support enforcement section for use in developing the state
case registry. The court shall require the parties, or the attorneys representing the
parties, to provide the required information to the clerks of court. The Department
of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works shall enter into cooperative
agreements with clerks of court to provide for reimbursement of the actual costs of
collecting and transmitting the information required by this Section.
E. The Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works shall
develop and distribute the forms which shall be used to obtain the information. Such
forms shall contain, at a minimum, the data elements identified by the secretary of
the United States Department of Health and Human Services.
* * *
§236.11. Louisiana disbursement unit for child support payments
A. The secretary of the Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works shall create a state disbursement unit for collection and
disbursement of child support.
B.
* * *
(2) The provisions of this Section shall apply to child support payments made
through any court. Any such court may enter into a cooperative agreement with the
secretary of the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works to
authorize the department to collect those support payments and administrative costs
Page 97 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
collected and distributed by the court pursuant to R.S. 46:236.5(B). The department
may retain an amount equal to the actual costs incurred in collecting and distributing
the child support, including administrative costs. However, such amount shall not
exceed one percent of the total amount collected for the court. The department shall
distribute such amounts collected pursuant to this Subsection in accordance with
federal regulations.
* * *
C. The Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works
support enforcement program, office of children and family services child support,
shall administer the state disbursement unit. The support enforcement program may
contract for the provision of these services in accordance with the applicable
provisions of Chapter 17 of Subtitle III of Title 39 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes
of 1950 and the Louisiana Procurement Code.
* * *
§236.12. Plan for parental participation of support; required work activities
* * *
B. For purposes of this Section:
(1) "Department" means the child support enforcement section, office of
children and family services child support, Department of Children and Family
Services Louisiana Works.
* * *
§236.13. Privilege on proceeds collected from third party in favor of the Department
of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works for executory
child support arrears
A. The Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works or its
designee, as defined in R.S. 46:236.1.1, et seq. shall have a privilege for executory
child support arrears on an amount payable to an injured person, his heirs, or legal
representatives, out of the total amount of any recovery or sum had, collected, or to
be collected, whether by judgment or by settlement or compromise, from another
Page 98 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
person on account of such injuries, and on the amount payable by any insurance
company under any contract providing for indemnity or compensation to the injured
person.
* * *
§236.14. Employer reporting program
* * *
C. The Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works shall
establish an automated directory known as the "state directory of new hires".
D.(1) An employer shall report to the Department of Children and Family
Services, office of children and family services, child support enforcement section
Louisiana Works any of the following:
* * *
(2) The Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works shall
secure either electronically or by hard copy all of the following:
* * *
E.
* * *
(2)
* * *
(b) If an employer has employees who are employed in two or more states
and transmits a report magnetically or electronically, the employer may comply with
this Section by designating one of the states to which he shall report. The employer
shall notify the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works in
writing as to which state he will report.
* * *
G.(1) The Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works
shall enter the information into the data base for the state directory of new hires no
later than five days after receipt from an employer.
(2) The Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works shall
Page 99 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
provide the data entered into the state directory of new hires to the national directory
of new hires no later than three business days after the data entry.
* * *
J.(1) The Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works
shall use information received pursuant to this Section to locate individuals for
purposes of establishing paternity and for establishing, modifying, and enforcing
child support obligations. The Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works may disclose the information received pursuant to this Section to
any agent of the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works that
is under contract to carry out such purposes.
(2) The Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works shall
provide access to information received pursuant to this Section for purposes of
verifying eligibility for the program specified in Section 1137(b) of the Social
Security Act.
(3) The Department of Children and Family Services shall provide access to
Louisiana Works may use the information received pursuant to this Section to
Louisiana Works for the purposes of administering the employment security and
workers' compensation programs.
§236.15. Limited administrative authority for certain paternity and child support
actions
A.
* * *
(1) In cases in which the Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works, office of children and family services, child support enforcement
section, referred to in this Section as "agency", is providing services, the agency
may, in cases in which paternity is at issue, order all parties to submit to genetic
testing.
* * *
§236.16. Child support mortgage and privilege by affidavit; effect of filing
Page 100 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
A. The director of the child support enforcement section, office of children
and family services child support, Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works may cause a "Child Support Mortgage and Privilege by Affidavit
of DCFS", as provided in R.S. 13:4291(B), to be recorded in the mortgage records
of any parish in which the support obligor owns movable or immovable property,
and with the office of the secretary of state for inclusion in the master index
authorized under R.S. 10:9-519. Such affidavit when filed shall operate as a first lien,
privilege, and legal mortgage on all of the movable and immovable property of the
support obligor only from the date of such filing, and shall not affect liens,
privileges, chattel mortgages, or security interests as provided in R.S. 10:9-101 et
seq. or mortgages already affecting or burdening such property at the date of such
filing. Such filing shall apply to all unpaid support obligations that may accrue after
such filing, and the property of the support obligor shall be subject to seizure and
sale for the payment of such support obligation and arrearages according to the
preference and rank of the lien, privilege, security interest, and mortgage securing
their payment. Notwithstanding any provision of this Subsection, such affidavit shall
not operate as a lien, privilege, or legal mortgage on any licensed or titled motor
vehicle.
B. The director of the child support enforcement section, office of children
and family services child support, Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works, or his designee, may release all or any portion of the property
subject to any lien or judgment obtained pursuant to this Section from such lien or
judgment, or may subordinate such lien or judgment to other liens and encumbrances
if he determines that the support obligation and arrearages are sufficiently secured
by a lien or judgment on other property or through other security, or that the release,
partial release, or subordination of such lien or judgment will not endanger or
jeopardize the collection of support obligations or arrearages.
* * *
§237. Kinship Care Subsidy Program
Page 101 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
A. Creation. There is hereby established a Kinship Care Subsidy Program in
the office of children and family services of the Department of Children and Family
Services Louisiana Works, for the purpose of assisting eligible kinship caregivers,
including grandparents, step-grandparents, or other adult relatives within the fifth
degree who have legal custody or guardianship of their minor relatives.
* * *
C. Eligibility. To be eligible to qualify for a subsidy under the program, a
kinship caregiver of a minor relative shall meet the following requirements:
* * *
(5) Agree to pursue the enforcement of child support obligations against the
parents of the minor relative with the assistance of the Department of Children and
Family Services Louisiana Works in accordance with applicable law.
E. Subsidy amounts. The office of children and family services Louisiana
Works shall promulgate rules and regulations to establish the amount of the subsidy
to be awarded on behalf of each minor relative.
F. Rules, regulations, and procedures. The office of children and family
services Louisiana Works shall promulgate rules and regulations to provide for any
other eligibility requirements which are reasonably necessary to administer the
Kinship Care Subsidy Program in accordance with this Section and any federal
requirements, to promote the safety and well-being of any minor relative for whom
subsidies are issued, and to establish procedures for reconsideration of eligibility of
applicants no less than annually.
G. Administration and funding. The subsidy provided for in this Section shall
be administered by the office of children and family services Louisiana Works and
funded through the TANF block grant.
* * *
§238. Unpaid child support; release of information
* * *
B. The Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works,
Page 102 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
office of children and family services child support, may participate in cooperative
endeavors with private attorneys to release information authorized by this Section
for the purpose of collecting unpaid child support in accordance with the provisions
of this Section.
C. When a private attorney retained by the obligee receives a certification
from the office of children and family services child support that an obligor is in
arrears in the payment of child support for more than six months or whose
whereabouts have been unknown for more than six months, the private attorney
retained by the obligee may apply to the district court for the parish where the order
is being enforced for an ex parte order on a motion to determine that the obligor is
in arrears or is an absentee.
D. If the court finds that the obligor is in arrears for more than six months or
whose whereabouts have been unknown for more than six months, the court may
authorize the office of children and family services child support to enter into
cooperative endeavors with a private attorney who has been retained by the obligee
for the purpose of collecting the unpaid child support in the obligee's case.
E. Pursuant to a cooperative endeavor authorized by the provisions of this
Section and to the extent allowed by state and federal laws and regulations, the office
of children and family services child support shall provide to a private attorney who
has been retained by the obligee for the purpose of collecting unpaid child support
all of the following information that it may have regarding the obligor:
* * *
(7) Any other information which the office of children and family services
child support reasonably believes will assist in the collection of child support.
* * *
F. Nothing in this Section shall authorize the Department of Children and
Family Services Louisiana Works or the office of child support enforcement section
to contract for hire with any private attorney or entity for the collection of child
support or the provision of IV-D services.
Page 103 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
G. Any district attorney under contract to the Department of the Children and
Family Services Louisiana Works to provide child support services shall not be
authorized to release information to a private attorney under the provisions of this
Section.
H. Nothing in this Section shall limit the Department of Children and Family
Services contractual authority of Louisiana Works.
* * *
§281. Applicability
The provisions of this Subpart shall apply to persons who contract with the
office of children and family services child welfare of the Louisiana Department
of Children and Family Services Health to provide temporary or long-term foster
care for not more than six children.
* * *
§282. Investigation of foster and adoptive parent applicants
A. The Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health,
office of children and family services child welfare, shall investigate the background
of each person who applies to be a foster or adoptive parent of a child in foster care.
The investigation required by this Section shall include but shall not be limited to a
determination of whether the applicant or any adult member of the applicant's
household has been charged with a crime and, if so, the disposition of those charges.
The office shall require each applicant and adult family member to provide
fingerprints and such authorization as is necessary to conduct state and national
criminal history record checks and to obtain any other information required to
complete the investigation. The department is authorized to promulgate regulations
as may be necessary to conduct the criminal history record checks authorized in this
Section.
B. The office of children and family services child welfare shall request such
information and assistance from federal, state, or local governmental agencies as is
necessary to complete the investigation required by this Section. Only information
Page 104 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
which bears a reasonable relation to the performance of the duties of a foster parent
shall be requested.
C. The office of children and family services child welfare shall not require
an applicant to provide any physical identity materials other than photographs or
fingerprints. Such materials shall be returned to the applicant upon completion of the
investigation, and no copy of such materials may be retained by the office or by any
agency to which such identity materials were transmitted.
* * *
§283. Determination of fitness; award of contract
A. The office of children and family services child welfare shall determine
the fitness and eligibility of each person who applies for a contract to provide foster
care services to which the provisions of this Subpart apply.
B. The office of children and family services child welfare may award a
contract for foster care services to any person who is determined to be eligible for
such contracts, but no contract shall be awarded prior to such determination.
C.(1)
* * *
(b) The Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health shall
provide such training through its own personnel or by contracting with outside
persons or agencies.
* * *
§285. Required training for child protection and foster care workers
A. No employee of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health, office of children and family services child welfare, with direct
responsibility for cases dealing with families and children after January 1, 1984,
shall exercise responsibility for any cases until that employee has completed a
training program consisting of at least thirty-two hours of instruction, addressing
such appropriate topics as:
* * *
Page 105 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
B. All representatives or employees of the Louisiana Department of Children
and Family Services Health shall, at the initial time of contact with the individual
subject to a child abuse and neglect investigation, advise the individual of the
specific complaints or allegations made against the individual in a manner that is
consistent with laws protecting the rights of the informant.
C. Any employee hired on or after July 1, 2010, who has graduated from a
Council on Social Work Education accredited program of social work certifying that
the employee has completed course work and demonstrated competency in the core
areas of effective child welfare practice, including successful completion of a child
welfare specific internship, shall be deemed to have met the thirty-two hour training
requirement specified in Subsection A of this Section and may begin exercising
responsibility for cases under agency supervision. The Louisiana Department of
Children and Family Services Health in partnership with the Louisiana University
Child Welfare Workforce Alliance shall define the core competencies, which shall
include but not be limited to the competencies set forth in Subsection A of this
Section, of effective child welfare practice. The Louisiana Department of Children
and Family Services Health shall be specifically authorized to promulgate rules and
regulations, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, which may be necessary
to effect the provisions of this Section.
* * *
E. Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsections A and D of this Section,
employees of the office of children and family services child welfare shall be
permitted to exercise responsibility for cases on an emergency basis prior to the
completion of required training if the unavailability of these employees pending such
training would result in the agency's inability to meet the needs of abused or
neglected children or to satisfy legal mandates, provided that appropriate training
may not be delayed beyond sixty days.
* * *
H. The Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health shall
Page 106 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
provide such training through its own personnel, partnerships with universities, or
by contracting with outside persons or agencies.
I. The Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health may
continue incentive pay schedules established by the Department of State Civil
Service to compensate social work personnel with selected graduate degrees at a
higher rate than other persons without such specialized advanced degrees as provided
by the Department of State Civil Service and the State Civil Service Commission.
* * *
§286. Foster home child care; reimbursement system; rules
The Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health shall
establish a system for reimbursement of foster home child care costs based on the
level of care for all foster children placed in foster homes providing temporary or
long-term foster care for not more than six children receiving the services of the
department. The department shall promulgate rules for implementation of the
reimbursement system by January 1, 1995, but only if funds are made available by
appropriation by the legislature, and shall submit such rules to the committees on
health and welfare of the House of Representatives and the Senate in accordance
with the Administrative Procedure Act. At a minimum, the department shall seek
each year through the budgetary process funds sufficient to reimburse foster parents
at a rate at least equal to the cost for child care as reported and published by the
United States Department of Agriculture for the Southeastern United States.
§286.1. Kinship Foster Care Program
A. As used in this Section the following terms shall have the following
meaning:
(1) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health.
(2) "Foster parent" means any person with whom a child in the care, custody,
or guardianship of the office of children and family services Louisiana Department
of Health is placed for temporary or long-term care of not more than three years, but
Page 107 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
shall not include any person with whom a child is placed for the purpose of adoption.
(3) "Office" means the office of children and family services child welfare
of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health.
B. There is hereby established a Kinship Foster Care Program in the office
of children and family services child welfare of the Louisiana Department of
Children and Family Services Health.
C.(1) Except as provided by Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, when a child
has been removed from his home and is in the care, custody, or guardianship of the
office of children and family services child welfare, the office shall make reasonable
attempts to place the child with a relative for kinship foster care. If the relative is
approved by the office to provide foster care services, in accordance with rules and
regulations adopted by the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services
Health regarding foster care services and a placement with the relative is made, the
relative shall be eligible to receive payment for the full foster care rate for the care
of the child and any other benefits that might be available to foster parents, whether
in money or in service. The reimbursement rate shall be in accordance with the
system established by the department pursuant to R.S. 46:286.
* * *
(3) A relative may continue to be eligible for foster care reimbursement for
caring for a child in the care, custody, or guardianship of the office of children and
family services beyond three years when:
* * *
D. The office of children and family services shall establish, in accordance
with the provisions of this Section, eligibility standards for becoming a kinship foster
parent including the following:
* * *
(2) The kinship foster parent shall be twenty-one years of age or older, except
that if the spouse or partner of the relative is twenty-one years of age or older and
living in the home, and the relative is between eighteen and twenty-one years of age,
Page 108 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
the office of children and family services shall waive the age requirement.
E.
* * *
(2) The office of children and family services shall conduct the investigation
required by this Section and shall require each prospective kinship foster parent to
provide such information as is necessary to obtain the information required to
complete the investigation. The office of children and family services shall request
such information and assistance from federal, state, and local governmental agencies
as necessary to complete the investigation. Only information which bears a
reasonable relation to the performance of the duties of a kinship foster parent shall
be considered.
* * *
F. The office of children and family services shall determine whether the
person is able to care effectively for the child by completing all of the following:
* * *
G. The office of children and family services and the kinship foster parent
shall develop a case plan for the foster care of the child, which shall be periodically
reviewed and updated. If the plan includes the use of an approved day care center or
family day care home, the office of children and family services shall pay for child
care arrangements, according to the rates established by the department, but only if
funds are made available by appropriation by the legislature. The kinship foster
parent shall cooperate with any activities specified in the case plan for the foster
child, such as counseling, therapy, court sessions, or visits with the foster child's
parents or other family members. The kinship foster parent shall also cooperate and
assist in efforts to achieve a safe, permanent home for the child.
* * *
J. The secretary of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to carry out the
provisions of this Section in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
Page 109 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
* * *
§286.2. Children in foster care; identification card; photograph
A. Except as provided in Subsection B of this Section, for a child placed into
foster care, as defined in Children's Code Article 603, the Louisiana Department of
Children and Family Services Health shall obtain one of the following no later than
ninety days after the placement of the child in the custody of the state:
* * *
B. If the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health is
unable to comply with the provisions of Subsection A of this Section due to the
child's incarceration, elopement, physical or mental disability, or specialized
placement where the child cannot be transported, or upon approval of the court, the
department shall obtain the special identification card or photograph no later than
ninety days from the date the condition preventing compliance ceases to exist.
* * *
§286.12. Purpose
Foster parents are recognized as primary care givers to abused and neglected
children who have been removed from their homes of origin. The Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services Health shall implement and promote
the support of these rights through the policy and practice of the Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services Health.
§286.13. Rights
Foster parents shall be entitled to the following rights granted to them by the
Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health:
* * *
(3) The right to receive all information on a child, at placement, and on an
ongoing basis, that could impact the care provided the child, the health, and safety
of the child and foster family members. Information shall include the case plan and
the health, medical, educational, legal, and social history as known to the Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services Health to better meet the needs of
Page 110 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
children in their care.
* * *
§286.16. Short title; purpose; rights
* * *
B. The Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health shall
implement, promote, and support the rights contained in this Section through the
policies and practices of the department as applied to youth ages fourteen through
eighteen who are in foster care in this state.
* * *
§288.2. Definitions
As used in this Subpart, the following terms shall have the following
meanings:
(1) "Court" means the court that exercised juvenile jurisdiction over the child
in need of care proceedings involving the youth prior to his eighteenth birthday.
(2) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health.
* * *
§352. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Public assistance" means any of the following:
(a) Cash benefits of the Family Independence Temporary Assistance Program
administered by the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works.
* * *
§356. Rulemaking
The secretary of Louisiana Works, the secretary of the Department of
Children and Family Services, and the secretary of the Louisiana Department of
Health, the state superintendent of education, and the president of the Louisiana
Community and Technical College System shall promulgate all rules in accordance
with the Administrative Procedure Act necessary to implement the provisions of this
Page 111 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
Part.
* * *
§401. Reciprocal agreements regarding interstate transportation of poor and indigent
The Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health, subject
to the approval of the attorney general, may enter into reciprocal agreements with
corresponding state agencies of other states regarding the interstate transportation of
poor and indigent persons, and may arrange with the proper officials in this state for
the acceptance, transfer, and support of persons receiving public aid in other states
in accordance with the terms of the reciprocal agreements; provided that this state
shall not, nor shall any parish or other political subdivision of this state, be
committed to the support of persons who are not, in the opinion of the department,
entitled to public support by the laws of this state.
* * *
§441. Surviving spouse of public assistance recipients; retention of benefits received
during month of death
A surviving spouse of a general public assistance recipient is hereby
authorized to receive and retain any financial assistance paid by the Department of
Children and Family Services Louisiana Works to or for the benefit of said the
recipient during the month of the death of said recipient, whether or not the check
covering such the public assistance was actually received prior to the death of the
recipient.
* * *
§443. Exemption of income and resources
The secretary of the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana
Works and the secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health are hereby
authorized to adopt income and resources exemption policies to the extent necessary
to conform with the federal Economic Opportunity Act, any social security
provision, and any other laws of congress to obtain federal block grant or matching
funds for the state's public assistance program. Such income and resources
Page 112 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
exemption policies shall prevail in the event they conflict with R.S. 46:151, 153, 154,
and 233.
§444. Cooperation with administrative agencies relative to interchange of
information
The Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works is
hereby authorized to provide for interchange of such information necessary in
providing for work training experiences as required by Public Law 90-248, as the
secretary of the United States Department of Health, Education and Welfare, or its
successor department, may require for federal matching purposes.
* * *
§447. Revision of standard of need; aid to families with dependent children; general
assistance
A. The Louisiana Department of Health and the Department of Children and
Family Services Louisiana Works jointly shall revise the standard of need for the
Family Independence Temporary Assistanct Assistance Program and the general
assistance program each year, basing such standard on the Annual Update of the
Poverty Income Guidelines published by the United States Department of Health and
Human Services. The standard shall reflect the higher of the southern and national
averages. The departments shall cause such revised standard to become effective on
January first of each year.
B. Implementation of this provision shall be contingent on the Louisiana
Department of Health and the Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works certifying to the commissioner of the division of administration
that the revision will not increase the total state dollar expenditure for the two
departments.
* * *
§447.3. In-hospital mental health care for adopted children; state's duty to furnish
To the extent funds are appropriated by the legislature for such purpose, in
all adoption subsidy agreements executed after September 1, 2001, involving a child
Page 113 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
in the custody of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services
Health, the state shall agree to provide acutely medically necessary in-hospital
mental health treatment for that child until he reaches the age of majority, provided
that the child is not eligible for, or has otherwise exhausted benefits under Medicaid,
LaCHIP, or any contract of health and accident insurance or any health benefit plan.
The burden of providing the appropriate documentation of the child's eligibility for
medical benefits under this statute shall be upon the adoptive parents.
* * *
§448. Emergency assistance information and referral
A. As used in this Section:
(1) "Office of children and family services" shall mean the office of children
and family services, Department of Children and Family Services, state of Louisiana.
(2)(1) "Emergency assistance" shall mean any service, food, clothing, shelter,
money grant, or any other assistance available to people who find their ability to
obtain the necessities of life threatened by fire, flood, death, or other sudden and
necessitous circumstances.
(3)(2) "Governmental agency" shall mean any political subdivision
department, office, agency, board, corporation, or other instrumentality funded in
whole or in part by local, state, or federal funds that provides some form of
emergency assistance in this state.
(4)(3) "Private agency" shall mean any department, office, agency, board,
corporation, or other instrumentality that provides some form of emergency
assistance in this state, but shall not include any private agency that chooses not to
take referrals or discriminates in their assistance on the grounds of race.
B. The office of children and family services Louisiana Department of
Health shall gather through its local offices information on all governmental and
private agencies in each parish as to the type of assistance each agency can and will
provide and as to what eligibility requirements, if any, these agencies apply to their
assistance.
Page 114 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
C. The office of children and family services Louisiana Department of
Health shall designate an office in each parish which will aid people seeking
emergency assistance, either in person or by telephone, to identify what assistance,
if any, the person can obtain. The office of children and family services shall
publicize in each parish the availability of this information.
D. Each office will report at the end of each calendar year to the assistant
secretary of the office of children and family services Louisiana Department of
Health, the total number and type of emergency assistance requests it has received
and the number and type of emergency assistance requests for which no agency
provides assistance in that area. The reports shall be available to the public on
request.
E. The services provided pursuant to this Section shall be funded from such
monies as are already provided for the office of children and family services
Louisiana Department of Health, and to this end, shall be deemed not to require
additional personnel or appropriations.
* * *
§450. WIC Program; authorized vendor participation
A. Notwithstanding any other state laws or any rules or regulations
promulgated by the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health,
no applicant shall be prohibited from participating in the WIC Program as an
authorized vendor based on:
* * *
§450.1. Electronic authorization and distribution of public assistance benefits and
services
A. The office of children and family services, Department of Children and
Family Services, Louisiana Department of Health and Louisiana Works shall
contract for the development and implementation of an electronic issuance system
for the authorization and distribution of benefits and services provided by public
assistance programs. Such programs shall include but not be limited to issuance of
Page 115 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
benefits and services of the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program and the
Family Independence Temporary Assistance Program (FITAP), and shall require that
all recipients who participate in programs for which benefits and services are
authorized and distributed through the system shall obtain benefits through such the
electronic issuance system, subject only to such the exceptions as shall be necessary
for the effective functioning of the program programs.
* * *
§460.1. Submission of quarterly reports to the legislature
The Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works shall
submit copies of the federal quarterly ACF-196 and ACF-696 reports to the House
and Senate committees on health and welfare, the House Committee on
Appropriations, and the Senate Committee on Finance at the time these reports are
submitted to the federal government. Upon request, the department shall submit
copies of any other report the legislature deems necessary.
* * *
§460.5. Earned income disregards for certain TANF recipients
A. In order to promote self-sufficiency, the Department of Children and
Family Services Louisiana Works shall disregard a recipient's first six months of
earnings up to nine hundred dollars of gross earnings per month in determining the
amount of his household's benefit under Temporary Assistance for Needy Families,
provided that such the recipient is engaged in a work activity which has been
approved by the department as part of his work participation requirement under
TANF.
* * *
§460.7. Incentive Award Program; dropout reduction; teen pregnancy reduction
A. The Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works in
consultation with the Department of Education shall develop and implement a
special program, the Incentive Award Program, whereby the governing authority of
a parish and a parish school system may receive a financial award for reducing the
Page 116 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
teen pregnancy rate and dropout rate for the parish.
* * *
C. Through the Incentive Award Program, the department shall provide a
financial award to each of the ten parishes identified in the annual progress report
which that have demonstrated the most significant reduction in dropout rates, as
defined by rule of the Department of Education, and in teen pregnancy rates as
defined by rule of the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana
Works. The financial award shall be distributed to such the ten parish school
systems. These awards may be expended by the parish school system to implement
innovative community-based and school-based programs designed to further reduce
the dropout rate and the teen pregnancy rate for the parish and for instructional
enhancement programs.
* * *
§460.8. TANF eligibility; teen parent living arrangements; work participation
requirements; submission of waiver
A.(1)(a) Any recipient of Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Block
Grant (TANF) benefits who is less than eighteen years of age, is not married, and is
a custodial parent shall live in an approved adult-supervised living arrangement with
his or her child, except when evidence is presented to a caseworker of the
Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works that the teen parent,
or his or her child, has been subjected to emotional or physical abuse.
(b)(i) If the caseworker determines that the teen parent, or his or her child,
has been subjected to the abuse of an adult with whom they are living in a primary
relationship and that under the circumstances the teen, and his or her child, would be
safer living outside the present adult-supervised living arrangement, then the teen
parent and child shall be allowed to live outside such the adult-supervised living
arrangement temporarily.
(ii) If the teen parent leaves his or her such the adult-supervised living
arrangement, the caseworker shall monitor the teen's case no less frequently than
Page 117 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
once a month and shall assist the teen parent in locating another approved adult-
supervised living arrangement, taking into consideration the needs and concerns of
the teen parent and child.
(c) The teen parent shall be allowed to receive TANF benefits on behalf of
himself or herself, and his or her child, while temporarily living outside an adult-
supervised living arrangement as provided in this Subsection.
* * *
B. The secretary of the Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works may temporarily exempt from the work participation requirements
any female who is in a two-parent TANF family who presents sufficient evidence to
support a claim that she has been incapable of maintaining a job or regularly
reporting to her place of employment because she is a victim of domestic violence
and has been forced to move into a shelter or another protective environment outside
her home.
* * *
§460.10. Drug testing for certain adult recipients of public assistance; legislative
policy; procedures
A. The legislature hereby reaffirms the legitimate government function of
promoting the safety and welfare of children and adults. The legislature declares that
the best interests of a significant portion of the state's population are served by
ensuring that they are free of the physical and mental impairments associated with
drug dependence. The legislature further reaffirms its compelling interest in
providing safeguards to eliminate the misappropriation of entitlement public
assistance benefits. The legislature hereby directs the secretary of the Department
of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works, in consultation with the
secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health and the commissioner of
administration, to establish a mandatory drug testing program for certain adults in
the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Block Grant Program.
B.(1) The secretary of the Department of Children and Family Services
Page 118 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
Louisiana Works shall cause to be instituted a mandatory drug testing program for
certain adult participants, to be determined by the secretary in consultation with the
secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health and the commissioner of
administration, in the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Block Grant
Program. However, no No participant shall be tested if such testing is prohibited by
federal law. No sanction shall be imposed on an adult participant if such sanction is
prohibited by federal law.
(2) The Such testing program shall provide procedural safeguards to ensure
the protection of the constitutional rights of the program participants and provide that
testing shall be done by state certified laboratories.
C.(1) The required drug testing program shall require a participant to
complete an education and rehabilitation program upon the initial identification of
such the participant as an illegal drug user verified by a positive test result as a
prerequisite to continued receipt of benefits. Further, the drug testing program shall
provide for the suspension of participation in such entitlement the public assistance
program for a participant subsequently identified by a verified positive test result as
an illegal drug user; however. However, in no event shall participation in such
entitlement the public assistance program be suspended while the participant is
taking part in the education and rehabilitation program or until an education and
rehabilitation program is available to the participant.
(2)(a) The secretary of the Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works, in conjunction with the secretary of the Louisiana Department of
Health and the commissioner of administration, shall provide a program of education
and rehabilitation for participants so identified as illegal drug users.
(b) Such The program shall include regulations governing the reentry of a
suspended recipient participant into the entitlement public assistance program
based on subsequent testing results and completion of education and rehabilitation
programs.
(c) Such The program shall also include the provision of inpatient services
Page 119 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
for any participant identified as an illegal drug user if it is determined that such
inpatient services are necessary for successful rehabilitation.
D. The secretary of the Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works, in consultation with the secretary of the Louisiana Department
of Health and the commissioner of administration, shall promulgate rules and
regulations to implement the provisions of this Section in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act. Such rules and regulations shall provide that the cost
of testing participants for the presence of illegal drugs and the treatment of such
participants pursuant to the provisions of this Section shall be borne by the
department or departments that grant the applicable public assistance.
E. The secretary of Louisiana Works shall prepare a written statistical report
on the program and submit the report to the legislature on or before January 1, 1999
and annually thereafter.
§932. Powers and duties
The office shall have the following powers and duties:
* * *
(12) To administer all federal funds appropriated, allocated, or otherwise
made available to the state for services to the elderly, whether by block grant or in
any other form, with the exception of funds for programs administered by the
Department of Children and Family Services or the Louisiana Department of Health,
on August 15, 1995, or the Louisiana Department of Health on October 1, 2025, or
Louisiana Works and to distribute those funds in accordance with and consistent
with R.S. 46:936 state and federal requirements.
* * *
§972.1. Louisiana Pregnancy and Baby Care Initiative
A.(1) The Louisiana Pregnancy and Baby Care Initiative is hereby created,
within the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health, to act as
a statewide social service program to enhance and increase resources that promote
childbirth instead of abortion for women facing unplanned pregnancies and to offer
Page 120 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
a full range of services, including pregnancy support services, parenting help, and
adoption assistance.
* * *
§1002. Vocational testing and counseling; purpose; duties of the office of children
and family services
A. The Department of Children and Family Services, office of children and
family services, Louisiana Works shall provide, in each of its regional offices,
vocational testing and counseling on the subjects of higher education and
employment for those individuals in long-term foster care at the youngest age
deemed appropriate to process the information.
B. Through vocational testing, the office of children and family services
Louisiana Works shall seek to identify areas of potential interest and potential
employment that are specific to an individual in foster care and, to this end, the
office shall:
* * *
C. The office of children and family services Louisiana Works shall adopt
all necessary rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this Chapter.
* * *
§1251. Juvenile probation; parole and intake services
* * *
B. The intake service provided hereunder shall be limited to examining and
evaluating complaints that a child is a delinquent or is a child in need of supervision
and advising the district attorney whether the best interests of the child would be
served by the initiation of proceedings under the Children's Code, the signing of an
informal adjustment agreement, referral to the Louisiana Department of Children
and Family Services Health, referral to a public or private agency for assistance, or
any other legally permissible course of action. The personnel assigned to perform
these duties shall not assume any prosecutorial functions except for the filing of a
petition as authorized by the Children's Code.
Page 121 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
* * *
§1259. Restrictions on use of records
* * *
B. Nothing in this Section shall prohibit the interchange of records, reports,
or any other information among the various offices of the Department of Children
and Family Services and Louisiana Department of Health and among the various
personnel thereof. Additionally, nothing in this Section shall prohibit any judge
serving as judge of a juvenile court from access to all of the records of any child
before that court.
* * *
§1352. Definitions
In this Chapter:
(1) "Approved runaway and homeless youth residential program or facility"
means any residential program or facility licensed by the division of licensing and
certification of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health
as a child residential care provider including a community home, a group home, a
residential home, an adult residential facility possessing a waiver for the housing of
juveniles, or an emergency shelter.
(2) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health.
* * *
§1353. Notice to parent or guardian; reporting requirements to parent, legal
custodian; seventy-two hours of safe harbor
* * *
D. A runaway youth over the age of eleven admitted to an approved runaway
and homeless youth residential program or facility licensed by the Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services Health shall be provided seventy-two
hours of safe harbor unless otherwise designated by order of a court exercising
juvenile jurisdiction regarding custody of the runaway youth, or unless the child is
Page 122 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
in the custody of a state agency which may elect to remove the child earlier without
a court order.
* * *
G. Whenever a report has been filed by the facility or program in accordance
with the provisions in R.S. 14:403, the facility or program shall be legally authorized
to provide care for the runaway youth pending a determination by the Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services Health or a court exercising juvenile
jurisdiction regarding custody of the runaway youth.
* * *
§1402. Legislative intent; declaration of purpose and policy
It is the intent of the legislature to protect the health, safety, and well-being
of the children and youth of the state who are in out-of-home care on a regular or
consistent basis. Toward that end, it is the purpose of this Chapter to establish
statewide minimum standards for the safety and well-being of children and youth,
to ensure maintenance of these standards, and to regulate conditions in these
facilities through a program of licensing. It shall be the policy of the state to ensure
protection of all individuals under care by specialized providers and to encourage
and assist in the improvement of programs. It is the further intent of the legislature
that the freedom of religion of all citizens shall be inviolate. This Chapter shall not
give the Louisiana Department of Health or the Department of Children and Family
Services jurisdiction or authority to regulate, control, supervise, or in any way be
involved in the form, manner, or content of any curriculum or instruction of a school
or specialized provider sponsored by a church or religious organization so long as
the civil and human rights of the clients and residents are not violated.
§1403. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following definitions shall apply unless the
context clearly states otherwise:
* * *
(3) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Page 123 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
Services Health.
* * *
§1404. Requirement of licensure
* * *
B. Child-placing agencies within the Louisiana Department of Children and
Family Services Health shall be exempt from the provisions of this Chapter. The
department is authorized and mandated to perform its child-placing functions in
accordance with the standards promulgated by the department for licensed child-
placing agencies.
* * *
§1414.1. State central registry
A. Any owner, operator, current or prospective employee, or volunteer of a
specialized provider requesting licensure or licensed by the Louisiana Department
of Children and Family Services Health is prohibited from being employed by the
specialized provider if that individual's name is recorded on the state central registry
as a perpetrator for a substantiated finding of abuse or neglect of a child.
* * *
§1425. Adoption services; requirements for advertising; injunctive relief;
exceptions; penalties
* * *
C. If any person advertises in violation of this Section, the attorney general,
the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health, the appropriate
district attorney, or any licensed child-placing agency or a Louisiana-based crisis
pregnancy center may file suit in district court according to the general rules of
venue to obtain injunctive relief to restrain the person from continuing the violation.
* * *
§1427. Parent-child relationship
The Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health shall not
interfere with the parent-child relationship regarding the religious training of a child,
Page 124 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
where all of the following conditions are met:
* * *
§1428. Immunization information; influenza
* * *
B.(1) The Louisiana Department of Health shall develop and provide
information on influenza immunization to the Department of Children and Family
Services. The Department of Children and Family Services shall provide such
information to each licensed specialized provider or child-placing agency, which
shall make the information available to each child's parent or legal guardian and to
each youth aged eighteen or above pursuant to Subsection A of this Section.
(2) The Louisiana Department of Health and the Department of Children and
Family Services shall determine respectively the most cost-effective and efficient
means of distributing such information.
C. The Department of Children and Family Services, in consultation with the
Louisiana Department of Health, shall establish by rules and regulations all
guidelines and procedures for carrying out the provisions of this Section in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
D. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to require any specialized
provider or child-placing agency, the Department of Children and Family Services,
or the Louisiana Department of Health to provide or pay for immunizations against
influenza.
* * *
§1430. Operating in violation of regulations; penalties and fines
A.(1) For violations related to supervision, criminal history record checks,
state central registry clearances, staff-to-child ratios, motor vehicle checks, or failure
to report critical incidents, the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health may issue a written warning that includes a corrective action plan,
in lieu of revocation, upon any person or specialized provider violating these
requirements if such condition or occurrence does not pose an imminent threat to the
Page 125 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
health, safety, rights, or welfare of a child. Failure to implement a corrective action
plan issued pursuant to this Section may result in either the assessment of a civil fine
or license revocation or may result in both actions being taken by the department.
Such civil fine shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars per day for each
assessment; however, the aggregate fines assessed for violations determined in any
consecutive twelve-month period shall not exceed two thousand dollars.
* * *
D.
* * *
(2) After compliance with the requirements of Article VII, Section 9(B) of
the Constitution of Louisiana relative to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund,
and prior to the monies being placed in the state general fund, an amount equal to the
amount deposited as provided in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection shall be credited
to a special fund hereby created in the state treasury to be known as the " Specialized
Provider Licensing Trust Fund", hereinafter referred to as "the fund". The monies in
the fund shall be subject to annual appropriation and shall be available exclusively
for use by the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health for
the education and training of employees, staff, or other personnel of specialized
provider and child-placing agencies.
§1442.1. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following definitions shall apply unless the
context clearly states otherwise:
* * *
(2) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health.
(3) "Office" means the office of children and family services child welfare,
Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health.
* * *
§1442.2. The office of children and family services child welfare; duties
Page 126 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
A. The office of children and family services child welfare, Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services Health shall issue a request for
proposals to establish intergenerational child care programs designed to employ or
utilize senior workers as child care personnel. In developing the requirements for the
request for proposals, the office shall consider a variety of program designs and
funding arrangements which shall directly involve senior workers in daycare
facilities and shall include but not be limited to programs providing salary stipends,
transportation, or meals. Priority shall be given to proposals submitted from those
areas of the state with significant numbers of elderly and with the greatest need for
child care facilities.
* * *
C. The office, through the Department of Children and Family Services, shall
promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure
Act to implement the requirements of this Chapter.
* * *
§1445.3. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, unless otherwise indicated, the terms have the
meaning ascribed to them in this Section as follows:
(1) "Agency adoption" means the agencies that are licensed by the Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services Health pursuant to Children's Code
Article 1198 et seq.
* * *
(3) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health.
* * *
§1445.4. Adoption Awareness Program created
The Adoption Awareness Program is hereby created in the Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services Health, and the department shall
contract with eligible vendors or organizations to provide the supportive services as
Page 127 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
described in R.S. 46:1445.5.
* * *
§1445.13. Adoption awareness; Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health
A link to the AdoptionOption.La.Gov website as provided for in R.S.
40:1061.17, or any successor state agency administered website that promotes
adoption awareness and makes adoption resource information available to the public,
shall be made available and placed in a prominent location on the websites
administered by the Louisiana Department of Health and the Department of Children
and Family Services. Any other state agency that administers a website may also
provide a link to the AdoptionOption.La.Gov website.
* * *
§1451. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the meaning ascribed to
them in this Section:
(1) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health.
* * *
(3) "TANF" means the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families block grant
program established pursuant to the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity
Reconciliation Act of 1996, P.L. 104-193, and administered in this state by the
Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works.
* * *
§1844. Basic rights for victim and witness
* * *
W. Confidentiality of crime victims who are minors, victims of sex offenses,
and victims of human trafficking-related offenses.
(1)(a) In order to protect the identity and provide for the safety and welfare
of crime victims who are minors under the age of eighteen years and of victims of
Page 128 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
sex offenses or human trafficking-related offenses, notwithstanding any provision
of law to the contrary, all public officials and officers and public agencies, including
but not limited to all law enforcement agencies, sheriffs, district attorneys, judicial
officers, clerks of court, the Crime Victims Reparations Board, and the Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services Health or any division thereof, shall
not publicly disclose the name, address, contact information, or identity of crime
victims who at the time of the commission of the offense are minors under eighteen
years of age or of victims of sex offenses or human trafficking-related offenses,
regardless of the date of commission of the offense. The confidentiality of the
identity of the victim who at the time of the commission of the offense is a minor
under eighteen years of age or the victim of a sex offense or human trafficking-
related offense may be waived by the victim. The public disclosure of the name of
the juvenile crime victim by any public official or officer or public agency is not
prohibited by this Subsection when the crime resulted in the death of the victim.
Nothing in this Subsection shall be construed to require the redaction of a victim's
name when the named victim is the one requesting such documents, reports, or any
other records.
* * *
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, all public
officials, officers, and public agencies, including but not limited to all law
enforcement agencies, sheriffs, district attorneys, judicial officers, clerks of court,
the Crime Victims Reparations Board, and the Louisiana Department of Children
and Family Services Health or any division thereof, charged with the responsibility
of knowing the name, address, contact information, and identity of crime victims
who are minors or of crime victims of a sex offense or a human trafficking-related
offense as a necessary part of their duties shall have full and complete access to this
information regarding a crime victim who is a minor or a victim of a sex offense or
a human trafficking-related offense. Either prior to or at the time of a request for
information, the public official or officer or public agency shall take measures to
Page 129 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
prevent the public disclosure of the name, address, contact information, or identity
of such a crime victim who is a minor or a victim of a sex offense or human
trafficking-related offense, which may include the use of initials, abbreviations, or
any other form of concealing the identity of the victim on all public documents.
* * *
(5)(a) In order to provide for the safety and welfare of victims of crimes
against family members, household members, or dating partners, notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, all public officials and officers and public
agencies, including but not limited to all law enforcement agencies, sheriffs, district
attorneys, judicial officers, clerks of court, the Crime Victims Reparations Board,
and the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health or any
division thereof, shall not publicly disclose the address or contact information of
victims of crimes against family members, household members, or dating partners.
The confidentiality of the address and contact information of the victim of a crime
against a family member, household member, or dating partner may be waived by
the victim.
* * *
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, all public
officials, officers, and public agencies, including but not limited to all law
enforcement agencies, sheriffs, district attorneys, judicial officers, clerks of court,
the Crime Victims Reparations Board, and the Louisiana Department of Children
and Family Services Health or any division thereof, charged with the responsibility
of knowing the address and contact information of victims of crimes against family
members, household members, or dating partners as a necessary part of their duties
shall have full and complete access to this information regarding a victim of a crime
against a family member, household member, or dating partner. Either prior to or at
the time of a request for information, the public official or officer or public agency
shall take measures to prevent the public disclosure of the address and contact
information of a victim of a crime against a family member, household member, or
Page 130 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
dating partner.
* * *
§1906.2. Interdepartmental cooperation
The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, Department of Children
and Family Services, Louisiana Department of Health, Department of Education, and
the Juvenile and Family Court Judges Association shall consult and cooperate to
develop a plan for treatment and a continuum of care for children alleged to be or
adjudicated delinquent or in need of care or supervision. The purposes of such
consultation shall include the goal of early intervention by the components of the
juvenile justice system to assist children in receiving proper treatment so that they
will be less likely to re-enter the system.
* * *
§2122. Program creation
A. From federal funds, state funds, or funds made available from private or
local sources for this purpose, the office of children and family services within the
Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health is hereby authorized
to establish a family violence program, hereafter called the "Family Violence
Prevention and Intervention Program," for the development of community-based
shelters for victims of family violence. The Louisiana Department of Children and
Family Services Health shall establish such program within the office of children
and family services women's health and community health which shall be the
recipient of any funds made available for the program.
B. The office of children and family services Louisiana Department of
Health shall establish standards for the expenditure of state funds made available
from federal, private, or local sources and shall assure the availability of personnel,
resources, and equipment necessary for the purpose of the Chapter.
* * *
§2136.2. Louisiana Protective Order Registry
* * *
Page 131 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
F. The judicial administrator's office shall make the Louisiana Protective
Order Registry available to state and local law enforcement agencies, district
attorney offices, the Department of Children and Family Services, office of children
and family services, child support enforcement section, the Louisiana Department
of Health, bureau of protective services, the office of elderly affairs, elderly
protective services, the office of the attorney general, and the courts.
* * *
§2145. Creation; purpose and duties of the commission
A. The Domestic Violence Prevention Commission is hereby created within
the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health.
* * *
§2147. Meetings
* * *
D. The Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health shall
provide to the commission such clerical, administrative, and technical assistance and
support as may be necessary to enable the commission to accomplish its goals.
§2148. State domestic violence coalition; appeal hearing prior to disciplinary action;
notification requirements; mandatory representation
* * *
B.(1) No later than forty-eight hours after any disciplinary action is taken by
the coalition against any member of the coalition or domestic violence services
provider, the state domestic violence coalition of Louisiana shall give written notice
to the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health, the House
and Senate committees on health and welfare, and the representative and senator for
any district for which the member or provider renders services.
* * *
§2161. Human trafficking victims services plan; children
A. With respect to children found to be victims of human trafficking, the
Department of Children and Family Services, in conjunction with the Louisiana
Page 132 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
Department of Health, shall develop a plan for the delivery of services to victims of
human trafficking. Such plan shall include provisions for:
* * *
B. In developing the plan, the departments department shall work together
with such other state and federal agencies, public and private entities, and other
stakeholders as they deem appropriate.
C.(1) Each private entity that provides services to victims pursuant to the
provisions of this Section shall submit to the governor's office of human trafficking
prevention and to the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services
Health an annual report on their operations including information on the services
offered, geographic areas served, the number of persons served, and individual status
updates on each person served. This information shall not include the name, address,
or other identifying information of the person served. The governor's office of human
trafficking prevention shall compile the data from all of the reports submitted
pursuant to the provisions of this Subsection and shall provide this information to the
legislature on or before the first day of February each year.
(2) Each statewide and local law enforcement entity that investigates cases
of human trafficking or related sexual offenses and that provides services to victims
pursuant to the provisions of this Section shall submit to the governor's office of
human trafficking prevention and to the Louisiana Department of Children and
Family Services Health an annual report on their operations including information
on type of investigation, outcome of the investigation, and any services offered to
victims, and demographic information related to the case and services offered.
(3) Each district attorney who prosecutes cases of human trafficking or
related sexual offenses or who provides services to victims pursuant to the provisions
of this Section shall submit to the governor's office of human trafficking prevention
and to the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health an annual
report on their operations including the prosecuting agency's name, parish,
disposition of case, statute under which the offense was prosecuted, sentencing date,
Page 133 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
restitution ordered, restitution paid, value of assets from civil asset forfeiture, and
any services offered to victims.
§2161.1. Human trafficking victims services plan; adults
A. With respect to any person referred to the Louisiana Department of
Children and Family Services Health who is eighteen years of age or older and who
is found to be a victim of human trafficking in which the trafficking activity included
commercial sexual activity or any sexual conduct constituting a crime under the laws
of this state, the department shall refer the person to the appropriate department,
agency, or entity to provide the person with the following:
* * *
C.(1) Each private entity that provides services to victims pursuant to the
provisions of this Section shall submit to the governor's office of human trafficking
prevention and to the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services
Health an annual report on their operations including information on the services
offered, training or certifications received specific to human trafficking, geographic
areas served, the number of persons served, and individual status updates on each
person served. This information shall not include the name, address, or other
identifying information of the person served. The governor's office of human
trafficking prevention shall compile the data from all of the reports submitted
pursuant to the provisions of this Subsection and shall provide this information to the
legislature on or before the first day of February each year.
(2) Each statewide and local law enforcement entity that investigates cases
of human trafficking or related sexual offenses and that provides services to victims
pursuant to the provisions of this Section shall submit to the governor's office of
human trafficking prevention and to the Louisiana Department of Children and
Family Services Health an annual report on their operations including information
on the type of investigation, outcome of the investigation, and any services offered
to victims, and demographic information related to the case and services offered.
(3) Each district attorney who prosecutes cases of human trafficking or
Page 134 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
related sexual offenses or who provides services to victims pursuant to the provisions
of this Section shall submit to the governor's office of human trafficking prevention
and to the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health an annual
report on their operations including the prosecuting agency's name, parish,
disposition of case, statute under which the offense was prosecuted, sentencing date,
restitution ordered, restitution paid, value of assets from civil asset forfeiture, and
any services offered to victims.
* * *
§2169.1. Powers and duties
The office shall have the following powers and duties:
* * *
(9) To monitor and evaluate the effectiveness and efficiency of programs that
provide services to and programs for human trafficking victims, and annually report
its findings and recommendations to the legislature, the Louisiana Department of
Children and Family Services Health, and any entity required to submit a report
under the provisions of R.S. 46:2161(C) and Children's Code Article 725.2(B).
* * *
§2402. Definitions
Except where the context clearly indicates otherwise, in this Chapter:
* * *
(4) "Child abuse prevention" means services and programs funded through
the Children's Trust Dedicated Fund Account which are designed to prevent the
occurrence or recurrence of child abuse and neglect as defined in Children's Code
Article 603. Except for those provided in this Chapter and except for the purpose of
planning and coordination pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter, the services and
programs of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health
which are mandated by state law or state appropriation, or which are required for
receipt of federal funds, shall not be subject to the provisions of this Chapter.
* * *
Page 135 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
§2404. Louisiana Children's Trust Fund Board; created; membership
* * *
B.(1) The Louisiana Children's Trust Fund Board shall be composed of
fifteen members as follows:
* * *
(b) The assistant secretary of child welfare of the Louisiana Department of
Children and Family Services Health, or his designee.
* * *
§2406. Comprehensive state plan for child abuse prevention
* * *
G. The Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health, the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections, and the Department of Education shall
participate and cooperate in the development of the state plan as deemed necessary
by the cabinet.
* * *
§2411. Definitions
Except where the context clearly indicates otherwise in this Chapter:
* * *
(2) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health.
* * *
§2552. Prevention of teen pregnancy and sexually transmitted diseases; agency
cooperation
A. The state superintendent of education, the secretary of the Department of
Children and Family Services, and the secretary of the Louisiana Department of
Health shall meet together not less than twice annually to review and evaluate the
effectiveness of current state programs, including but not limited to sex education
provided by public schools, aimed at reducing the rate of teen pregnancy and
preventing the spread of HIV and other sexually transmitted diseases among the
Page 136 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
youth of Louisiana.
B. The state superintendent of education, the secretary of the Department of
Children and Family Services, and the secretary of the Louisiana Department of
Health shall review and evaluate any programs that are available for implementation
in Louisiana to educate the youth of Louisiana about the importance of preventing
teen pregnancy and the spread of HIV and other sexually transmitted diseases by
providing culturally competent education and outreach.
§2553. Report
The state superintendent of education, the secretary of the Department of
Children and Family Services, and the secretary of the Louisiana Department of
Health, jointly, shall submit a written report of their findings and recommendations,
including proposed legislation if necessary, for a comprehensive strategy to reduce
the rate of teen pregnancy and prevent the spread of HIV and other sexually
transmitted diseases among the youth of Louisiana on an annual basis to the
legislature not later than sixty days prior to the commencement of the regular
legislative session. Any recommendations made by the state superintendent of
education, the secretary of the Department of Children and Family Services, and the
secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health shall be in accordance with the
provisions of R.S. 17:281.
* * *
§2605. Children's Cabinet Advisory Board
B. The advisory board shall be composed of the following members:
* * *
(11) The assistant secretary of child welfare of the Louisiana Department of
Children and Family Services Health or his designee.
* * *
§2605.1. Council on the Status of Grandparents Raising Grandchildren
* * *
B. The council shall be composed of the following members:
Page 137 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
* * *
(2) Three members One member representing the Department of Children
and Family Services Louisiana Works appointed by the secretary of the department,
one of whom who shall be a representative of the kinship care subsidy program, one
of whom shall be a representative of the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program,
and one of whom shall be a representative of the foster care program.
(3) Two Four members representing the Louisiana Department of Health
appointed by the secretary of the department, one of whom shall be a representative
of the behavioral health program, and one of whom shall be a representative of the
Medicaid eligibility program, one of whom shall be a representative of the
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, and one of whom shall be a
representative of the foster care program.
* * *
§2607. Partners in Protecting Children Subcommittee
* * *
C.(1) The subcommittee shall be composed of the following members:
* * *
(f) The secretary of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health, or his designee.
* * *
§2758.2. Integrated case management planning system; creation; membership;
duties and responsibilities
A. The deputy secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections,
youth services, office of juvenile justice, and the secretary of the Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services Health shall evaluate programs to be
included in the Integrated Case Management System.
* * *
Section 24. R.S. 47:299.5(B)(2), the introductory paragraph of 299.11, 299.11(1) and
(4), 299.41(B), 305.7(C)(2), 305.38, 463.122(C), 1508(B)(23), 1676(4)(d), 1677(F)(5),
Page 138 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
6003(C)(4)(i), 6028(B)(2)(d)(ix), 6042(E)(2) and (F)(3) and (4), 6102(2), 6105(A), and
9027(C)(10) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§299.5. Procedure for making offset claims
* * *
B.
* * *
(2) The Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health shall
pay to the secretary a fee of four dollars for each offset claim.
* * *
§299.11. Ranking and priority of claims
If two or more agencies file offset claims with the secretary against an
individual's refund, the secretary shall remit the refund to the claimants if sufficient
funds exist in the following order with the first offset claim to be paid being
completely satisfied before a second or subsequent offset claim is paid:
* * *
(1) Claims of the division of support enforcement of the office of children
and family services child support of the Department of Children and Family
Services Louisiana Works.
* * *
(4) Claims reduced to judgment by any other office or facility within the
Department of Children and Family Services in priority order designated by the
secretary of that department, and then claims reduced to judgment by any office or
facility of the Louisiana Department of Health in priority order designated by the
secretary of that department.
* * *
§299.41. Ranking and priority of claims
* * *
B. If additional offset claims are filed with the secretary against an
individual's refund, the secretary shall rank the claims for child support in the same
Page 139 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
priority as claims filed by the division of support enforcement of the office children
and family services child support of the Department of Children and Family
Services Louisiana Works pursuant to R.S. 47:299.11(1).
* * *
§305.7. Exclusions and exemptions; intergovernmental; government
* * *
C. The following items shall be exempt from the sales and use tax imposed
by any taxing authority:
* * *
(2) Eligible food items authorized for purchase under the Women, Infants,
and Children's (WIC) Program as administered by the Louisiana Department of
Children and Family Services Health when the items are purchased with WIC
Program benefits.
* * *
§305.38. Exclusions and exemptions; sheltered workshop or supported employment
provider for persons with intellectual disabilities
The sale at retail, the use, the consumption, the distribution, and the storage
for use or consumption in this state of each item or article of tangible personal
property or digital products by a sheltered workshop or a supported employment
provider as defined in R.S. 39:1604.4 for persons with intellectual disabilities
licensed by the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health as
a day developmental training center for persons with intellectual disabilities shall not
be subject to the sales and use taxes levied by the state or by any political subdivision
thereof.
* * *
§463.112. Special prestige license plates; foster and adoptive parenting
* * *
C. The department shall collect an annual fee of twenty-five dollars for this
special prestige license plate, which shall be dedicated to the Louisiana Department
Page 140 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
of Children and Family Services Health, office of children and family services child
welfare, to be used solely for foster and adoptive parent recruitment activities. This
fee shall be in addition to the regular motor vehicle license fee provided in R.S.
47:463, and a handling fee of three dollars and fifty cents to be retained by the
department to offset a portion of administrative costs.
* * *
§1508. Confidentiality of tax records
* * *
B. Nothing contained in this Section shall be construed to prevent:
* * *
(23) The sharing or furnishing of, upon the request of the secretary of the
Department of Children and Family Services or her designee, the address and social
security number of the person designated by Department of Children and Family
Services Louisiana Works as an absent parent and any report required by R.S.
47:114.1 for the purpose of implementing the provisions of R.S. 46:236.1.1 et seq.,
the family and child support program.
* * *
§1676. Debt recovery
* * *
(4)
* * *
(d) The authorization provided for in this Paragraph shall not prime the claim
of the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works under the
provisions of R.S. 46:236.15(D) or R.S. 47:9026 to any payments of progressive slot
machine annuities or cash gaming winnings.
* * *
§1677. Financial institution data match
* * *
F.
Page 141 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
* * *
(5) At the discretion of the secretary, the department or office and the
Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works may enter into an
agreement to share the costs of reimbursement fees paid to financial institutions for
complying with financial institution data match laws pursuant to R.S. 46:236.1.4 or
this Section. As part of any such agreement, the department shall make
reimbursement out of current allocations.
* * *
§6003. Work-Based Learning Tax Credit
* * *
C. For purposes of this Section, the following terms shall have the meanings
ascribed to them in this Subsection:
* * *
(4) "Youth worker" means an individual who has attained the age of fifteen
but not yet attained the age of twenty-four; is unemployed prior to being hired by a
business that will apply for a credit authorized by this Section; will be working in a
full-time or part-time position that pays wages that are equivalent to the wages paid
for similar jobs, with adjustments for experience and training; and meets at least one
of the following criteria:
* * *
(i) Is currently or was in foster care, extended foster care, or the custody of
the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health.
* * *
§6028. Louisiana Youth Jobs Tax Credit Program
* * *
B. Definitions. For purposes of this Section:
* * *
(2) "Eligible youth" means an individual who:
* * *
Page 142 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
(d) Meets at least one of the following criteria:
* * *
(ix) Is currently or was in foster care, extended foster care, or the custody of
the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health.
* * *
§6042. Credits; qualifying foster care charitable organizations
* * *
E.
* * *
(2) The Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health shall,
on or before the thirty-first day of January of each calendar year, submit a report to
the secretary of the Department of Revenue listing all qualifying foster care
charitable organizations that held a valid, unsuspended license issued by the
Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health during the prior
calendar year. The report shall be in electronic format and contain the foster care
organization's name and federal employer identification number or Louisiana
Department of Revenue account number.
F. For purposes of this Section, the following words shall have the following
meanings unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
* * *
(3) "Qualified individual" means a child in a foster care placement program
established by the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health.
(4) "Qualifying foster care charitable organization" or "foster care
organization" means an organization licensed by the Louisiana Department of
Children and Family Services Health as a child placing agency to provide adoption
and foster care services.
* * *
§6102. Definitions
For purposes of this Chapter, the following terms shall have the following
Page 143 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
definitions:
* * *
(2) "Child care facility" means any entity that the state administrator of the
Child Care Development Fund determines is eligible to participate in the quality
rating system according to criteria set forth by rule adopted in the manner provided
for in R.S. 47:6103, has applied to the Louisiana Department of Children and
Family Services Health for evaluation under such system, and is participating in the
system.
* * *
§6105. Child care provider tax credit
A. There shall be a credit against any Louisiana income tax for a child care
provider. The tax credit shall be refundable as provided for in R.S. 47:6108. The tax
credit shall be an amount based upon the average monthly number of children who
either participate in the Child Care Assistance Program administered by the state
Department of Education or who are foster children in the custody of the Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services Health, and who are attending a child
care facility or facilities operated by the child care provider, multiplied by an amount
which shall be based upon the quality rating of each child care facility operated by
the child care provider as follows:
Quality Rating of Child Care FacilityTax Credit Per Eligible Child Attending
Five star $1,500
Four star $1,250
Three star $1,000
Two star $750
One star or nonparticipating facility 0
* * *
§9027. Assignment of deferred lottery annuity prizes
* * *
C. On the filing by the assignor or the assignee in the Nineteenth Judicial
Page 144 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
District Court of East Baton Rouge Parish of a petition seeking approval of a
voluntary assignment, the court shall issue an order approving a voluntary
assignment and directing the corporation to make prize payments as a whole or in
part to the assignee if the court finds all of the following:
* * *
(10) The petition required by this Subsection, shall be accompanied by a
certification from a representative of the Department of Children and Family
Services Louisiana Works, office of children and family services child support,
stating any of the following:
(a) That the assignor or assignee does not currently have a child support
arrearage, or the assignor or assignee does not owe an obligation to repay any public
assistance benefits or an overpayment of child support benefits to the Department of
Children and Family Services Louisiana Works.
(b) That the assignor or assignee does currently have a child support
obligation and that no arrearage is due to the Department of Children and Family
Services Louisiana Works.
(c) That the assignor or assignee does currently have a child support
arrearage, or the assignor or assignee does owe an obligation to repay any public
assistance benefits or an overpayment of child support benefits to the Department of
Children and Family Services Louisiana Works. The certification from the
Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works, office of children
and family services child support, shall be provided to the assignor and the assignee
promptly upon the request of the assignor or the assignee, and in no event more than
ten business days after said request is received by the Department of Children and
Family Services Louisiana Works, office of children and family services child
support.
* * *
Section 25. R.S. 49:121(E), 149.23, the introductory paragraph of 992(D)(2)(b),
992(D)(2)(b)(iii)(bb) and (9), 1212(B)(5), 1512(B), and 1513(1) and (4) are hereby amended
Page 145 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
and reenacted to read as follows:
§121. Name of board, department, or subdivisions; marking on boat or vehicle;
Louisiana public license plates; exemptions
* * *
E. Those vehicles used in crime prevention and detection and similar
investigative work, which if identified as required by this Section could not be used
effectively for such purposes, are exempt from the provisions of this Part, and, in
addition, the vehicles used by the governor, lieutenant governor, statewide elected
officials, the Louisiana School for the Deaf, the Louisiana School for the Visually
Impaired, the Special School District , and any community and group homes and
residential facilities administered by the Department of Children and Family
Services or the Louisiana Department of Health are exempt from the provisions of
this Part.
* * *
§149.23. Executive offices of the Department of Children and Family Services
Any floor of any state building upon which the executive offices office of
child welfare of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services are
Health is located shall be dedicated to the honor and memory of Mya George and
all victims of child abuse.
* * *
§992. Applicability; exemptions; attorney fees; court costs
* * *
D.
* * *
(2)
* * *
(b) This Subparagraph shall apply to the Louisiana Department of Health, the
Department of Children and Family Services, the Department of Education, and any
agency within these departments:
Page 146 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
* * *
(iii)
* * *
(bb) In Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) cases, if the
secretary of the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works
approves, rejects, or modifies the recommended decision of the division, that
approved, rejected, or modified decision shall be issued by the division as the final
decision of the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works.
* * *
(9) Adjudications filed pursuant to R.S. 46:51.2, involving a risk evaluation
panel decision, with the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services
Health shall be exempt from the provisions of this Chapter.
* * *
§1212. Louisiana Council on the Success of Black Men and Boys; creation;
domicile; membership
* * *
B. The council shall be comprised of twenty-one members as provided in this
Subsection and Subsection C of this Section:
* * *
(5) A representative of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health who has expertise in the needs of children appointed by the
secretary of the department.
* * *
§1512. Legislative intent
* * *
B. It is the intent of this Chapter that the Louisiana Department of Health,
state Department of Education, office of motor vehicles, Governor's Office of
Homeland Security and Emergency Preparedness, Department of Public Safety and
Corrections, Department of Children and Family Services, Department of Revenue,
Page 147 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
and Louisiana higher education institutions determine the legal status of individuals
receiving state services and benefits and to calculate and report the total dollar value
of services and benefits provided to individuals identified as "illegal aliens" or
"unaccompanied alien children" as defined by federal law.
§1513. Definitions
For the purposes of this Chapter:
(1) "Agency" means the Louisiana Department of Health, state Department
of Education, office of motor vehicles, Governor's Office of Homeland Security and
Emergency Preparedness, Department of Public Safety and Corrections, Department
of Children and Family Services, Department of Revenue, and Louisiana higher
education institutions.
* * *
(4) "State services and benefits" means all services and benefits provided by
the Louisiana Department of Health, state Department of Education, office of motor
vehicles, Governor's Office of Homeland Security and Emergency Preparedness,
Department of Public Safety and Corrections, Department of Children and Family
Services, Department of Revenue, and Louisiana higher education institutions,
including but not limited to healthcare, education, licenses, emergency assistance,
and tax benefits.
* * *
Section 26. The introductory paragraph of R.S. 51:1045.2(A), 1045.3(A), 1057(A)
and (C)(1) and 1442(4) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1045.2. Solutions to poverty initiative; coordination
A. The Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health shall
be in charge of coordinating the overall development and implementation of the
Governor's Solutions to Poverty Plan. The head of each of the following
departments, offices and commissions shall select a coordinator from within the
administration of each department, office or commission to work together to
formulate plans and propose legislation to implement the recommended solutions:
Page 148 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
* * *
§1045.3. Solutions to poverty initiative; implementation
A. The departments, offices and commissions listed in R.S. 51:1045.2 shall
plan to implement through feasibility studies, in those parishes listed in R.S.
51:1035(A), the solutions recommended by the Governor's Summit on Solutions to
Poverty as provided in this Section. The implementation plan and feasibility studies
shall be coordinated through the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health.
* * *
§1057. Empowering Families to Live Well Louisiana Council and implementation
plan
A. There is hereby established the Empowering Families to Live Well
Louisiana Council to assist and empower struggling families throughout Louisiana.
The council is hereby established within the Louisiana Department of Children and
Family Services Health which shall exercise and perform its powers, duties,
functions, and responsibilities in the manner provided for agencies transferred in
accordance with the provisions of applicable state law.
* * *
C.(1) The secretary of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health, or designee, and the chair of the Senate Committee on Health and
Welfare, or designee, shall serve as cochairs of the council.
* * *
§1442. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the
following meanings:
* * *
(4) "Department" means the Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works, office of children and family services, child support enforcement
section.
Page 149 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
* * *
Section 27. Code of Civil Procedure Art. 10(A)(1), 683(D), 732(D), 2785(5),
3601(B), 3603(C), and 4521(A)(3) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 10. Jurisdiction over status
A. A court which is otherwise competent under the laws of this state has
jurisdiction of the following actions or proceedings only under the following
conditions:
(1) An adoption proceeding in accordance with Title XII of the Children's
Code, if the surrendering parent of the child, a prospective adoptive parent, the
adoptive parent or parents, or any parent of the child has been domiciled in this state
for at least eight months, or if the child is in the custody of the Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services Health; and an adoption proceeding
in accordance with Civil Code Article 212, if either party to the adoption of an adult
is domiciled in this state.
* * *
Art. 683. Unemancipated minor
* * *
D. Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph A, B, or C of this Article, an
attorney appointed by the court having jurisdiction over an unemancipated minor
who is in the legal custody of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health is the proper plaintiff to sue to enforce a right of an unemancipated
minor. Upon application of the tutor or a person having parental authority who would
otherwise be the proper plaintiff to sue pursuant to Paragraph B or C of this Article,
the court shall appoint or substitute as the proper plaintiff the best qualified among
the tutor, a person having parental authority, or the appointed attorney.
* * *
Art. 732. Unemancipated minor
* * *
D. Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph A, B, or C of this Article, an
Page 150 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
attorney appointed by the court having jurisdiction over an unemancipated minor
who is in the legal custody of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health is the proper defendant in an action to enforce an obligation against
an unemancipated minor. Upon application of the tutor or person having parental
authority who would otherwise be the proper defendant to be sued pursuant to
Paragraph B or C of this Article, the court shall appoint or substitute as the proper
defendant the best qualified among the tutor, a person having parental authority, or
the appointed attorney.
* * *
Art. 2785. Definitions
For purposes of this Section:
* * *
(5) "Party to a support order" means the obligee of a support order, or the
state of Louisiana, Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works,
or similar agency of another jurisdiction or state when supplying support services as
defined in or substantially similar to R.S. 46:236.1(A)(7), or under the Uniform
Interstate Family Support Act (UIFSA), or in performance of its official duties under
Title IV, Subchapter D of the Social Security Act as stated in 45 C.F.R. 301.1.
* * *
Art. 3601. Injunction; grounds for issuance; preliminary injunction; temporary
restraining order
* * *
B. No court shall issue a temporary restraining order in cases where the
issuance shall stay or enjoin the enforcement of a child support order when the
Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works is providing
services, except for good cause shown by written reasons made a part of the record.
* * *
Art. 3603. Temporary restraining order; affidavit or affirmation of irreparable injury
and notification efforts
Page 151 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
* * *
C. No court shall issue a temporary restraining order in cases where the
issuance shall stay or enjoin the enforcement of a child support order when the
Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works is providing
services, except for good cause shown by written reasons made a part of the record.
* * *
Art. 4521. Payments to minor
A. In approving any proposal by which a minor is to be paid funds as the
result of a judgment or settlement, the court may order:
* * *
(3) That the funds be placed in trust in accordance with the Louisiana Trust
Code or, for a beneficiary who is disabled as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1382c(a)(3), in a
trust qualified under 42 U.S.C. 1396p(d)(4)(C) in accordance with the law of any
state. The trust instrument shall name the minor as sole beneficiary of the trust, shall
name a trustee, shall impose maximum spendthrift restraints, and may allow the trust
to last for the lifetime of the beneficiary. Except for trusts qualified under 42 U.S.C.
1396p(d)(4)(A) or 1396p(d)(4)(C), the trust shall, however, be subject to termination
at the option of the beneficiary upon attaining the age of majority. If the minor fails
to attain majority, the trust shall be subject to termination at the option of his heirs
or legatees. The court shall not order funds that will be paid to an unemancipated
minor who is in the legal custody of the Louisiana Department of Children and
Family Services Health to be placed in trust if the amount of the judgment or
settlement is less than fifty thousand dollars.
* * *
Section 28. Code of Evidence Art. 902(10) is hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
Art. 902. Self-authentication
Extrinsic evidence of authenticity as a condition precedent to admissibility
is not required with respect to the following:
Page 152 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
* * *
(10) Labor reports. A copy of a report from the Louisiana Workforce
Commission, or from any state or federal reporting agency, which is in the
possession of a field officer of the support enforcement services program, office of
children and family services child support, Department of Children and Family
Services, Louisiana Works introduced as evidence in any child or spousal support
proceeding. "Field officer" means any person designated or authorized as a field
officer pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 46:236.1.8.
Section 29. Children's Code Art. 308(A), 311(B)(1)(b), 323(2), 324(A)(1) and (3),
328.1(C), 405(G), 412(D)(2), 436(3)(a), 441(A)(3), 512(B)(1), 522(A)(2), 523(D)(2),
544(A)(1), 581(A)(1), 603(11), (13), and (17)(o), 603.1(B), 608(A)(1), 609(A)(3)(a),
610(A)(1), (4)(a), (5), (D), and (H)(5), 612(G), 615(E)(1) and (2), 631(A), the heading of
Children's Code Art. 645, 672(A)(1), 672.2(C), the introductory paragraph of 672.3(A),
672.3(A)(5), (B), (D), and (E), 725, 725.1(1), 725.4, the heading of Children's Code Art.
725.5, the introductory paragraph of 730, 731(C)(5), 745(C), 749(A)(5), 767.1(C), 791.3(B),
811.1(F) and (G), 822(B), 1003(2) and (6), 1036.2(E), 1103(1) and (4), 1109, 1117,
1122(B)(9) and (11) and (F), 1127.1(D), 1150(1), 1152(C)(3), 1169(1) and (4), 1180(C),
1182, 1186(B), 1200(B) and (H), 1201(C), the introductory paragraph of 1223(B), 1223(H),
1223.1(C), 1269.3(F), 1270(B), 1274, the heading of Chapter 16 of the Children's Code,
1281.3(1) and (4), 1282.5, 1283.2(H), 1283.3(C), 1283.16, 1284.5, 1285.2(H), 1285.3(C),
1285.16, 1301.3, 1303.10, 1307.3, the introductory paragraph of 1307.4(A), 1307.5(D),
1307.8(C)(2), 1351(4), 1427(C)(1)(c) and (2), 1515(A)(7) and (B), the introductory
paragraph of 1517(E), 1518(B), 1519, 1567(B), and 1641(A) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 308. Authority of courts to refer child abuse, neglect
A. Whenever any court of this state in the trial of any proceeding has cause
to believe that a child's physical or mental health or welfare is endangered by abuse
or neglect, it may report and refer the charges to the local child protection unit of the
Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health in accordance with
Page 153 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
Article 610.
* * *
Art. 311. Juvenile jurisdiction over adults; support proceedings; coexistent orders
* * *
B.(1) A court exercising juvenile jurisdiction shall have concurrent
jurisdiction, except in East Baton Rouge Parish, in the following cases involving
support of family:
* * *
(b) Proceedings brought by the district attorney or the Department of
Children and Family Services Louisiana Works to establish paternity or to establish,
modify, or enforce support pursuant to provisions of R.S. 46:236.1.1 et seq., and
Children's Code Article 1301.1 et seq.
* * *
Art. 323. Definitions
* * *
(2) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health.
* * *
Art. 324. Authorization
A. A court exercising juvenile jurisdiction may require that a statement of a
protected person be recorded on videotape in conformity with Article 326 by any of
the following:
(1) Motion of the court or motion of the district attorney, a parish welfare unit
or agency, the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health, or
a child advocacy center operating in the judicial district.
* * *
(3) Execution of a written protocol between the court and law enforcement
agencies, a parish welfare unit or agency, the Louisiana Department of Children and
Family Services Health, or a child advocacy center operating in the judicial district
Page 154 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
that authorizes the videotaping of any protected person without the necessity of the
issuance of an order by the court in any individual case.
* * *
Art. 328.1. Admissibility in civil, family, and administrative proceedings; discovery;
confidentiality
* * *
C. Nothing in this Article is intended to restrict the ability of the Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services Health or law enforcement from
sharing information as authorized or required by state or federal law.
* * *
Art. 405. Court or witness fees; travel expenses
* * *
G. In all cases in which support rights have been assigned to the Department
of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works as a condition of eligibility for
Family Independence Temporary Assistance Program (FITAP) and in all civil,
criminal, or juvenile support proceedings initiated by the department on its own
behalf or on behalf of a non-FITAP applicant, the provisions of R.S. 46:236.1.1 et
seq. shall apply as to imposition of a collection fee against the person owing the
support obligation.
* * *
Art. 412. Confidentiality of records; disclosure exceptions; sanctions
* * *
D. When such information is relevant and necessary to the performance of
their respective duties and enhances services to the child or his family, the court may
authorize the release of records, reports, or certain information contained therein,
limited to the specific purpose for which the court authorizes release, to appropriate
individuals who represent any of the following when they are providing services to
the child whose records are disclosed during the pendency of the matter about which
the records are disclosed:
Page 155 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
* * *
(2) The Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works.
* * *
Art. 436. Definitions
* * *
(3) "Mediation parties" means:
(a) In a child in need of care proceeding, a representative of the Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services Health, the parent, and the child.
* * *
Art. 441. Confidentiality
A. All oral and written communications and records made during the
mediation of a juvenile proceeding are not subject to disclosure and may not be used
as evidence in any judicial or administrative proceeding unless:
* * *
(3) Whenever the mediator has cause to believe that a child's physical or
mental health or welfare is endangered by abuse or neglect, he shall report and refer
the charges to the local child protection unit of the Louisiana Department of
Children and Family Services Health in accordance with Article 610.
* * *
Art. 512. Composition of the multidisciplinary investigative team
* * *
B. Governmental entities that have responsibilities imposed by law for the
investigation of child abuse include:
(1) The office of children and family services child welfare, Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services Health.
* * *
Art. 522. Applicability
A. A child advocacy center is established and becomes subject to the
provisions of this Chapter when all of the following have been accomplished:
Page 156 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
* * *
(2) An agreement to use the services of a child advocacy center has been
executed by representatives of the district attorney, the office of children and family
services, child welfare, Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services
Health, the coroner, the sheriff, and any other law enforcement agency having
responsibility in the district for the investigation of child abuse.
* * *
Art. 523. Governance of child advocacy centers; board of directors; bylaws; staff
* * *
D.
* * *
(2) The board shall also cause the sheriff and the Louisiana Department of
Children and Family Services Health to request that the Louisiana Bureau of
Criminal Identification and Information conduct an examination of the criminal
history record and identification files of the bureau for any applicant seeking
employment at a child advocacy center. The sheriff and the department shall provide
a written certificate indicating whether any information was discovered or that no
information was found, all in accordance with the applicable rules and regulations
promulgated by the department.
* * *
Art. 544. Request for information; order for release
A.(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any state
agency providing services to children and their families, which shall include but is
not limited to the Louisiana Department of Health, the Department of Children and
Family Services Louisiana Works, youth services of the Department of Public
Safety and Corrections, and the Department of Education, and any city, parish, or
other local public school board is hereby authorized to request in writing, which shall
include but shall not be limited to an email or electronic communication, from any
other state agency or city, parish, or other local public school board any information,
Page 157 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
data, reports, or records in its possession which are relevant and necessary to the
performance of the requesting agency's duties to children and their families. This
written request shall include the specific purpose for which the information, data,
reports, or records are being requested.
* * *
Art. 581. Child Protection Representation Commission; establishment; purpose and
functions
A. The Child Protection Representation Commission, referred to hereinafter
as the "commission", is hereby established for the purpose of reviewing the system
of representation of children and indigent parents in child protection cases as
provided in Chapters 5 and 6 of this Title. The commission shall be composed of the
following members:
(1) The secretary of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health or his designee.
* * *
Art. 603. Definitions
As used in this Title:
* * *
(11) "Court-appointed or court-approved administrative body" means a body
appointed or approved by a court and subject to the court's supervision for the
purposes of assisting the court with permanency hearings, including magistrates or
other court or noncourt personnel. This body shall not be a part of the Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services Health or the Department of Public
Safety and Corrections, nor subject to the supervision or direction of either
department.
* * *
(13) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health.
* * *
Page 158 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
(17) "Mandatory reporter" is any of the following individuals:
* * *
(o) Any employee of the office of juvenile justice or the Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services Health, whose duties include
supervisory or disciplinary authority over children.
* * *
Art. 603.1. Required education; reporting child abuse
* * *
B. Teaching or child care providers as defined by Article 603 shall complete
an online training course provided by the Louisiana Department of Children and
Family Services Health between June first and August thirty-first annually. A record
of completion of the course by the teaching or child care provider shall be provided
to each entity at which the teaching or child care provider is employed. No later than
September thirtieth of each year and in a manner prescribed by the state Department
of Education each entity at which a teaching or child care provider is employed shall
submit a list to the state Department of Education of all teaching and child care
providers employed by the entity and identify the employees that have complied with
the training requirements and those employees that have not complied. The state
Department of Education shall publish the completion rates for each entity on its
website.
* * *
Art. 608. Parents' right to counsel; payment
A. The parents of a child who is the subject of a child in need of care
proceeding shall be entitled to qualified, independent counsel after the court issues
any order in accordance with Article 619(C) or 620 or at the filing of a petition and
at all stages of the proceedings thereafter. If the court does not issue an order in
accordance with Article 619(C) or 620, the right to counsel shall attach upon the
filing of a petition. At all proceedings governed by Chapter 6 of this Title, the
parents shall be presumed to be indigent. Thereafter, indigence shall be determined
Page 159 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
in accordance with Article 320. The right to counsel may be waived by a parent if
the court determines that the parent choosing to waive the right to representation has
been instructed by the court about the rights and the possible consequences of
waiver. Before accepting a waiver of counsel, the court shall ensure each of the
following:
(1) The parent has been informed by the court that the Louisiana Department
of Children and Family Services Health cannot provide legal advice to the parent or
represent the parent's interest.
* * *
Art. 609. Mandatory and permitted reporting; training requirements
A. With respect to mandatory reporters:
* * *
(3)(a) To familiarize mandatory reporters, as defined by Children's Code
Article 603, with their legal mandate for reporting suspected child abuse and neglect,
such mandatory reporters shall be offered training on the statutory requirements and
responsibility of reporting child abuse and neglect. This training shall be made
available by the child welfare division of the Louisiana Department of Children and
Family Services Health or any other mechanism as approved by the department as
long as it includes information on the reporting procedure and the consequences of
failing to report.
* * *
Art. 610. Reporting procedure; reports to the legislature and the United States
Department of Defense Family Advocacy Program
A. A reporter shall immediately report suspected child abuse or neglect or
that child abuse or neglect was a contributing factor in a child's death in the
following ways:
(1) To the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health
if the reporter has reason to believe that the perpetrator is any of the following:
* * *
Page 160 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
(4) Reports to the department shall be made as follows:
(a) A mandatory reporter shall make a report of suspected abuse or neglect
requiring immediate assistance via the designated state child protection reporting
hotline telephone number. A report of suspected abuse or neglect which is of a
nonemergency nature may be reported via the Louisiana Department of Children and
Family Services Health Mandated Reporter Portal online. Reports may also be made
in person at any child welfare office.
* * *
(5) If a school resource officer suspects child abuse or neglect of a student or
if a mandatory reporter reports suspected child abuse or neglect to a school resource
officer, the school resource officer shall immediately notify the officer's employing
law enforcement agency or the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health in accordance with the provisions of this Article. The school
resource officer's employer shall assign investigation of the matter to the most
appropriate law enforcement officer, who may be the school resource officer.
* * *
D. If the initial report was in oral form by a mandatory reporter, it shall be
followed by a written report made within five days via the online Mandated Reporter
Portal of the department or by mail to the centralized intake unit of the department
at the address provided on the website of the department; or, if necessary, to the local
law enforcement agency. The reporter may use a form for the written report, which
shall be developed, approved, and made available by the Louisiana Department of
Children and Family Services Health. The form is optional and may be available
electronically on the department's website.
* * *
H.
* * *
(5) Any sexual abuse cases in which the alleged perpetrator is a child shall
be referred to the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health.
Page 161 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
The department shall assess the family of the child victim and the alleged child
perpetrator to ensure child safety and well-being in accordance with Children's Code
Article 612(A)(3).
* * *
Art. 612. Assignment of reports for investigation and assessment
* * *
G. The Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health shall
set priorities for case response and allocate staff resources to cases identified by
reporters as presenting immediate substantial risk of harm to children. Absent
evidence of willful or intentional misconduct or gross negligence in carrying out the
investigative functions of the state child protection program, caseworkers,
supervisors, program managers, and agency heads shall be immune from civil and
criminal liability in any legal action arising from the department's decisions made
relative to the setting of priorities for cases and targeting of staff resources.
* * *
Art. 615. Disposition of reports
* * *
E. When after the investigation of a report, the determination is made that the
report is inconclusive or unsubstantiated, as provided in Subparagraphs (B)(4) and
(5) of this Article, the files, records, and pertinent information regarding the report
and investigation shall be strictly confidential, shall not become part of the central
registry except as otherwise provided in Subparagraph (1) of this Paragraph or in
Article 616(F), shall not be disclosed or ordered to be produced in conjunction with
any legal proceeding or other matter except as provided in Subparagraph (4) of this
Paragraph, and shall be maintained only for the following purposes:
(1) The files, records, and information shall remain unsealed and shall be
maintained for the exclusive use of child protective services, to assist in future risk
and safety assessments. The Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services
Health shall maintain all files and records for seven years from the date of the
Page 162 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
determination, unless a subsequent inconclusive or unsubstantiated report is received
during that period. In that case, information from all such reports will be maintained
until the youngest child in the alleged victim's family attains the age of eighteen
years or seven years from the date of the latest determination, whichever is longer.
If information from an inconclusive or unsubstantiated report is used as a part of the
basis for a later, related, and substantiated report, the earlier report shall become part
of the file of the substantiated report and shall cease to be a separate report.
(2) All files, records, and information shall be admissible in any civil
litigation or criminal proceeding against the Louisiana Department of Children and
Family Services Health or its employees wherein work performance or conduct is
at issue. They shall remain confidential and be placed under seal by the court to
prevent disclosure to the public. The department shall maintain the files, records and
information during the pendency of the litigation or prosecution.
* * *
Art. 631. Authority to file petition; custody
A. A child in need of care proceeding shall be commenced by petition filed
by the district attorney. The Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services
Health, when authorized by the court, may file a petition if there are reasonable
grounds to believe that the child is a child in need of care.
* * *
Art. 645. Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health to provide
information concerning the parents' location; cooperation of the
department
* * *
Art. 672. Care and treatment by department
A.(1) Whenever custody of a child is assigned to the Louisiana Department
of Children and Family Services Health, the child shall be assigned to the custody
of the department rather than to a particular placement setting. The department shall
have authority over the placement within its resources and the allocation of other
Page 163 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
available resources within the department for children judicially committed to its
custody.
* * *
Art. 672.2. Local educational agencies; children placed in group homes and
residential facilities
* * *
C. Beginning with applications received on July 1, 1999, and thereafter, upon
receipt of an application for initial licensure by the Louisiana Department of
Children and Family Services Health from an applicant which seeks to provide child
residential care, or emergency shelter to children of school age, the Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services Health shall provide written
notification to the Department of Education of such application for initial licensure
within thirty days of receipt of such application, including the parish where the
facility seeks to operate.
* * *
Art. 672.3. Diligent search for relatives; notice; failure to respond
A. Whenever custody of a child is assigned to the Louisiana Department of
Children and Family Services Health, the department shall conduct a diligent search
for adult relatives of the child and for persons who have a significant relationship
with the child. The diligent search shall be completed no later than thirty days from
the date the child was taken into custody and include, at a minimum, all of the
following:
* * *
(5) Comprehensive searches of databases and other resources available to the
Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health, which may include
searches of schools, employment, residence, utilities, vehicle registration, child
support enforcement, law enforcement, and corrections records or any other records
likely to result in identifying and locating adult relatives of the child or persons who
have a significant relationship with the child.
Page 164 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
* * *
B. The Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health shall
file with the court information regarding attempts made pursuant to Paragraph A of
this Article ten days before any scheduled disposition, case review, permanency
hearing, or as otherwise required by the court. Any additional information obtained
by the department subsequent to the initial filing shall be disclosed to the court
during the hearing.
* * *
D. After the completion of the diligent search required by this Article, the
Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health shall have a
continuing duty to search for relatives or other persons who have demonstrated an
ongoing commitment to a child and with whom it may be appropriate to place the
child until the relatives or persons are located, the court excuses the department from
conducting a diligent search, or permanency is achieved.
E. If a relative entitled to notice pursuant to this Article fails, after ninety
days from the date the relative receives the required notice, to demonstrate an
interest in and willingness to provide a permanent home for a child, the court may
excuse the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health from
considering the relative as a placement.
* * *
Art. 725. Findings and purpose
The legislature finds that arresting, prosecuting, and incarcerating victimized
children serves to re-traumatize them and to increase their feelings of low self-
esteem, which only makes the process of recovery more difficult. Both federal and
international law recognize that sexually exploited children are the victims of crime
and should be treated as such. Therefore, sexually exploited children should not be
prosecuted for criminal acts related to prostitution. Instead, sexually exploited
children should, where possible, be diverted into services that address the needs of
these children outside of the justice system. Sexually exploited children deserve the
Page 165 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
protection of child welfare services, including diversion, crisis intervention,
counseling, and emergency housing services. The purpose of this Chapter is to
protect a child from further victimization after the child is discovered to be a
sexually exploited child by ensuring that a child protective response is in place in the
state. This is to be accomplished by presuming that any child engaged in prostitution,
prostitution by massage, or crime against nature by solicitation is a victim of sex
trafficking and providing these children with the appropriate care and services where
possible. In determining the need for and capacity of services that may be provided,
the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health shall recognize
that sexually exploited children have separate and distinct service needs according
to gender, and every effort should be made to ensure these children are not
prosecuted or treated as juvenile delinquents, but instead are given the appropriate
social services.
Art. 725.1. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms and phrases shall have the
following meaning, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health.
* * *
Art. 725.4. Duties of law enforcement
The officer shall notify the Louisiana Victim Outreach of the Department of
Public Safety and Corrections that the child may be eligible for special services and,
as a mandatory reporter as required by Article 610, shall notify the Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services Health that the child is in need of
protective services.
Art. 725.5. Duties of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services
Health
* * *
Art. 730. Grounds
Page 166 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
Allegations that a family is in need of services must assert whether the child
is currently under the supervision of any state or local entity including, but not
limited to, the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health or the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections, youth services, the office of juvenile
justice, and assert one or more of the following grounds:
* * *
Art. 731. Complaint
* * *
C. The complaint shall set forth with specificity:
* * *
(5) Whether the child is currently under the supervision of any state or local
entity, including but not limited to, the Louisiana Department of Children and
Family Services Health or the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, youth
services, or the office of juvenile justice.
* * *
Art. 745. Effect of informal family services plan agreement; confidentiality
* * *
C. Any incriminating statement made by the child, caretaker, or other family
member during discussions or conferences incident to the informal family services
plan agreement shall not be used against the declarant, over objection, in an
adjudication hearing or criminal trial. Any such statement may be reported as the
basis for a referral to the local child protection unit of the Louisiana Department of
Children and Family Services Health in accordance with Article 610, if it causes the
intake officer to believe that a child's physical or mental health or welfare is
endangered by abuse or neglect. Any such statement may be used in a disposition
hearing in the juvenile court or for the purpose of a presentence investigation after
a criminal conviction.
* * *
Art. 749. Contents of petition
Page 167 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
A. The petition shall set forth with specificity:
* * *
(5) A statement as to whether the child is currently under the supervision of
any state or local entity, including but not limited to, the Louisiana Department of
Children and Family Services Health or the Department of Public Safety and
Corrections, youth services, or the office of juvenile justice.
* * *
Art. 767.1. Federal Indian Child Welfare Act inquiry
* * *
C. If a tribe fails to respond to multiple requests for verification that the child
is an Indian child and the court or Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health has sought the assistance of the Bureau of Indian Affairs in
contacting the tribe, the court may make the determination that the child is not an
Indian child based on the information it has available and proceed to adjudication in
accordance with this Title.
* * *
Art. 791.3. State, state agencies; participation
* * *
B. The state is obligated to provide certain social and health care services to
needy families through the Department of Children and Family Services and the
Louisiana Department of Health. These services for assessment and psychiatric
evaluation and treatment, if deemed needed, must be continued. The state substance
abuse clinics, through its employees and contracted programs, shall accept referrals
for substance abuse evaluation and treatment if warranted. The legislature recognizes
that each parish included in this Chapter has committed through binding interagency
agreements to provide certain enumerated services, including providing physical
space. This commitment by the parishes is predicated on financial assistance from
the state in order to fully comply with the creation of truancy assessment service
centers. Additionally, in order to support each truancy assessment service center with
Page 168 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
sufficient services pursuant to this Chapter, the state will continue to provide social
and health related services where available.
* * *
Art. 811.1. Rights of the victim of alleged delinquent act
* * *
F.(1) In order to protect the identity and provide for the safety and welfare
of juvenile crime victims under the age of eighteen years, all public officials and
officers and public agencies, including but not limited to all law enforcement
agencies, sheriffs, district attorneys, judicial officers, clerks of court, and the
Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health or any division
thereof, shall not publicly disclose the name, address, or identity of a juvenile victim
of crime who at the time of the commission of the offense is under eighteen years of
age. The public disclosure of the name of the juvenile crime victim by any public
official or officer or public agency is not prohibited by this Subparagraph when the
crime resulted in the death of the victim.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, all public
officials, officers, and public agencies, including but not limited to all law
enforcement agencies, sheriffs, district attorneys, judicial officers, clerks of court,
and the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health or any
division thereof, charged with the responsibility of knowing the name, address, and
identity of juvenile crime victims as a necessary part of their duties shall have full
and complete access to this information regarding a juvenile crime victim, and they
may lawfully utilize initials, abbreviations, or other forms of indefinite descriptions
on all public documents used in the performance of their duties to whatever extent
they deem necessary, to prevent the public disclosure of the name, address, or
identity of a juvenile victim of crime under the age of eighteen years.
G.(1) In order to protect the identity and provide for the safety and welfare
of juvenile crime victims under the age of seventeen years, all public officials and
officers and public agencies, including but not limited to all law enforcement
Page 169 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
agencies, sheriffs, district attorneys, judicial officers, clerks of court, and the
Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health or any division
thereof, shall not publicly disclose the name, address, or identity of a juvenile victim
of crime who at the time of the commission of the offense is under seventeen years
of age. The public disclosure of the name of the juvenile crime victim by any public
official or officer or public agency is not prohibited by this Subparagraph when the
crime resulted in the death of the victim.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, all public
officials, officers, and public agencies, including but not limited to all law
enforcement agencies, sheriffs, district attorneys, judicial officers, clerks of court,
and the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health or any
division thereof, charged with the responsibility of knowing the name, address and
identity of juvenile crime victims as a necessary part of their duties shall have full
and complete access to this information regarding a juvenile crime victim and they
may lawfully utilize initials, abbreviations, or other forms of indefinite descriptions
on all public documents used in the performance of their duties to whatever extent
they deem necessary, to prevent the public disclosure of the name, address, or
identity of a juvenile victim of crime under the age of seventeen years.
* * *
Art. 822. Place of continued custody prior to adjudication
* * *
B. The court shall not place a child alleged to be delinquent in the custody of
either the department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Department of
Health or the department Department of Public Safety and Corrections prior to
adjudication.
* * *
Art. 1003. Definitions
As used in this Title:
* * *
Page 170 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
(2) "Agency" shall include the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health, the corresponding department of any other state, and those private
agencies and institutions licensed for the placement of children for adoption by the
Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health or by the
corresponding department of any other state.
* * *
(6) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health.
* * *
Art. 1036.2. Incarcerated parent; duties; assessment
* * *
E. The notification form given to the incarcerated parent shall be substantially
as follows:
NOTICE OF DUTY TO PROVIDE A REASONABLE PLAN FOR THE
APPROPRIATE CARE OF YOUR CHILD AND TERMINATION OF
PARENTAL RIGHTS LAW
N O T I C E T O P A R E N T : Y O U R
CHILD(REN),___________________________ HAS/HAVE BEEN PLACED IN
THE CUSTODY OF THE LOUISIANA DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN AND
FAMILY SERVICES HEALTH BY ORDER OF THE
________________________ Parish juvenile court _______________________ on
______________________.
PLEASE BE ADVISED OF THE FOLLOWING:
Louisiana law provides that you may name a person who is willing and able
to serve as the custodian of your child(ren) and to offer a wholesome and stable
environment for your child(ren). Failure to furnish a reasonable plan for the
appropriate care of your child(ren) may result in the termination of your parental
rights.
Please refer to Louisiana Children's Code, Title X, Articles 1001 to 1043,
Page 171 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
especially Articles 1015(6) and 1036(E), for the details of Louisiana law regarding
the termination of parental rights. A copy of the law is attached to this notice.
You are hereby notified that Louisiana law requires that you provide a
reasonable plan for the appropriate care of your child(ren), other than continued
foster care, within sixty (60) days of your receipt of this notice, which date is
_________________________. Your plan shall include the names, addresses,
cellular numbers, telephone numbers, and other contact information of every suitable
alternative caregiver. You may provide additional information by filling out this
form and mailing it in the stamped, self-addressed envelope given to you by the
department before ______________________. If you fail or refuse to do so, you may
lose all rights to your child(ren). Your plan will be examined to determine if it is
reasonable and appropriate. Please provide your plan in detail no later than
____________________________________ to the following person:
NAME: ____________________________________________
ADDRESS: _________________________________________
CITY/STATE/ZIP: ___________________________________
TELEPHONE: ______________________________________
NOTE: IF YOU HAVE ANY QUESTIONS OR NEED ANY ASSISTANCE,
CONTACT THE ABOVE PERSON OR YOUR ATTORNEY IMMEDIATELY.
Copy of the law, La. Ch.C. Arts. 1001 - 1043, Attached. PLEASE READ.
I, ____________________________________, hereby certify that a copy of this
notice with La. Ch.C. Arts. 1001-1043 attached, was delivered to
___________________________ on __________________________________ by
personal delivery at the following location _____________________________.
DATE:________________________________
______________________________________
Signature of caseworker
I, __________________________________, have received a copy of this notice,
together with the attached laws (La. Ch.C. Arts. 1001-1043), and acknowledge that
Page 172 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
I understand fully that my rights may be terminated and my child(ren) adopted by
others if I do not provide a reasonable plan of appropriate care while I am
incarcerated, other than continued foster care, within sixty (60) days of my receipt
of this notice on _____________________.
______________________________________
Signature of parent
Witness: ____________________________ Date: ______________
* * *
Art. 1103. Definitions
As used in this Title:
(1) "Agency" includes the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health, the corresponding department of any other state, and those private
agencies and institutions licensed for the placement of children for adoption by the
Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health or by the
corresponding department of any other state.
* * *
(4) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health.
* * *
Art. 1109. Domiciliary requirements
A surrendering parent must be domiciled in this state for at least eight
months, unless a prospective adoptive parent has been domiciled in this state for at
least eight months, or the child is in the custody of the Louisiana Department of
Children and Family Services Health.
* * *
Art. 1117. Domiciliary requirements; acceptance of surrender
A. If a surrendering parent is not domiciled in this state, then the agency shall
be domiciled in this state or be accepting the surrender of a child who is in the
custody of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health.
Page 173 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
B. In order for a surrender to an agency to be effective, the agency accepting
the surrender shall either be the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health or have been issued a child-placing or adoption license by the
department.
* * *
Art. 1122. Contents of surrender; form
* * *
B. The Act of Surrender shall also recite the following declarations:
* * *
(9) That either a surrendering parent, the agency accepting the surrender, or
the adoptive parents are domiciled in this state, or that the child is in the custody of
the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health.
* * *
(11) In an adoption arranged by the Louisiana Department of Children and
Family Services Health, that the execution of the surrender is made without
conditions of any kind. Failure to comply with any formal or informal agreement for
post-adoption continuing contact shall not nullify the surrender nor constitute cause
for its revocation.
* * *
F. The Act of Surrender for a surrendering mother shall contain the
requirements in substantially the following form:
"VOLUNTARY ACT OF SURRENDER FOR ADOPTION
(FOR A SURRENDERING MOTHER OF A CHILD)
STATE OF LOUISIANA
PARISH OF (NAME OF PARISH)
BEFORE ME, the undersigned notary public, and in the presence of the two
undersigned competent witnesses who are over the age of eighteen, personally came
and appeared:
(NAME OF SURRENDERING MOTHER)
Page 174 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
a female of the age of (AGE), who is (MARITAL STATUS), and domiciled in the
Parish of (NAME OF PARISH), who being first duly sworn, did depose and state:
(1) She is the mother of (CHILD'S NAME), born on (DATE OF BIRTH) in
the (PARISH/COUNTY OF BIRTH), State of (STATE OF BIRTH).
(2) She was married at the birth or conception of the child, or has married
subsequent to the child's birth and her husband has acknowledged his paternity of the
child. The husband's name is (HUSBAND'S NAME) and his last known address was
(ADDRESS OR UNKNOWN).
OR
She was not married at the birth or conception of the child, nor has she, subsequent
to the child's birth, married any man who has acknowledged his paternity of the
child. To the best of her knowledge, the alleged father has/has not executed an act
of acknowledgment/a registration with the putative father registry that admitted his
paternity of this child. He has/has not informally acknowledged his paternity of this
child. His paternity of this child has/has not been established by court judgment.
(3) The other natural/alleged father of the child is (FATHER'S NAME), and
his last known address was (ADDRESS OR UNKNOWN).
(4) The agency to whom this child is hereby surrendered is (NAME OF
PERSON, AGENCY OR REPRESENTATIVE), whose address is (ADDRESS), who
hereby accepts this surrender is domiciled in this state. The (NAME OF AGENCY)
declares that he has no knowledge of any question concerning the parent's capacity
to execute a surrender that has not been resolved by the court pursuant to Article
1130.1.
OR
If the surrender is for private adoption, the Person or Representative to whom
this child is hereby surrendered is (NAME OF PERSON OR REPRESENTATIVE),
whose address is (ADDRESS), hereby accepts this surrender from a surrendering
parent who is domiciled in this state or on behalf of adoptive parents domiciled in
this state. (NAME OF PERSON OR REPRESENTATIVE) declares that he has no
Page 175 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
knowledge of any question concerning the parent's capacity to execute a surrender
that has not been resolved by the court pursuant to Article 1130.1.
(5) The court in which this surrender is to be filed is (NAME OF JUVENILE
COURT) located in (CITY AND PARISH OF COURT) and that said court has
jurisdiction over the status of the child by virtue of either a surrendering parent, a
prospective adoptive parent, or a legal guardian being domiciled in this state, or that
the child is in the custody of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health.
(6) Affiant declares that this Act of Surrender is not being executed earlier
than the third day following the birth of the child for agency adoptions or the fifth
day following the birth of the child in a surrender for private adoption.
(7) Affiant declares that she has no mental incapacity and is under no
interdiction.
(8) Affiant declares that she has been informed and understands that her
rights as a parent of the child are permanently and irrevocably terminated by
execution of this Act of Surrender; however, she understands that it may be declared
null due to fraud or duress and may be dissolved if the adoption cannot be
accomplished.
(9)(a) Affiant declares that she freely and voluntarily surrenders custody of
the child for the purpose of placement and adoption.
(b) Affiant declares that she has been informed and understands that it is
unlawful to willfully and knowingly make a written or oral false statement about the
biological paternity of a child and has been advised that the penalties for such falsity
are either a fine of ten thousand dollars or imprisonment for not more than five years,
or both.
(10) Affiant declares that she consents to an adoption, which consent is final
and irrevocable upon execution of this surrender.
(11) Affiant declares that she waives notice of the filing and service of any
pleading of any sort in any subsequent adoption proceeding regarding the child
Page 176 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
surrendered.
(12) Affiant declares that she has been informed of the provisions of the
voluntary registration law, whereby contact may be established with the surrendered
child upon the child's reaching the age of eighteen years if both the surrendering
parent and the adopted person register and fulfill all registration requirements.
(13) Affiant declares that she has attended a minimum of two pre-surrender
counseling sessions relative to this surrender of her child for adoption.
(14) Affiant declares that she has been informed and fully advised of the
provisions of R.S. 14:125.2 and the penalties provided therein by an attorney, other
than the attorney, associate, partner, shareholder, or employee of the attorney's law
firm or corporation for the prospective adoptive parent.
(ADDITIONAL DECLARATION IF THE SURRENDER IS FOR AN
AGENCY ADOPTION ARRANGED BY THE LOUISIANA DEPARTMENT OF
CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES HEALTH)
(15) Affiant declares that the execution of this surrender is made without
conditions of any kind. Failure to comply with any formal or informal agreement for
post-adoption continuing contact will not nullify the surrender nor constitute cause
for revocation.
(ADDITIONAL DECLARATIONS IF THE SURRENDER IS FOR A
PRIVATE ADOPTION)
(16) Affiant declares that she is eighteen years of age or older.
OR
Affiant declares that she is under the age of eighteen and that (NAME OF
PARENTS OR TUTOR) join in this surrender.
OR
Affiant declares that she is under the age of eighteen and that (NAME OF
JUVENILE COURT) located in (CITY AND PARISH OF COURT) has given its
written consent for her surrender.
(17) Affiant declares that she has consulted with and been fully advised by
Page 177 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
an attorney other than the attorney for the prospective adoptive parents about the
meaning of these declarations and the consequences of this Act of Surrender.
(18) Affiant declares that she does or does not wish to be notified of the
hearing of any opposition to the adoption filed pursuant to Article 1137.
(19) Affiant declares that she does or does not wish the future release of
identifying information in the event of a medical necessity for which information is
needed in order to treat the child.
(20) Affiant declares that she has been informed and understands that the
Statement of Family History will be given to the adoptive parents at the time of
placement and made available, upon request, to the adopted person at the age of
eighteen years or older.
Sworn to, signed, and notarized, after being carefully read and explained to
(NAME OF SURRENDERING PARENT) in the presence of the undersigned notary
and witnesses on this _____ day of ____________, 20__.
WITNESSES:
_________________________
_________________________
(If agency adoption:)
_______________________________________
SURRENDERING MOTHER
_______________________________________
AGENCY REPRESENTATIVE
(If private adoption:)
_______________________________________
SURRENDERING MOTHER
_______________________________________
ATTORNEY FOR SURRENDERING MOTHER
________________________________________
ADOPTING PARENTS
Page 178 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
OR
_________________________________________
ATTORNEY FOR ADOPTING PARENTS
(if anonymity to be protected)
(Additional signature(s) in private adoption if the surrendering mother is a minor
_________________________________________
PARENT(S)/TUTOR OF MINOR
SURRENDERING MOTHER)
_________________________________________
NOTARY PUBLIC AND SEAL ATTACHMENTS:
( ) AFFIDAVIT OF MENTAL HEALTH COUNSELOR
( ) STATEMENT OF FAMILY HISTORY
[(Required additional attachment if the surrender is for private adoption:
( ) AFFIDAVIT OF ATTORNEY FOR SURRENDERING PARENT)
Required additional attachment if the surrender is by a minor mother whose parent(s)
or tutor refuse to join in the Act of Surrender for a private adoption:
( ) WRITTEN CONSENT OF COURT]"
G. The Act of Surrender for a surrendering father shall contain the
requirements in substantially the following form:
"VOLUNTARY ACT OF SURRENDER FOR ADOPTION
(FOR A SURRENDERING FATHER OF A CHILD)
STATE OF LOUISIANA
PARISH OF (NAME OF PARISH)
BEFORE ME, the undersigned notary public, and in the presence of the two
undersigned competent witnesses who are over the age of eighteen, personally came
and appeared:
(NAME OF SURRENDERING FATHER)
a male of the age of (AGE), who is (MARITAL STATUS), and domiciled in the
Parish of (NAME OF PARISH), who being first duly sworn, did depose and state:
Page 179 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
(1) He is the natural/alleged father of (CHILD'S NAME), born on (DATE OF
BIRTH) in the (PARISH/COUNTY OF BIRTH), State of (STATE OF BIRTH).
OR
He is the natural/alleged father of the child to be born on or about
(PROJECTED DATE OF BIRTH) to (MOTHER'S NAME).
(2) He was not married to the child's mother at the time of the child's birth or
conception nor has he subsequently married this child's mother and acknowledged
his paternity of the child.
OR
He was married to the child's mother at the time of the child's birth or conception.
OR
He has married this child's mother subsequent to the child's birth and has
acknowledged his paternity of the child.
OR
He was not married to and has not married the mother of this child/expected child.
He has/has not executed an act of formal acknowledgment/a registration with the
putative father registry that admitted his paternity of this child/expected child. He
has/has not informally acknowledged his paternity of this child/expected child. His
paternity of this child/expected child has/has not been established by court judgment.
(3) The natural mother of the child/expected child is (MOTHER'S NAME),
and her last known address was (ADDRESS OR UNKNOWN).
(4) The agency to whom this child is hereby surrendered is (NAME OF
PERSON, AGENCY OR REPRESENTATIVE), whose address is (ADDRESS), who
hereby accepts this surrender is domiciled in this state. The (NAME OF AGENCY)
declares that he has no knowledge of any question concerning the parent's capacity
to execute a surrender that has not been resolved by the court pursuant to Article
1130.1.
OR
If the surrender is for private adoption, the Person or Representative to whom
Page 180 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
this child is hereby surrendered is (NAME OF PERSON OR REPRESENTATIVE),
whose address is (ADDRESS), hereby accepts this surrender from a surrendering
parent who is domiciled in this state or on behalf of adoptive parents domiciled in
this state. (NAME OF PERSON OR REPRESENTATIVE) declares that he has no
knowledge of any question concerning the parent's capacity to execute a surrender
that has not been resolved by the court pursuant to Article 1130.1.
(5) The court in which this surrender is to be filed is (NAME OF JUVENILE
COURT) located in (CITY AND PARISH) and that said court has jurisdiction over
the status of the child by virtue of either a surrendering parent, a prospective
adoptive parent, or a legal guardian being domiciled in this state, or that the child is
in the custody of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services
Health.
(6) Affiant declares that this Act of Surrender is/is not being executed earlier
than the third day following the birth of the child for agency adoptions, or the fifth
day following the birth of the child in a surrender for private adoption.
(7) Affiant declares that he has no mental incapacity and is under no
interdiction.
(8) Affiant declares that he has been informed and understands that his rights
as a natural parent/alleged parent of the child/expected child less than five days old
are permanently and irrevocably terminated on the fifth day following the birth of
the child; however, he understands that this Act of Surrender may be declared null
due to fraud or duress and may be dissolved if the adoption cannot be accomplished.
OR
Affiant declares that he has been informed and understands that his rights as
a natural parent/alleged parent of the child are permanently and irrevocably
terminated by execution of this Act of Surrender; however, he understands that it
may be declared null due to fraud or duress and may be dissolved if the adoption
cannot be accomplished.
(9)(a) Affiant declares that he freely and voluntarily surrenders custody of
Page 181 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
this child for the purpose of placement and adoption.
(b) Affiant declares that he has been informed and understands that it is
unlawful to willfully and knowingly make a written or oral false statement about the
biological paternity of a child and has been advised that the penalties for such falsity
are either a fine of ten thousand dollars or imprisonment for not more than five years,
or both.
(10) Affiant declares that he consents to an adoption, which consent is final
and irrevocable on the third day following the birth of this child/expected child for
agency adoptions, and on the fifth day following the birth of this child/expected child
less than five days old if this is a private adoption.
OR
Affiant declares that he consents to an adoption, which consent is final and
irrevocable upon the execution of this surrender.
(11) Affiant declares that he waives notice of the filing and service of any
pleading of any sort in any subsequent adoption proceeding regarding the child
surrendered.
(12) Affiant declares that he has been informed of the provisions of the
voluntary registration law, whereby contact may be established with the surrendered
child upon the child's reaching the age of eighteen years if both the surrendering
parent and the adopted person register and fulfill all registration requirements.
(13) Affiant declares that he has attended a minimum of two pre-surrender
counseling sessions relative to the surrender of this child for adoption.
OR
Affiant declares that he waives pre-surrender counseling relative to the
surrender of this child for adoption.
(14) Affiant declares that he has been informed and fully advised of the
provisions of R.S. 14:125.2 and the penalties provided therein by an attorney, other
than the attorney, associate, partner, shareholder, or employee of the attorney's law
firm or corporation for the prospective adoptive parent.
Page 182 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
(ADDITIONAL DECLARATION IF THE SURRENDER IS FOR AN
AGENCY ADOPTION ARRANGED BY THE LOUISIANA DEPARTMENT OF
CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES HEALTH)
(15) Affiant declares that the execution of this surrender is made without
conditions of any kind. Failure to comply with any formal or informal agreement for
post-adoption continuing contact will not nullify the surrender nor constitute cause
for revocation.
(ADDITIONAL DECLARATIONS IF THE SURRENDER IS FOR A
PRIVATE ADOPTION)
(16) Affiant declares that he is eighteen years of age or older.
OR
Affiant declares that he is under the age of eighteen and that (NAME OF
PARENTS OR TUTOR) join in this surrender.
OR
Affiant declares that he is under the age of eighteen and that (NAME OF
JUVENILE COURT) located in (CITY AND PARISH OF COURT) has given its
written consent for his surrender.
(17) Affiant declares that he has consulted with and been fully advised by an
attorney other than the attorney for the prospective adoptive parents about the
meaning of these declarations and the consequences of this Act of Surrender.
(18) Affiant declares that he does or does not wish the future release of
identifying information in the event of a medical necessity for which information is
needed in order to treat the child.
(19) Affiant declares that he has been informed and understands that the
Statement of Family History will be given to the adoptive parents at the time of
placement and made available, upon request, to the adopted person at the age of
eighteen years or older.
Sworn to, signed, and notarized, after being carefully read and explained to
(NAME OF SURRENDERING PARENT) in the presence of the undersigned notary
Page 183 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
and witnesses on this _____ day of ____________, 20__.
WITNESSES:
_________________________
_________________________
(If agency adoption:)
_______________________________________
SURRENDERING FATHER
_______________________________________
AGENCY REPRESENTATIVE
(If private adoption:)
_______________________________________
SURRENDERING FATHER
_______________________________________
ATTORNEY FOR SURRENDERING FATHER
_______________________________________
ADOPTING PARENTS
or
_______________________________________
ATTORNEY FOR ADOPTING PARENTS
(if anonymity to be protected)
[Additional signature(s) in private adoption if the surrendering father is a minor
_______________________________________
PARENT(S)/TUTOR OF MINOR
SURRENDERING FATHER]
_______________________________________
NOTARY PUBLIC AND SEAL ATTACHMENTS:
( ) AFFIDAVIT OF MENTAL HEALTH COUNSELOR or AFFIDAVIT OF
WAIVER OF COUNSELING
( ) STATEMENT OF FAMILY HISTORY
Page 184 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
[Required additional attachment if the surrender is for private adoption:
( ) AFFIDAVIT OF ATTORNEY FOR SURRENDERING PARENT]
[Required additional attachment if the surrender is by a minor father whose parent(s)
or tutor refuse to join in the Act of Surrender for a private adoption:
( ) WRITTEN CONSENT OF COURT]"
* * *
Art. 1127.1. Maintenance of medical report; transfer of adoption records
* * *
D. After the final decree of adoption, if the firm or lawyer is unable to
assume ongoing responsibility for the continuing duty pursuant to this Article, it
shall transfer its adoption records to the Louisiana Department of Children and
Family Services Health or another transferee approved by the department.
Thereafter, that transferee shall assume the continuing duty imposed by this Article.
Should any client subsequently attempt to update information, the firm or lawyer
shall refer the client to the current custodian of the record, and if appropriate, to the
voluntary registry.
* * *
Art. 1150. Definitions
As used in this Chapter:
(1) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health.
* * *
Art. 1152. Designated emergency care facility, emergency medical service provider,
firefighter, and law enforcement officer responsibilities; newborn
safety devices authorized
* * *
C. Instruction by a designated emergency care facility on safe haven
relinquishment procedures may:
* * *
Page 185 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
(3) Utilize the downloadable instructional video and training materials
provided by the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health on
the department's website and the manufacturer of the newborn safety device.
* * *
Art. 1169. Definitions
As used in this Title:
(1) "Agency" or "child placing agency" includes the Louisiana Department
of Children and Family Services Health, the corresponding department of any other
state, and those private agencies and institutions licensed for the placement of
children for adoption by the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services
Health or by the corresponding department of any other state.
* * *
(4) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health.
* * *
Art. 1180. Venue and jurisdiction in adoption
* * *
C. Upon filing of the act of voluntary surrender approved by the court
according to Article 1131(C), the court of competent venue and jurisdiction wherein
the surrender is filed shall have exclusive, original jurisdiction over all issues of
custody and adoption of the child during the pendency of the proceedings, unless the
child is in the custody of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services
Health.
* * *
Art. 1182. Records of adoption decrees
A. Whenever an interlocutory decree of adoption has been granted, the clerk
of court shall forward a certified copy of the decree to the Louisiana Department of
Social Services Health.
B. Whenever a final decree of adoption has been granted with regard to a
Page 186 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
child born in Louisiana, the clerk of court shall forward, on a form supplied by the
Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health, a certificate of the
decree to the state registrar of vital records.
* * *
Art. 1186. Confidential adoption records; disclosure
* * *
B. If the agency, firm, or lawyer ceases to do business in this state, it shall
transfer its adoption records to the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health or another transferee approved by the department. Thereafter, the
transferee shall ensure the preservation and confidentiality of records required by
Paragraph A of this Article and assumes responsibility for providing nonidentifying
information as required by Articles 1127 and 1127.1.
* * *
Art. 1200. Fee disclosure; permissible reimbursement of expenses; court review;
report
* * *
B. Only the following services provided by the Louisiana Department of
Children and Family Services Health, or payments made through a licensed adoption
agency or an adoption attorney, are permissible and not a violation of R.S. 14:286:
* * *
H. A copy of the adoption disclosure affidavit and all orders of the court
pursuant to this Article shall be mailed to the Louisiana Department of Children and
Family Services Health.
Art. 1201. Adoption disclosure affidavit of fees and charges; form
* * *
C. The form for the affidavit shall be as follows:
"ADOPTION DISCLOSURE AFFIDAVIT
BEFORE ME, the undersigned authority, personally came and appeared
__________ (petitioner) and _________ (attorney for petitioner), who being first
Page 187 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
duly sworn, did depose and state:
In the matter of the adoption by ________ (petitioner's name):
1. We report the following fees and charges or other things of value given in
connection with this adoption:
Itemization of Expenses Recipient Purpose Estimate Actual Date Paid
A. Agency administrative expenses:
1. Attorney fees
2. Court costs
3. Travel costs
4. Overhead
5. Other (Specify)
B. Agency counseling expenses:
1. Counseling for adopting parents
2. Home study evaluations
3. Counseling for biological parents
4. Counseling for the child
5. Statement of Family History information
6. Other (Specify)
C. Medical expenses for biological mother:
1. Medical
2. Travel
3. Other (Specify)
D. Medical/foster care expenses for child:
1. Medical
2. Travel
3. Other (Specify)
E. Living expenses of the biological mother:
1. Housing
2. Utilities
Page 188 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
(a) Electricity
(b) Gas
(c) Water
(d) Telephone
3. Food
4. Transportation
5. Maternity clothing
F. Living expenses paid to the biological mother during the term of the pregnancy
by another agency or attorney:
G. Other expenses (Specify):
Total Estimated Total Paid
2. We certify that no other fees, charges, or things of value other than court
costs have been given or shall be given by anyone in connection with this adoption.
3. We declare that this disclosure statement has been examined by each of us
and that its contents are true to the best of our information, knowledge, and belief.
4. We understand that each of us has a continuing obligation to supplement
and amend this affidavit as necessary.
5. We understand that this information will be transmitted to the Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services Health. We further understand that it
may be released by written authorization of the court for purposes of a grand jury
investigation pursuant to R.S. 14:286 or for an ethical investigation by the
Committee on Professional Responsibility of the Louisiana State Bar Association.
We further certify that we understand that in accordance with R.S. 14:286, making
a false statement in any adoption disclosure affidavit with the intent to deceive and
with knowledge that the statement is false is punishable by a fine not to exceed fifty
thousand dollars or imprisonment with or without hard labor for not more than ten
years, or both.
_____________________ _________________________
Signature of Petitioner Signature of Attorney
Page 189 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
______________________ _________________________
Address Address
SWORN TO AND SUBSCRIBED BEFORE ME ON THIS _____ DAY OF
______, ___.
__________________________
(NOTARY PUBLIC)"
* * *
Art. 1223. Fee disclosure; permissible reimbursement of expenses; court review;
report
* * *
B. Only the following services provided by the Louisiana Department of
Children and Family Services Health, or payments made through a licensed adoption
agency or an adoption attorney, are permissible and not a violation of R.S. 14:286:
* * *
H. A copy of the adoption disclosure affidavit and all orders of the court
pursuant to this Article shall be mailed to the Louisiana Department of Children and
Family Services Health.
Art. 1223.1. Adoption disclosure affidavit of fees and charges; form
* * *
C. The form for the affidavit shall be as follows:
"ADOPTION DISCLOSURE AFFIDAVIT
BEFORE ME, the undersigned authority, personally came and appeared
__________ (petitioner) and _________ (attorney for petitioner), who being first
duly sworn, did depose and state:
In the matter of the adoption by ________ (petitioner's name):
1. We report the following fees and charges or other things of value given in
connection with this adoption:
Itemization of Expenses Recipient Purpose Estimate Actual Date Paid
A. Legal expenses:
Page 190 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
1. Attorney fees for biological parent
2. Attorney fees for adopting parent
3. Court costs
4. Travel costs
5. Other (Specify)
B. Counseling expenses:
1. Counseling for adopting parents
2. Home study evaluations
3. Counseling for biological parents
4. Counseling for the child
5. Statement of Family History information
6. Other (Specify)
C. Medical expenses for biological mother:
1. Medical
2. Travel
3. Other (Specify)
D. Medical/foster care expenses for child:
1. Medical
2. Travel
3. Other (Specify)
E. Living expenses of the biological mother:
1. Housing
2. Utilities
(a) Electricity
(b) Gas
(c) Water
(d) Telephone
3. Food
4. Transportation
Page 191 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
5. Maternity clothing
F. Living expenses paid to the biological mother during the term of the pregnancy
by another agency or attorney:
G. Other expenses (Specify):
Total Estimated Total Paid
2. We certify that no other fees, charges, or things of value other than court
costs have been given or shall be given by anyone in connection with this adoption.
3. We declare that this disclosure statement has been examined by each of us
and that its contents are true to the best of our information, knowledge, and belief.
4. We understand that each of us has a continuing obligation to supplement
and amend this affidavit as necessary.
5. We understand that this information will be transmitted to the Louisiana
Department of Children and Family Services Health. We further understand that it
may be released by written authorization of the court for purposes of a grand jury
investigation pursuant to R.S. 14:286 or for an ethical investigation by the
Committee on Professional Responsibility of the Louisiana State Bar Association.
We further certify that we understand that in accordance with R.S. 14:286, making
a false statement in any adoption disclosure affidavit with the intent to deceive and
with knowledge that the statement is false is punishable by a fine not to exceed fifty
thousand dollars or imprisonment with or without hard labor for not more than ten
years, or both.
__________________________ ___________________________
Signature of Petitioner Signature of Attorney
__________________________ ___________________________
Address Address
SWORN TO AND SUBSCRIBED BEFORE ME ON THIS _____ DAY OF
______, ___.
___________________________
(NOTARY PUBLIC)"
Page 192 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
* * *
Art. 1269.3. Continuing contact agreement; parties; required declarations
* * *
F. The continuing contact agreement shall contain the requirements in
substantially the following form:
STATE OF LOUISIANA
PARISH OF (NAME OF PARISH)
AGREEMENT FOR POST-ADOPTION CONTINUING CONTACT
We (NAME OF ADOPTIVE PARENT(S)) and (NAME OF ADULT
PERSON PERMITTED CONTACT BY ARTICLE 1269.2) agree to post-adoption
continuing contact between (NAME OF ADOPTED CHILD) and (NAME OF
PERSON PERMITTED CONTACT) in accordance with the provisions of this
Agreement. This Agreement reflects our commitment to an on-going, cooperative
relationship focused upon meeting (NAME OF CHILD)'s needs now and in the
future, fully recognizing that those needs may change as (HE/SHE) matures.
OR
We (NAME OF ADOPTIVE PARENT(S)) and (NAME OF ADULT
PARENT, GUARDIAN OR LEGAL CUSTODIAN OF MINOR SIBLING) agree
to post-adoption continuing contact between (NAME OF ADOPTED CHILD) and
(NAME OF MINOR SIBLING) in accordance with the provisions of this
Agreement. This Agreement reflects our recognition of the significance and
enduring nature of sibling relationships and our commitment to supporting and
preserving the on-going relationship between (NAME OF CHILD) and (MINOR
SIBLING).
We have each freely and voluntarily entered into this Agreement and intend
to be bound by its terms. We have been counseled and advised by the Department,
our attorney, or other appropriate professional of the meaning of these declarations,
the effects of a continuing contact agreement, and the opportunity to have our own
respective counsel review this Agreement.
Page 193 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
We recognize that any dispute or litigation regarding the terms of this
Agreement shall not affect the validity of any surrender or termination of parental
rights, adoption, or custody of (NAME OF CHILD).
We also recognize that upon approval of the court, this Agreement becomes
legally binding and any party to it may seek enforcement of its terms.
We also agree that (NAME OF DEPARTMENT REPRESENTATIVE or
NAME OF COUNSEL FOR ADOPTIVE PARENT) shall file this Agreement with
the proper court of jurisdiction by (DATE NO LATER THAN 10 DAYS FROM
EXECUTION OF THE AGREEMENT) requesting the court's approval of this
Agreement in accordance with Louisiana Children's Code Article 1269.5.
We agree to the following enforceable post-adoption continuing contact:
(INSERT PROVISIONS NEGOTIATED BY PARTIES.)
This Agreement reflects our minimum expectations regarding continuing
contact for the duration of the minority of (NAME OF CHILD). We understand that
we can agree upon other continuing contact arrangements in the future through
informal or formal means. However, we recognize that these minimum expectations
must be preserved until such time as we modify them by mutual written agreement
or the court modifies or terminates this Agreement in accordance with Louisiana
Children's Code Article 1269.8.
We certify that we enter this Agreement in good faith and intend that it
always be interpreted to serve (NAME OF CHILD)'s best interest. We agree that we
will always attempt to resolve any disagreement that may arise in (HIS/HER) best
interest and acknowledge that court modification or enforcement is to be used only
as a last resort when all informal means of resolution have been exhausted. We
acknowledge that Louisiana Children's Code Article 1269.8 authorizes the court to
hear a motion to enforce, modify, or terminate this Agreement only after we have
attempted in good faith to mediate the issues underlying our disagreement. Should
mediation fail to resolve our differences, the court may modify or terminate this
Agreement upon finding a change of circumstances and the Agreement no longer
Page 194 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
serves the best interest of (NAME OF CHILD).
This instrument reflects the entire agreement between us regarding post-
adoption continuing contact. There are no promises, terms, conditions, or
obligations other than those stated in this written Agreement.
We acknowledge that unless it is the legal custodian of a minor sibling named
in this Agreement, the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services
Health, office of children and family services, child welfare is not a party to this
Agreement and has no responsibility for enforcement of it.
This Agreement becomes effective upon approval of the court in accordance
with Louisiana Children's Code Article 1269.5.
THIS DONE, READ, AND SIGNED this day of __________,
20 , Parish of (NAME OF PARISH), State of Louisiana.
_______________________________________________________
ADOPTING PARENT
_______________________________________________________
OTHER ADOPTING PARENT, IF ANY
_______________________________________________________
ADULT PERSON PERMITTED CONTACT
_______________________________________________________
ADULT PARENT, GUARDIAN OR LEGAL CUSTODIAN OF MINOR SIBLING
____________________________________
WITNESS
____________________________________
WITNESS
____________________________________
NOTARY
* * *
Art. 1270. Legislative findings; purpose; release of information
* * *
Page 195 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
B. There is hereby created within the office of children and family services
of the child welfare, Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health
a voluntary registry for the matching of adopted persons, or an adoptive parent of a
minor or deceased adopted person, or a descendant of a deceased adopted person, or
his parent if a minor, and biological parents or siblings, or both, or a parent, sibling,
or descendant, or his parent if a minor, of a deceased biological parent. The purpose
of this registry shall be to facilitate voluntary contact between the adopted person,
or an adoptive parent of a minor or deceased adopted person, or the descendant of
a deceased adopted person, or his parent if a minor, and a biological parent or
biological sibling, or both, or a parent, sibling, or descendant, or his parent if a
minor, of a deceased biological parent.
* * *
Art. 1274. Penalties
Any employee or former employee of the Louisiana Department of Children
and Family Services Health, or a licensed adoption agency, or any employee or
appointee or former employee or appointee of a court who discloses identifying
information other than pursuant to judicial order or through the registry, as provided
in this Chapter, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not less than five
hundred dollars and not more than five thousand dollars, or imprisoned for not more
than six months, or both.
* * *
CHAPTER 16. LOUISIANA DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY
SERVICES HEALTH ADOPTION INCENTIVES
* * *
Art. 1281.3. Definitions
As used in this Title:
(1) "Agency" or "child placing agency" includes the Louisiana Department
of Children and Family Services Health, the corresponding department of any other
state, and those private agencies and institutions licensed for the placement of
Page 196 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
children for adoption by the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services
Health or by the corresponding department of any other state. Any person offering
or providing intercountry adoption services shall be accredited by the Department
of State in accordance with the Intercountry Adoption Universal Accreditation Act
of 2012.
* * *
(4) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health.
* * *
Art. 1282.5. Change of name
The full name of the adopted child may be changed in the final decree of
adoption and, if changed, the surname shall be the same as that of the adoptive
parent. In accordance with R.S. 40:79, the clerk of court shall forward, on a form
supplied by the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health, his
certificate of the decree to the state registrar, who shall make a new certificate of live
birth of the person adopted, in the new name if the name has been changed in the
decree.
* * *
Art. 1283.2. Permissible reimbursement of expenses
* * *
H. A copy of the Adoption Disclosure Affidavit and all orders of the court
pursuant to this Article shall be mailed to the office of children and family services,
child welfare, Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health.
* * *
Art. 1283.3. Adoption disclosure affidavit of fees and charges
* * *
C. The form for the affidavit shall be as follows:
"ADOPTION DISCLOSURE AFFIDAVIT
BEFORE ME, the undersigned authority, personally came and appeared
Page 197 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
__________ (petitioner) and __________ (attorney for petitioner), who, being first
duly sworn, did depose and state:
In the matter of the adoption by __________ (petitioner's name):
(1) We report the following fees and charges, or other things of value given
in connection with this adoption paid to any agency or individual:
Actual Estimated due: Due or paid to:
$ $
A. Agency administrative expenses:
1. Attorney fees
2. Court costs
3. Travel costs
4. Overhead
5. Other (Specify)
B. Agency Mental Health Counseling expenses:
1. Counseling for adopting parents
2. Home study evaluations
3. Counseling for the child
4. Other (Specify)
C. Medical expenses for biological mother:
1. Medical
2. Travel
3. Other (Specify)
D. Medical/foster care expenses for child:
1. Medical
2. Travel
3. Other (Specify)
E. Other expenses (Specify):
(2) We certify that to the best of our knowledge no other fees, charges, or
things of value other than court costs have been given or shall be given by anyone
Page 198 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
in connection with this adoption.
(3) We declare that this disclosure statement has been examined by each of
us and that its contents are true to the best of our information, knowledge, and belief.
(4) We understand that each of us has a continuing obligation to supplement
and amend this affidavit as necessary.
(5) We understand that this information will be transmitted to the office of
adoption services, Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health.
We further understand that it may be released by written authorization of the court
for purposes of a grand jury investigation pursuant to R.S. 14:286 or for an ethical
investigation by the Committee on Professional Responsibility of the Louisiana State
Bar Association.
__________________________ ____________________________
Signature of Petitioner Signature of Attorney
____________________________ ____________________________
Address Address
SWORN TO AND SUBSCRIBED BEFORE ME ON THIS _____ DAY OF ______,
___.
____________________________
(NOTARY PUBLIC)"
* * *
Art. 1283.16. Change of name; issuance of birth certificate
The full name of the adopted child may be changed in the final decree of
foreign orphan adoption and, if changed, the surname shall be the same as that of the
adoptive parent. In accordance with R.S. 40:79, the clerk of court shall forward, on
a form supplied by the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services
Health, his certificate of the decree to the state registrar, who shall make a new
certificate of live birth of the person adopted in the new name if the name has been
changed in the decree.
* * *
Page 199 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
Art. 1284.5. Change of name; issuance of birth certificate
The full name of the adopted child may be changed in the final decree of
recognition of foreign adoption and, if changed, the surname shall be the same as that
of the adoptive parent. In accordance with R.S. 40:79, the clerk of court shall
forward, on a form supplied by the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health, his certificate of the decree to the state registrar, who shall make
a new certificate of live birth of the person adopted, in the new name if the name has
been changed in the decree.
* * *
Art. 1285.2. Permissible reimbursement of expenses
* * *
H. A copy of the Adoption Disclosure Affidavit and all orders of the court
pursuant to this Article shall be mailed to the office of children and family services,
child welfare, Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health.
* * *
Art. 1285.3. Adoption disclosure affidavit of fees and charges
* * *
C. The form for the affidavit shall be as follows:
"ADOPTION DISCLOSURE AFFIDAVIT
BEFORE ME, the undersigned authority, personally came and appeared
__________ (petitioner) and __________ (attorney for petitioner), who, being first
duly sworn, did depose and state:
In the matter of the adoption by __________ (petitioner's name):
(1) We report the following fees and charges, or other things of value given
in connection with this adoption paid to any agency or individual:
Actual Estimated due: Due or paid to:
$ $
A. Agency administrative expenses:
1. Attorney fees
Page 200 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
2. Court costs
3. Travel costs
4. Overhead
5. Other (Specify)
B. Agency Mental Health Counseling expenses:
1. Counseling for adoptive parents
2. Home study evaluations
3. Counseling for the child
4. Other (Specify)
C. Medical expenses for biological mother:
1. Medical
2. Travel
3. Other (Specify)
D. Medical/foster care expenses for child:
1. Medical
2. Travel
3. Other (Specify)
E. Other expenses (Specify):
(2) We certify that to the best of our knowledge no other fees, charges, or
things of value other than court costs have been given or shall be given by anyone
in connection with this adoption.
(3) We declare that this disclosure statement has been examined by each of
us and that its contents are true to the best of our information, knowledge, and belief.
(4) We understand that each of us has a continuing obligation to supplement
and amend this affidavit as necessary.
(5) We understand that this information will be transmitted to the office of
adoption services, Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health.
We further understand that it may be released by written authorization of the court
for purposes of a grand jury investigation pursuant to R.S. 14:286 or for an ethical
Page 201 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
investigation by the Committee on Professional Responsibility of the Louisiana State
Bar Association.
__________________________ ____________________________
Signature of Petitioner Signature of Attorney
_______________________________________________________________
Address Address
SWORN TO AND SUBSCRIBED BEFORE ME ON THIS ____ DAY OF _____.
____________________________
(NOTARY PUBLIC)"
* * *
Art. 1285.16. Change of name; issuance of birth certificate
The full name of the adopted child may be changed in the final decree of
adoption and, if changed, the surname shall be the same as that of the adoptive
parent. In accordance with R.S. 40:79, the clerk of court shall forward, on a form
supplied by the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health, his
certificate of the decree to the state registrar, who shall make a new certificate of live
birth of the person adopted, in the new name if the name has been changed in the
decree.
* * *
Art. 1301.3. State tribunal and support enforcement agency
A. The district courts or, if applicable, the family or juvenile courts, and the
division of administrative review, Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works, or other administrative law division authorized by law, are the
tribunals of this state for purposes of this Chapter.
B. The Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works is the
support enforcement agency of this state.
* * *
Art. 1303.10. Duties of the Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana
Works; state information agency
Page 202 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
A. The Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works is the
state information agency under this Chapter.
* * *
Art. 1307.3. Relationship of the Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works to United States central authority
The Department of Children and Family Services of this state Louisiana
Works is recognized as the agency designated by the United States central authority
to perform specific functions under the Convention.
Art. 1307.4. Initiation by the Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works of support proceeding under convention
A. In a support proceeding under this Section, the Department of Children
and Family Services, of this state Louisiana Works shall:
* * *
Art. 1307.5. Direct request
* * *
D. A petitioner filing a direct request is not entitled to assistance from the
Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works.
* * *
Art. 1307.8. Recognition and enforcement of registered convention support order
* * *
C. If a tribunal of this state does not recognize a Convention support order
under Subparagraph (B)(2), (4), or (9) of this Article:
* * *
(2) The Department of Children and Family Services Louisiana Works shall
take all appropriate measures to request a child support order for the obligee if the
application for recognition and enforcement was received under Article 1307.4.
* * *
Art. 1351. Definitions
As used in this Chapter:
Page 203 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
* * *
(4) "Department" means the Department of Children and Family Services
Louisiana Works.
* * *
Art. 1427. Authority to transport and detain
* * *
C.(1) In addition to other persons authorized by this Article to transport to a
treatment facility a child in whose name an emergency certificate has been issued,
any of the following persons may also accompany the child during such
transportation:
* * *
(c) A Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health case
worker.
(2) A biological parent of a child in foster care shall accompany the child
only if approved by the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services
Health.
* * *
Art. 1515. Petition; contents; form
A. A petition for voluntary transfer of custody shall set forth specifically:
* * *
(7) Whether the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services
Health has recommended a petition for voluntary transfer of custody be filed.
* * *
B. The form for the petition shall be as follows:
"PETITION FOR VOLUNTARY TRANSFER OF CUSTODY
The petition of_______ (all legal custodians of the child unless otherwise
indicated in Paragraph III of the petition), domiciled in the parish of _______,
respectfully represent(s):
I.
Page 204 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
That petitioner(s) reside at the following address(es):
__________________________________________________________________
__________________________________________________________________
II.
That petitioner(s) is/are the parent(s) and legal custodian(s) of the minor
child(ren), namely _______________________________, whose date of birth is
______________ (add same information for all children subject to the petition), as
more fully appears from the attached certificate(s) of birth.
Is the child an Indian child?
____ ____
Yes No
III.
That there are no other legal custodians of the child(ren) OR that a legal
custodian, namely _______________________, is unable to join in this petition for
the following reasons:
__________________________________________________________________
__________________________________________________________________
__________________________________________________________________
__________________________________________________________________.
IV.
That petitioner(s) desire(s) to knowingly and voluntarily transfer custody of
the above named children to ____________________________, which individual(s),
institution or agency reside(s) at the following address:
________________________________________________________ and who have
the following relationship with the children:
__________________________________________________________________
___________________________________________________________________.
V.
That petitioner(s) desire to transfer physical custody OR legal custody of the
Page 205 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
person of the children (indicate one) for the period of time ______________(specify
intended duration) in accordance with the following terms and conditions
__________________________________________________________________
__________________________________________________________________
(may include provisions for support and/or visitation).
VI.
That petitioners desire this transfer of custody for the following reasons: ______
______
______
______
______
______
______
______
______
______
______
__________________________________________________________________
__________________________________________________________________
__________________________________________________________________
__________________________________________________________________.
Has the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health
recommended to you that this petition be filed?
________ _______
Yes No
If yes, state name of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services Health worker making the recommendation and the reasons for the
recommendation with particularity.
If the department has recommended that this petition be filed, you have a
Page 206 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
right to counsel. Have you consulted with an attorney?
________ _______
Yes No
VII.
That ________________________ has/have agreed to and does/do desire to
accept custody of the child(ren) to the extent and under the terms and conditions
stated in this petition, as more fully appears in the attached Affidavit of Acceptance.
WHEREFORE, petitioner(s) pray(s) that there be judgment herein
transferring custody of the child(ren), _______________, _____________,
________________, ________________, to ________________________, to the
extent and under the terms and conditions set forth in this petition.
________________________________
(Signature and address of Petitioner(s))
or counsel for Petitioner(s)
(If in proper person, petition should be signed in presence of a notary.)
SWORN TO AND SUBSCRIBED BEFORE ME ON THIS THE _____ DAY OF
________________, 20 ___.
____________________________
NOTARY PUBLIC"
* * *
Art. 1517. Notice; service; curator; reservation of rights
* * *
E. If the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health has
recommended that the petition for voluntary transfer of custody be filed:
* * *
Art. 1518. Pretrial orders; contribution to costs; appointment of counsel; Indian
parent or custodian
* * *
B. Upon request of an indigent parent, the court shall appoint counsel for the
Page 207 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
parent when the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health has
recommended that the petition for voluntary transfer be filed.
* * *
Art. 1519. Hearing
The petition shall be set for hearing on the record unless specifically waived
by the court. If the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health,
office of children and family services, child welfare, has recommended that the
petition for voluntary transfer of custody be filed, a representative for the department
shall testify at the hearing with particularity the reasons for the recommendation.
Further, the department representative shall specify why a child in need of care
petition should not be filed and shall testify regarding the preventative services
offered by the department to the petitioner to prevent the transfer of custody.
Art. 1567. Venue; standing
* * *
B. An adult may seek relief under this Chapter by filing a petition with the
court alleging abuse by the defendant. Any parent, adult household member, local
child protection unit of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services
Health, or district attorney may seek relief on behalf of any child or any person
alleged to be incompetent by filing a petition with the court alleging abuse by the
defendant. A petitioner's right to relief under this Chapter shall not be affected by his
leaving the residence or household to avoid further abuse.
* * *
Art. 1641. Rulemaking authority; effect of rules
A. The Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services Health shall
have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act as necessary to carry out the provisions of this
Chapter.
* * *
Section 30. Act. No. 384 of the 2013 Regular Session of the Legislature, Sections 1
Page 208 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
through 9, 11 through 18, and 19(A) of Act No. 477 of the 2025 Regular Session, Section
13 of Act No. 478 of the 2025 Regular Session, and R.S. 15:587.5(A)(4) and 1199.4(D)(7),
R.S. 17:407.51(B)(2), 407.101(C)(1)(ff), and 3138.12(C)(1)(b), R.S. 29:726.5(B)(19), R.S.
36:4(A)(10), 8(E)(2)(d), 8.1(C)(5), 471 through 478, R.S. 39:21.3(E)(2)(f) and (l), R.S.
40:600.151(D)(1)(c) and 1061.17.1(9), R.S. 46:51(2) and (14), 230.1(C), 233.1(A) and (B),
352(2)(b), 353(A)(1)(b), 936, 2146(A)(1)(m), 2166(A)(7), 2168.1(C)(8), 2352(B)(5),
2525(D)(2), 2602(B)(1), 2605.4(C)(1)(e), and 2757, R.S. 49:74(A)(5)(i)(aa)(IX), 191(1)(h),
219.2(B)(1)(a)(iv), 219.5(B)(2), 220.46(B)(14), 966(B)(17), 1053(C)(16), and
1222(B)(6)(b), R.S. 51:1037(D) and 1057(B)(1), and Children's Code Article 509 are hereby
repealed.
Section 31. The administrative rules contained in the Louisiana Administrative Code
promulgated by the Department of Children and Family Services which govern or are
applicable to the programs and operations transferred from the Department of Children and
Family Services to Louisiana Works and the Louisiana Department of Health by this Act
shall continue to be effective, and the office of state register shall change all applicable
references to the Department of Children and Family Services to Louisiana Works or the
Louisiana Department of Health, as applicable, and redesignate and renumber, as needed,
all applicable provisions as are necessary to maintain continuity in the Louisiana
Administrative Code.
Section 32.(A) All Department of Children and Family Services contracts related to
the operation and administration of the programs and activities transferred to Louisiana
Works and the Louisiana Department of Health by this Act shall be deemed to have been
transferred and assigned to Louisiana Works or the Louisiana Department of Health upon
the effective date of this Section without the necessity of contractual amendment, and
Louisiana Works and the Louisiana Department of Health shall be responsible for all related
obligations and liabilities arising on or after that effective date.
(B) In order to ensure continuity of services during the transition period, any pending
or unfinished business of the programs being transferred over shall be taken over and
completed by Louisiana Works and the Louisiana Department of Health with the same
Page 209 of 213
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-320 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 265
power and authorization as that of the Department of Children and Family Services.
(C)(1) All employees engaged in the performance of duties relating to the functions
of the programs and services transferred from the Department of Children and Family
Services to Louisiana Works and the Louisiana Department of Health are hereby transferred
to carry out the functions of the transferred programs and services and shall continue to
perform their duties, subject to applicable state civil service laws, rules, and regulations.
Subject to such laws, positions in the unclassified service shall remain in the unclassified
service. Upon the transfer of employees to a board, such employees shall immediately have
the ability to payroll deduct or direct deposit their payroll earnings in favor of any credit
union of which they were members prior to the transfer.
(2) The Department of State Civil Service shall assist the Department of Children and
Family Services, Louisiana Works, and the Louisiana Department of Health in all human
resource activities deemed necessary to make such a transfer. All human resource activities
shall include but are not limited to the transfer of personnel files and other related
confidential documents, position descriptions, retirement benefits, and related benefits,
including but not limited to those offered by the Office of Group Benefits.
Section 33. This Act shall become effective on October 1, 2026.